Chapter 61
I Don't Hate It








Odette had dug the pit with all her effort, and the damp earth was now smothering her hands. She was equally disorganized in her clothing and shoes. She calmly attempted to wash the filth off of herself, but she knew in her heart that it was pointless. 

Bastian approached her as she got to her feet and retrieved her filthy clothes. The terrified pup cried and hid behind Odette.

 "You seem to have a predilection for misery, don't you?" A crooked smile crept onto Bastian's lips as his eyes scanned Odette from head to toe, and back again. "I highly doubt anyone would have a liking for frolicking in the dirt amidst a midnight rain. So, what exactly are you up to?"

"... I'm sorry if I've worried you." Odette tried to keep a neutral expression on her face as she faced him. Bastian was dressed in a nighttime-appropriate dark blue raincoat.

He appeared wet from the rain, but not at all unclean. Odette averted her eyes and tucked her grimy hands under the hem of her skirt.

"The stray dog I used to occasionally feed has passed away." With a heavy heart, Odette conveyed the news. As she made her way towards the forest, where she had previously chased after the puppy, she stumbled upon the mother dog, lying lifeless on the frigid ground.

Its body had become rigid, as though its breath had already departed. All she could do was tenderly shut the dog's eyes, which gazed up at the vast expanse of the sky. As she took a closer look, she realized that the dog's physique was much smaller and emaciated than she had imagined. This realization only amplified the sorrow that had already taken hold of Odette's heart.

“So?” Bastian blandly asked as he cast a glance over the spot where the mother dog was interred.

 Odette took a peaceful, deep breath, which soothed her worn-out heart. "I was afraid that if I left it alone, other animals would prey on it, so I picked it up and gave it a proper burial." 

 "You did it alone?"

"Yes, I did it alone. I didn't want to trouble you by having to ask for assistance with something like this," Odette replied.

"Does it not bother you that your hostess is out late and not returning home?" Bastian asked.

 "In hindsight, I believe I acted impulsively. Going forward, I will take care not to repeat the same mistake." Odette expressed regret and apologized without making any excuses. However, her overly polite demeanor came across as a lack of respect.

Bastian was taken aback and erupted into peals of laughter. He appeared to comprehend the source of the woman's fury. Although she had the temperament of a fierce wolf, it was still preferable to behaving like a petulant child.

Bastian's confusion grew as he surveyed the scene. "How in the world did you manage to dig a pit for a dog all by yourself?"

Despite Odette's attempt at a feigned smile, the answer was evident from her appearance. Her attire and the scattered fragments of broken branches suggested that she may have undergone training as a ranger.

The sound of the raindrops cascading upon the verdant foliage filled the once-quiet atmosphere, imbuing it with a sense of serenity.

Bastian's unwavering stare made Odette uneasy, causing her to eventually avert her gaze. As her eyes fixed upon the modest grave that she had crafted single-handedly, her vision became hazy once more.

Odette left the little cub hovering by her side and the deceased mother behind because she couldn't bear to turn around. She was aware of the dog mother's precarious health from the outset, but she felt as though everything was her responsibility.

If only she had gotten here sooner.  If only she had been able to offer better support than the mediocre meal that was distributed. She wasted her time trying if she wasn't capable of doing that. The sound of rain could be heard amid the unfounded speculation. The puppy was hunched over its mother's body, staring up at her. Odette could not look away from the total trust she had in those eyes.

It was difficult to recall anything that took place beyond that point.

She carried the lifeless dog into the gloomy woodland with her while wrapped in her shawl. Somewhere warm and sunny. She was looking for a spot where she would not feel lonely, and she ended up coming to this location without even realizing it.

Even though the raindrops were pretty substantial, Odette did not show any fear. She started by locating a piece of ground that had gentle soil, and then she gathered a number of large tree branches that appeared to be rather sturdy.

She could not feed the dead dog to the wild animals and there was no other way for her to ask for assistance, so she was forced to find a method to handle the situation on her own.  It was a familiar feeling of hopelessness at the same time.

She was able to gain control of her feelings, and when she finally raised her head, she noticed that Bastian was still standing there. When they looked at one other, he let out a drawn-out sigh.

That was all it took for Odette to have an abrupt realization that she did not appear appealing at all. It would be lovely if she could straighten up her hair, but it would be even more ludicrous if she hurriedly touched it with her dirty hands before she could finish.

As Odette frantically searched the area, she hurried up to the trunk of the tree and grabbed her handbag from the base of the branch.  When Bastian approached her, she was in a frustrated state since her frozen hand was preventing her from moving in the way that she desired.  After being startled, the contents of the bag fell out and spread themselves around the dirt floor.

Odette tried her best to stifle the anger she felt about the most unfortunate turn of events as she scooped up the bag that had fallen. She secretly wished that Bastian would look the other way, but he ended up assisting her nonetheless.

Handkerchief. Watch that fits in her pocket.  Mirror.

The instant that she was relieved to see that the things were, for the most part, acceptable, a piece of chocolate that was wrapped in colorful wrapping paper drew her attention.

 Exactly at the point when she was furious with her younger self for keeping such things, Bastian reached over and grabbed the pocket knife that was sitting next to it.  As he opened up the folded blade, he saw that the corners of his eyes were gradually becoming more constricted.

"I beg you, tell me that you're not going to use this for self-defense." Bastian inquired as if it were completely ridiculous.  It was a dull knife that had seen better days, and it didn't even stand up straight. Odette did not utter a single word, but instead she accepted it from him.

After she had finished packing all of her possessions, she stood up as if nothing had happened and unwrapped the handkerchief she was carrying.  During the time that she was carefully cleaning her hands, the puppy that had been lurking behind her emerged from its hiding place.

When Bastian stared down at the tangled ball of fur that was the puppy, a crease appeared in his forehead, "Have you been trying to find someone who could take Count Xanders's place?" 

"At first, I believed it to be a male; however, upon further inspection, I discovered that it was a female." Odette erectly stood in front of him while carrying a handkerchief that was folded and a bag that was draped over her wrist. It appeared as though she was making an attempt to give the impression that she was unaffected, yet all that effort only served to highlight her sorrowful expression.

Her skin was as white as a sheet of paper, and the apples of her cheeks and lips were an alarming shade of scarlet.  When one looked at her in greater detail, one could also see that her tiny shoulders were quivering slightly. The large and little scars that were seen on her hands were most likely medals that were left as a result of her tenacity and the fact that she dug the ground with twigs.

 The persistent fall precipitation that followed didn't seem like it was going to let up.

Bastian heaved a sigh before taking off his raincoat and wrapping it around Odette, who was shivering.  "Do not be so rigid as to be pointless." 

While Odette was running away in shock, Bastian caught her by the arm and buttoned her raincoat with great care. "Let's turn around and go back."  After buckling her waist strap more securely, Bastian extended her hand to the audience.

Odette was overcome with a sense of helplessness as she gazed at the hand that was extended towards her.  In the meantime, Bastian's residual body heat in the raincoat seeped into every part of her icy body, warming her from the inside out.  It was a feeling that brought back memories of a period in her life that had been fraught with gloom and misery.

Odette felt relieved rather than angry when she turned around and heard a voice calling her name from behind. She was despite the fact that she knew the ugly man was the one who had harmed her.

She welcomed his arrival but, despite her joy, she couldn't stand the sight of him in any form.

Odette retreated as soon as the recollection of that time, which had been aroused by Bastian's warmth, came to mind. Even up until this point, life had been challenging.  She did not want to compound the problem by adding the additional burden of hating him.

 “Bastian, I beg you, please allow this youngster to accompany me. Odette reached down and snatched the puppy that was hanging about her feet. "She was bereaved of her mother. Due to the fact that it is still so young and delicate, it cannot live on its own.

 “So?” Bastian showed his disapproval by raising his hand and sweeping his wet hair away from his face. "If you want to take care of an animal, a real dog is the best option for you."

"I don't want any more dogs.  I’ll see to it that it doesn’t become a problem for you. As long as I am here, I will quietly raise it and take it with me when I depart. Please extend your mercy for only that long." 

Odette cradled the dirty dog gently in her arms as she stared up at him helplessly. She appeared to have an unusually strong emotional connection to the hapless creature.  

"Please, Bastian."

Odette pleaded again as the filthy sensation of being treated like a stray dog returned.

 As Bastian peered into the red eyes that were full with obstinate determination, his laughter turned to white breath and dispersed.

His answer was the only one he had.



"I've heard that they picked up a dog?"

 The servants greeted one another with inquiries as they started their day.  When daybreak finally arrived, rumors had already spread throughout the entire mansion.

The master, who had gone out to hunt for his wife who had gone missing, returned with a dog for whatever reason.

 The servant who was present at the time reported that the master treated the lady and the puppy that she picked up as precious treasures.

It took less than a day for this to put an end to the rumors that the two had been involved in a heated argument with one another.

"But isn't it true that the master despises dogs?"  

A head was nodded by one of the maids as she made her way towards the kitchen. "He wouldn't even want a regular hound. I was told that when he was a child, he was severely injured after he was attacked by a dog.  Therefore, the previous owner hadn't had a dog ever since he welcomed his grandson into the family home."

 “Ah.  Did he?  I was unaware of it." 

“ I'm curious as to whether or not he loves his wife enough to put up with a dog that he despises.  They might need to hire a babysitter sooner or later, but I can't say for sure.”

As soon as the maids rounded the corner leading to the kitchen, the lively conversation that they had been having ceased.  Overall, it was due of the interaction with the rigid butler that brought it about.

“Shh.” Lovis, who was looking directly at them, flashed a threatening gesture by bringing his index finger up to his mouth to make a point. The maids who were observing clapped their hands together, shook their heads in unison, and then dispersed to their various posts.

 As Lovis, who had only just finished her ordeal, entered the common area, the call bell began to ring.  3rd Floor.  It was the bedroom that belonged to the hostess.

"It can only be the master if they call at this hour. I'll go." As Lovis quickly exited the room, he mumbled something to the head maid before leaving. When he found out that Bastian had brought a dog, it was a stray dog that had been found in the forest. Almost immediately, his heart stopped beating.

Was it possible that a stray dog that lived in that wooded area was also to blame for the accident that caused Carl Illis to remove his grandson from the custody of his son-in-law?

Of course, the hound that was reported to have attacked the child at that time was said to be as huge as a wolf, so there would be a big difference between the little pet dog that Odette had picked up and the hound that was said to have attacked the child at that time, but a dog was still a dog.

 Lovis had arrived in front of the bedroom on the third floor by the time it was determined that it would be most beneficial to speak to the madam.  As he knocked on the door, he was not surprised to hear Bastian's voice.

 Lovis let out a sigh before opening the closed door.

In the bedroom, where there was only the light of one bedside lamp on, the bluish light of morning still lingered.  Bastian was snoozing away on the bed while he observed his dozing wife below him.

 "Have you called, Master?" Lovis inquired. 

 When he questioned Bastian quietly, he slowly moved his head to look at him.

 "I believe it would be a good idea to get in touch with Dr. Kramer." Bastian got up softly from his bed and then unexpectedly issued a command.  After being surprised, Lovis approached his master.

 "Master, are you alright?”

 “No. Not me. Odette.” The focus of Bastian's attention shifted back to the bed. "She's got quite a temperature. Unfortunately, she is ill. Please inform the attending physician that the patient is unable to go to the hospital at this time; as a result, you would like to request that he make a house call.”

"Yes, master. As soon as Dr. Kramer gets to the office, I will get in touch with him." Lovis followed the order.

"And what happened then, I don't want my wife to find out."

 "So, if that's what you mean..." Lovis began speaking but got interrupted immediately. 

 "What you are thinking at this very moment is most likely accurate."  Bastian laughed off the situation as though it were unimportant.  Lovis was speechless because he appeared to be in a state of shock, as if he had just realized that someone had read his genuine intents.

 "But master, you have a dog…."

 "I don't despise it very much."  Before Lovis had even finished his protest, Bastian had already responded with composure to the question.  "… I just don't like it."  At the conclusion of a word that had been extravagantly appended, Bastian turned around.

"Understood, master. I shall comply," replied Lovis with a bow. Observing the stubborn figure retreating, Lovis stepped back as well. "I shall ensure that the servants remain silent," she added.

The morning brought with it a sense of foreboding, as the inconsiderate gossip of the maids appeared to be on the verge of materializing.





Chapter 62
Red and Blue








The unexpected arrival of the Belov diplomatic mission at the Ministry of the Navy caught everyone off guard. Initially, the plan was to proceed to the detached palace following a commemorative speech at the National Assembly. However, the Crown Prince's intense fascination with the nearby Admiralty prompted an impromptu change of plans.

Given that the emperor had already granted permission, there was no recourse but to acquiesce. Consequently, the Admiralty was compelled to declare a state of emergency comparable to that of a wartime scenario.

As the preparations for the state guest were finally completed, the ceremonial car carrying the Crown Prince of Belov arrived at the headquarters building. After exchanging greetings with the high-ranking generals, the Belovian Crown Prince approached Bastian, addressing him with a polite.

"Hello, Captain Klauswitz."

Bastian stood tall and proud as he extended his arm in a salute, acknowledging the presence of the Crown Prince of Belov. Without skipping a beat, he greeted the Prince with a formal handshake, his composure unwavering despite the unexpected encounter. 

"Your Highness, it is an honor to meet you," Bastian said with a deep, respectful bow.

The Crown Prince's greeting to Captain Klauswitz was unusually warm for a state guest and an officer, but nobody found it out of place. The Crown Prince's intentions in leading the delegation to Berg were no secret, and everyone knew what he wanted. To reinforce this, the Chief of Staff, upon learning of the surprise visit, immediately instructed that Captain Klauswitz be included in the delegation. It was a gesture of welcome and a gift to the Crown Prince from a friendly allied nation.

"I'm aware of your reputation as the hero who led the victory in the Battle of Trosa. Your efforts helped our camp gain control of the North Sea, making you a hero of Belov as well," expressed the Crown Prince with a wry smile, showing his satisfaction with the welcome gift. However, his gaze towards Bastian revealed a wariness that he couldn't hide.

Despite not officially taking issue with his fiancée's scandal, he still seemed to have lingering doubts that had not been resolved.

"I appreciate the compliment, but it seems a bit excessive. However, Berg's entire naval squadron earned that day's win." Bastian resumed the discussion in a humble manner.  After a few more words of formal praise, the crown prince revealed his actual goals as he spoke about the war.

"I'm engaged to Princess Isabelle, and you married her cousin."

Suddenly the Crown Prince brought up the topic of Bastian's marriage and its arrangements. 

 "Yes, Your Highness," Bastian replied.

"I was informed that the imperial family directly arranged your marriage. The Emperor of Berg, who upholds tradition, gave his sister's daughter to an officer without a title. It appears that Captain Klauswitz is highly regarded by him." The sharp glint in the Crown Prince's eyes suggested a clear suspicion, but Bastian remained unfazed.

"It's a reward for a soldier who's proven his worth on the battlefield, but I see it more as being a part of a noble reign that covers the era's quick transformation. Since he is responsible for my marriage to a lady of noble birth, I owe it to the empire and the royal family to be even more devoted to them."  Said Bastian

"The captain is indeed quite modest," remarked someone in the group.

"I am grateful for your kind words. As for my wife, she is not only beautiful but also wise. I consider myself fortunate to have her as the love of my life, and I have no desire to seek another." His words eased the tension in the room, and the relieved generals and officers showed it on their faces. However, none were happier than Admiral Demel, who had been pushing the idea of a love of a lifetime for Bastian.

"Will we have the opportunity to meet and greet each other in person at the naval festival? This makes me more and more curious about Mrs. Klauswitz," the Crown Prince said. 

"Of course, Your Highness. My wife will be accompanying me at the ceremony," said Bastian.

Crown Prince Belov passed Bastian after a polite greeting, expressing his anticipation for the naval festival. The delegation departed after a formal inspection of the Admiralty, which Bastian knew was the Crown Prince's way of trying to identify the person involved in Princess Isabelle's scandal.



As the storm passed, Bastian ate a late lunch in the dining room while the other officers grumbled.

And now that he'd gotten back to the office and wrapped up his papers, it was almost time for his workout.

Bastian changed into his workout clothes, ran a few laps around the Admiralty park as a warmup, and then headed to the gym.  When he was done with jumping rope and beginning to lift barbells, he ran into Erich Faber.

"Did Prince Belov speak to you? Did he bring up Princess Isabelle's scandal directly?" Erich approached Bastian with urgency and asked.

Bastian, though, chose to ignore the question and instead concentrate on his workout.  After the injury, he was still able to lift the same amount as before.  At this point, it was reasonable to presume that his health had fully recovered.

"I didn't think you would tell me anyway," Erich grumbled, but remained in place. "Oh, regarding the overseas assignment you're interested in, I think it might be possible next month. What do you think?"

During Bastian's workout, Erich, who was doing gymnastics, suddenly brought up a topic. Just as Bastian finished his set and put down the barbell, he turned to face Erich "When next month?"

"It will take place on the last weekend of the month.  You should be free to go as soon as you hand in your application now that the suitability test has been completed, and it will be effective immediately.  After the event, it appears that they will let you to leave as they promised." 

 "Are you sure?" Bastian asked

 "Admiral Demel signed it. I have no doubt about it." Erich gave a resolute nod to the question.

While Bastian regarded the warm sunlight that was coming in through the window, he dabbed his forehead with a towel that had been placed at the other end of the seat.

The section of the Admiralty that was in charge of personnel was Erich's responsibility.  At least with regard to matters of this nature, he was a trustworthy source of knowledge.

"Are you seriously going to do that?  Your supervisors would appreciate it if you could put in more hours at the headquarters.  In my perspective, it is of a higher quality. People are envious of it because they can't have it themselves.  It's a total loss."

“ If I don't go out the month after that.  When do you anticipate that it will be your turn again?" Bastian retorted

 "I don't know the exact date yet, but it will probably be over the course of the year." Erich put an end to the gymnastics moves he had been pretending to perform and folded his arms in a relaxed manner.

Bastian tossed the damp towel into the basket and looked up at the clock on the gym wall.  Time ticked 4:00.  It was about this time that Dr. Kramer was supposed to come to Ardenne

Odette became ill after spending time in the cold rain.  Her condition was officially labelled as aches all over her body and a high temperature.  Her body weakness, he stated, was to blame for the severity of her symptoms.

Bastian felt an odd discomfort after reading the note Dr. Kramer left during his first day at home.

Odette was in about the same shape physically as she had been while she was dealing with her baggage of a family. She was still quite pale and very frail. She had been living in such lavish comfort compared to when she had been bedridden that it defies logic that she would not have improved.  It made no sense at all.

Perhaps there wasn't a medical problem at all.

Bastian just last night had this unexpected curiosity.

 Odette's fever did not quickly subside despite the needles and medication she had received.  Because of the his sick wife, Bastian had a restless night as well. That's why he scheduled that extra appointment with Dr. Kramer. He couldn't fathom how feeling unwell could hurt so much.

"Are you going to delay it?" Interestedly, Erich questioned. "Or are you planning on going out?"

 Erich's irritation increased as the stillness lasted longer. Bastian got up and went to take a shower, leaving behind simply a cryptic grin this time.

 "Anyway, you unlucky bastard." The gym resounded with Erich's enraged cry.



"Madam's condition has greatly improved since this morning." After a brief round of greetings, Lovis got right to the meat of the matter.  Bastian gave the door a quick glance before walking in on his own.

“Now that the fever has subsided, the tonsil swelling should decrease. Also, she munched on some food. " Lovis informed.

"What does Dr. Kramer think?" As Bastian reached the top of the final flight of stairs to the third level, he finally spoke up.

"He stated that if she gets some sleep and eats well, she should feel better over time.” Lovis quickly responded with the planned response.  Bastian, who had been quiet for a while, seemed to agree by nodding his head.

“The same can be said for Margrethe." Lovis disclosed his final liaison as they approached the hostess' bedroom.  Bastian came to a halt and stared at him sternly.

“Margrethe?”

"Ah yes.  The dog belongs to the madam.  Madam named it herself today.  Margrethe is currently in the care of the lady's maid. " Lovis's explanation prompted deeper furrows between Bastian's brows.  When Lovis's nerves started to kick in, Bastian started laughing.

 “Margrethe.”  Bastian repeated the name with a happy chuckle.  "Yes, I get it.  I appreciate your hard work."

Bastian turned around to look at Lovis once more with a trace of a smile on his face. Lovis looked at him in silence for a moment before taking a few steps back without uttering a word. The housekeepers who had followed behind were likewise dispatched.  It would appear that assistance was not what he required at this time.  Even Margrethe, who had been washed and dressed, was elevated to the following rank after being promoted.

Bastian removed the officer's cap from his head before walking up to the door of the hostess' bedroom and opening it without knocking.  The sound of someone walking through the threshold was immediately followed by the sound of the door closing once more.

 Lovis hastened her exit as she exited the corridor in front of the bedroom and began walking away.  The sunset had already given the mansion a muted tint, which added to its opulence.



The moonlight shone through the window, casting a soft glow on Odette's peaceful face. She was lost in a dream world, where anything was possible. The gentle rise and fall of her chest was the only indication that she was alive. The room was silent, except for the occasional rustle of the curtains in the breeze. 

As Bastian stepped out onto the balcony, the salty sea air hit his face. He gazed out at the endless expanse of water, the waves crashing against the shore in a soothing rhythm. He listened intently, and as he heard the sound of her breathing becoming more relaxed, he knew she was finally asleep. He took a deep breath and closed his eyes, feeling the cool breeze on his skin. 

As she lay in bed, the soothing melody of the ocean's waves drifted through the open windows. The salty breeze carried the sound of seagulls and the distant hum of boats, lulling her into a peaceful slumber.

 Bastian cautiously shut the window, his heart pounding with anticipation. He turned around, his eyes fixated on the bed.  The moonlight filtered through the sheer curtains, casting a soft glow over the grand four-poster bed.

Bastian kept his grip on the hem of the curtain as he looked through it to see Odette's silhouette beyond. It appeared as though he could hold out till the dusk was over. Even if it did, the chaos wouldn't endure for very long.

 "Bastian… ?"

When he was on the verge of releasing his grip on the drapes, he suddenly became aware of someone softly whispering his name.  Odette, who had just recently come to, spoke with a voice that carried with it a hint of sleepiness.

Unconsciously, Bastian held his breath as he strained to get a firmer grip on the drapes.  Odette carefully raised herself up while hiding her face in the shade cast by the moving lace.  

The surroundings went back to being calm as the sound of her long, flowing hair brushing against the bedding was no longer heard.

 Bastian pulled back the drapes that he had been unable to let go of for what seemed like an eternity as the sun continued to set.

In the dim light, Odette's smile revealed a hint of mischief.

The sky was painted in a beautiful blend of red and blue

She tossed and turned, her long hair brushing against the sheets. Eventually, the sound of her hair grazing the bedding ceased.

Chapter 63
A New Beginning








Odette's constant companion was Margrethe, who mirrored her every move like a shadow.

Even when she was preoccupied with other tasks, Margrethe never wavered in her attentive gaze. Whenever Odette felt a sudden glance and looked down, Margrethe was there, unwavering in her devotion. Presently, Margrethe sat at her feet, gazing up at Odette with eyes full of affection and trust, as if Odette was her entire universe.

Odette paused her sewing and set down her needle, a gentle smile playing on her lips. Margrethe, brimming with excitement, bounced around and wagged her tail fervently, eagerly seeking a warm embrace.

 "Patience, Margrethe," Odette chided the exuberant pup before returning to her work on the ribbon. However, the puppy's whimpers and persistent scratching at her legs distracted her. "I'm sorry, Margrethe. I'll finish this quickly." With the sewing put away, Odette scooped up the sulking dog and cradled her in her lap.

As soon as Odette took Margrethe into her lap, the puppy's mood lifted and she showered her with innocent affection, radiating energy despite her small stature. 

In the warm afternoon sunlight, the playful antics of the pup elicited a joyful laugh from Odette that reverberated through the air. As Margrethe's enthusiastic face-licking finally subsided, Odette picked up the ribbon that lay forgotten on the table. It had been intended to tame the dog's unruly hair, but Odette had struggled with it.

Her attempt to cut Margrethe's knotted hair resulted in the creation of the ribbon as a result of her failure. After giving it some thought, she came to the conclusion that the best way to repurpose it would be to put it around the dog's neck. The bright pink ribbon, which was embroidered with dainty floral motifs, was the ideal accessory to go with the snow-white fur that Margrethe wore.

Odette felt a sense of relief as she looked at Margrethe, who was now wearing the ribbon, and realized that she had found a family in this opulent mansion.

In a situation like this, expanding the family would not be the best idea, but it certainly wouldn't be impossible to manage even one of these itty-bitty puppies. She had made a decision, and it was now up to her to put out some effort.

Once she had fashioned the ribbon to perfection, Odette planted a gentle kiss on the tip of Margrethe's panting nose, a gesture she often reserved for the pampered Tira. As she looked at the happy-go-lucky pup, it occurred to her that they shared a similar cheerful disposition.

Carrying the now yawning Margrethe in her arms, Odette made her way to the window. In the warm sunlight, she noticed a frilled cushion and a willow basket adorned with lace. It was a cot that she had crafted with her own hands.

Odette walked to her desk after putting Margrethe down, who had already started to nod off, and began the tasks she needed to complete for the day.  She ended her assessment of the catalogue of guest furnishings that the decorator had mailed to her after she had finished responding to the letters and invitations that were addressed to Mrs. Klauswitz.  

The ultimate selection was a true reflection of Sandrine's refined taste, as she was to be the true mistress of the mansion. Every ornament, including the artworks, had been chosen according to the same high standards. It was at this moment, as the final letter was being sealed, that a maid arrived.

"Master informed me that he plans to head back home after attending a party hosted by the corporation. An employee of the facility called earlier." Dora frantically tacked on a message as she hurriedly turned around with the mail that needed to be dispatched.

 "Thank you very much for informing me, Dora.  Then, put together a straightforward dinner." Odette asked for something with a gentle smile on her face.  The maid's lips, which had previously been rigid, curved into an arc as well.

 "Yes, madam.  I will keep you informed." Dora walked out of the study with a smile on her face after offering a kind greeting. On her way out, she took one last look at the contentedly sleeping puppy.

Odette took a seat and turned her attention to the window on the other side of the room. She watched as the sea, which was an increasingly deep aqua color, shimmered and sparkled in the stillness.

It felt like time passed in a flash, and before she realized it, fall had arrived. This marked the end of yet another season that had passed since the wedding. It was only a matter of time before summer arrived, what with the recent snowfall and the blossoming of flowers, but at this rate, another year would have passed, bringing an end to her marriage.

Grasping the enormity of the situation, Odette was aware that it was time to begin making plans for her life once the contract had expired.

Having reached a decision, Odette swiftly unfurled a blank sheet of paper on the desk and grabbed hold of a pen.

Her first order of business was to jot down the names of her beloved family members, Tira and Margrethe, whom she would be responsible for. Though Odette had envisioned a quiet life in a small town, she was willing to compromise if it meant satisfying Tira's preferences. After all, the idea of starting afresh on a new continent where no one knew them didn't seem all that bad.

The next item on the list was finding a suitable house for their new life.

To her surprise, the problem that had been eating away at her for years turned out to have the simplest solution. Bastian's promised financial support was enough to secure a small house for their family.

However, living expenses were still a concern, so Odette straightened her pen and jotted down the next task on her list - finding a source of income. She considered tutoring as a possibility and added a small note next to it, recalling the time when she had seriously considered this job in the past.

While there would be interest income from the deposited money, Odette knew it would be unwise to rely solely on that. She considered teaching piano lessons as a potential source of income if she could regain her former skills. However, she knew she would need to approach it with a much more serious mindset than she had currently.

With these thoughts in mind, Odette took her time to carefully prepare a budget and a plan of action for various scenarios.

Odette felt a sense of relief knowing that she could finally live a peaceful life with her family. She wondered if they could afford to buy a piano for their new home. As she was about to set down her pen, she noticed her wedding ring and realized that at least this one belonged to her.

 Sandrine wouldn't want Bastian's ex-wife's ring, right?

Staring at the platinum and diamond ring, Odette jotted down a quick note in the corner of her plan. "One piano for the new house," she wrote. All that was left was to practice, practice diligently to regain her piano skills.



The study was devoid of Odette's presence.

 Bastian ambled across the room, basking in the bright autumnal light that flooded in through the open windows. He propped himself against the windowsill, eagerly anticipating his wife's arrival. However, after several minutes elapsed, the silence continued to pervade the room. Bastian then realized that he hadn't even noticed the frilled cushion or willow basket for Odette's cherished dog.

Odette was gone. 

Bastian sat up straight, having come to a decision. Was this the price he had to pay for not being the center of attention at the party and returning home early?

He let out a disappointed laugh, sighing deeply. It was the day when the Berg Railways King dethroned the previous ruler.

Bastian eventually won the right to build an inland railway that would connect the south and north. This outcome was expected, but his father couldn't accept the defeat easily. Witnessing his father's loud screams at the presentation venue, it was clear that the loss was a huge shock to him, causing him to forget the dignity of Klauswitz, a man who treated everything as if it were his life. It was regrettable.

Jeff Klauswitz had not lost his tenacity to recover from the loss. Fortunately, it appeared that Bastian's father was taking the bait that Bastian had carefully laid out, so it was time to begin the next phase. Although it would be ideal if his father sold his shipping stock, investments in steel and shipbuilding were also acceptable.

I hope you can secure the investment capital for your new business at the earliest, Bastian sincerely wished his father who was nearly cursing. The company was probably hosting a big celebratory event by now, but Bastian had decided not to attend after leaving the presentation room. As he gazed up at the crisp autumn sky, one of the executives mentioned that it was a good hunting season, which made him think of Odette and the pitiful weapon she had carried.

As he imagined Odette's past, walking the streets at night with only an old pocket knife for protection, he couldn't help but laugh. It seemed even more ridiculous when he considered the small town she had grown up in. Nonetheless, it was fortunate that she had been able to defend herself so effectively.

Bastian had already politely declined the invitation by the time he reached the thought of taking a break, and his request for understanding was met without objection. This understanding was a welcome gesture, much like a walkway in the garden or in front of the piano in the solarium, gifted by a father who had previously been driven to a violent rampage against his own son.

As Bastian moved forward, he recalled where Odette might be at that particular time. However, something caught his attention as he walked past the desk. Unorganized papers and pens were scattered in a way that was unusual for the normally organized Odette, which piqued Bastian's interest and drew him closer to investigate. At the top of one of the papers, amidst various scribbles, he noticed a grandiose title written in large letters: "New Beginning."

Bastian took a seat on the edge of the desk and opened the paper. As he examined the plans, he realized that his perception of Odette being only cute and unorganized needed to be revised. The plans were intricately detailed, clear, and remarkably realistic. They depicted either the periphery of the empire or a new continent, both of which were fascinating prospects.

After her marriage ended in divorce, Odette decided to go in two distinct routes with the rest of her life.  There was no trace of Bastian's name wherever to be located.  It was about the compensation that was overdue to be paid if he had to search for even the slightest trace of him.  Bastian abruptly moved his attention to the number that was located next to it and then burst out laughing.

Compensation.

The numbers that were written side by side looked even sloppier due to the tidy handwriting that had been written with strength. 

The true greed that was concealed made the calligraphy look stronger. It appeared as though she had computed the amount of money she would receive as a result of the transaction; nevertheless, she had included a downward arrow to show that she was unsure of the amount. It seems as though she believed that this was the utmost sum that could be paid in alimony.

"The price is much lower than it appears to be." With a wry smirk on his face, Bastian replaced the paper in its original position.

 Odette was completely emotionally detached from her marriage at this point.

 Bastian experienced some dissatisfaction after seeing it with his own eyes for the first time. It was he who made the statement to her that she was merely his employee.

It appeared as though Odette, who was obediently following that order, was behaving in such a disobedient manner because her dreams were too insignificant.

 Mrs. Klauswitz, who was no more than a tutor in her capacity.

Bastian found it difficult to comprehend the woman's excessive and boastful pride, particularly her eagerness to take care of her step-sister, who seemed more like a burden than a family member, as well as the stray dog she had recently adopted.

 However, in some ways, Bastian felt that Odette and his grandfather, had he still been alive, would have gotten along well. Despite this, he believed that his grandfather's old-fashioned values would have left him aghast at Odette's heartless determination to sell even her wedding ring, leaving him trailing behind. This train of thought led Bastian to the piano in the solarium.

Bastian, who was convinced that he knew where Odette was, hurriedly exited the cramped room.  After winding his way through a lengthy corridor and turning a corner, he finally located the source of the piano's muffled sound.

Bastian started to take strides forward once he picked up on the rhythm of that ambition.


Chapter 64
Don't Close Your Eyes








The resonance of the final note was met with an outpouring of applause.

Odette was startled by the sound and immediately turned her head in the other direction from where she had just come. Bastian was clapping his hands while resting against the entryway of the room.

“Bastian?” As quickly as she could, Odette jumped to her feet in front of the piano. Bastian put an end to his applauding and proceeded to make his way slowly across the solarium.

"It was a wonderful performance, and I meant every word, madam." Bastian, who was standing with his hands clasped behind his back, bent his head respectfully. In contrast to that elegant move, the look in his eyes revealed a perverted sense of playfulness.

"… Thank you." 

Odette, who was aware that he was being teased, began by greeting him in the proper manner. Her friendly, wifely smile with which she greeted her husband was also present. "There had to have been a misunderstanding of the news. I've heard that you won't be able to avoid arriving late at your house."

"The work was finished much more quickly than was anticipated." Bastian said. The response he provided was delivered in a monotone. Soon after, his gaze returned to Odette after passing over the piano.

"ah… …I see. Okay, that settles it." 

Odette did what was only natural and turned around, concealing the music sheet that was laid out on the music stand.

It was a book of exercises designed to help one improve their performing technique.

While Odette was being spanked by her mother, she was able to memorize the book completely; nevertheless, because she hadn't played in such a long time, her hands became stiff.

 Now, she was struggling to keep up with the material at the intermediate level, especially in the last exercise that Bastian praised, where she made a lot of mistakes. Regardless of how poor Bastian's musical taste was, he was not someone who could sincerely appreciate such a performance. He was a gentleman and anyone could agree on that, who was always courteous, even when he was being the most inconsiderate.

"Please forgive my rudeness in not greeting you earlier, as I wasn't aware of your presence. In the future, please do let me know beforehand," said Odette  apologetically to Bastian, who smiled kindly and graciously accepted his apology.

Bastian gazed down at Odette's face, and a slight smirk formed at the corners of his lips, "Let you know?" His response indicated his reluctance to comply. However, Odette's smile remained cool and impassive, like an unyielding wall.

Bastian had come to the realization that Odette had not truly opened up to him, but had simply altered the way in which she expressed her caution and reluctance towards him. Despite dedicating herself to his wife's work, Odette remained a polite yet distant stranger to him. Bastian accepted this fact without any hesitation and drew a more definitive conclusion from it.

With a sense of wonder, Bastian realized that Odette was a woman who could show affection without truly having a heart. This revelation left him with the understanding that there was no logical reason for him to try to win her over emotionally. 

Despite this realization, Bastian still felt a strong attraction towards her, which he acknowledged with a sense of longing. As he faced this desire that remained after the initial confusion had dissipated, Bastian hoped that Odette would remain the same as she had been yesterday, in his present reality.

Bastian longed for Odette to remain by his side just like she had been yesterday, when their relationship had been filled with sweet lies and everything had felt perfect. He wished for their present to be just like that.

 As he slowly tilted his head to meet her gaze, he couldn't help but feel a sense of embarrassment. However, Odette didn't look away, her stunning turquoise eyes fixed on him, yet seemingly devoid of any emotional attachment. And yet, despite this, Bastian found her gaze to be beautiful enough, even without her heart.

"Let's go, Odette." Bastian straightened his neck and commanded Odette to get ready.,However, when he caught sight of the dress she was wearing, decorated with rich lace and frills, he narrowed his eyes and expressed his concern, "I think that outfit would be a bit difficult."

“Tell me what is going on..." Odette asked.

But Bastian didn't waste any time in explaining and demanded without hesitation, "Change into comfortable clothes. Riding clothes would be enough."

Bastian felt a rush of excitement as he realized that he had complete control over the marriage, regardless of Odette's feelings or thoughts. He reveled in the power that came with that knowledge, and suddenly the relationship felt weightless and streamlined. The thought that he held all the cards made him feel alive and invigorated. Everything was just as it should be.

In a strange way, Bastian found solace in the fact that Odette was indifferent. If he couldn't win her over, he couldn't lose her either. To him, she was just a figure on a contract. It was a life that Bastian had grown accustomed to, one where everything was quantified and calculated.

The more straightforward the other person's requests, the smoother the relationship flowed. If it was within his means to fulfill those requests and there was something to be gained in return, then he simply had to fulfill them. By viewing each day through this clear and simple calculation, eventually he would be confronted with the outcome that time brings.

"I'm sure you don't plan to bring that dog along," Bastian said, his gaze half-turned. But then his attention was drawn to Odette's feet as the dog approached and looked up at him with bold eyes, just like its owner.

“Her name is Margrethe.” Odette introduced the dog she had picked up as if she were a lady debuting in society.

Bastian couldn't help but chuckle when he heard the dog's grandiose name. Although the dog's appearance had improved from when it was first found, the uneven haircut gave it a scruffy look. And to top it off, the lace ribbon around its neck made the dog appear even more ridiculous.

"You may refer to her as Meg." Odette, who had a soft spot in her heart for the puppy, proposed an alternate.

"Odette, please put the dog away." That was the only response that Bastian was able to provide.

As he turned around, the dog began to bark from behind him.



In an instant, a shooting range was set up at the border of the garden and the beach, with a bale of hay serving as the target.

As Odette gazed at it in amazement, servants moved the target to the spot designated by Bastian, and then brought out an assortment of firearms - pistols, shotguns, and rifles - in various shapes and sizes, filling up the large outdoor table with a burst of color.

"Master, do you also need the guns that are in the warehouse?" When it appeared that there were no more spaces available, Lovis shocked everyone by asking an unexpected question.

"I believe that is all there will be time for. I appreciate all of your hard work. "After turning down the offer of assistance from the servants, Bastian walked up to the table and examined the weapons that were being displayed there. Even his casual attire of tennis shorts and a tennis jumper were not enough to lighten his normally stern demeanor.

“Have you ever tried shooting before?” Bastian set down the rifle he had been inspecting and calmly asked. His eyes still flickering over the gleaming gun barrels.

 "No, I don't think I'll ever have the chance to use a gun in the future."  Odette responded with a tactful refusal.

Picking up two small rifles, Bastian stood up and let out a sorrowful smile,  "What? I think you're mistaken." 

“Why I have to shoot?”

 "It's perfect weather for shooting. We may not have another opportunity like this anytime soon." He then gestured for Odette to come closer, holding a gun in both hands and tilting his chin.

Odette had to repeat a calming mantra to herself several times before she could rein in the hot emotions that had risen up to the tip of her throat. Bastian was always opinionated, but today he had gone too far. Odette couldn't even begin to guess what his intentions were, and so she resolved to keep her guard up and avoid any unnecessary clashes. "Let's just steer clear of each other," she muttered to herself.

Odette reluctantly complied with Bastian's request, even though she found it to be unreasonable. However, she knew that she needed to complete this transaction if she wanted to receive the new life that Bastian had promised her. As she approached him, Bastian measured her height against the length of the barrel and selected a rifle with a walnut stock adorned with intricate gold work.

"It is possible that it is out of date, but it will be ideal for practice. Listen.” Bastian, having deftly loaded his bullets, turned back and faced his adversary. He handed the revolver that he was holding out to Odette. "Is it heavy?"  

"A little bit heavy."

"Better." After receiving a nod, Bastian moved to stand next to Odette while holding the handgun.

Bastian went over the anatomy of the weapon, naming each component and walking through the steps of firing it. He did not exhibit any hint of frustration even when Odette, who did not comprehend completely, asked the same question multiple times. The voice of Bastian, who patiently instructed her over and over again, was as tranquil as the sea, which did not have any waves today.

Bastian beckoned to Odette to pay attention,, "Observe carefully. While a gun may not guarantee protection in all situations, it's still a more dependable choice than a pocket knife." He then picked up a gun and positioned himself in front of the target.

Odette's lackluster gaze suddenly widened, "Could it be that...this is all because of that?" The memory of the rainy night when they buried the deceased mother dog and Bastian's amusement at the sight of a dropped bag and pocket knife began to make sense, fitting together like a puzzle.

"Did you remember?" Odette asked back in disbelief. Bastian gave the target another look while he arched his eyebrow ever-so-slightly but remained silent.

Why?

The stillness that had been present in Odette's eyes gave way to a trembling appearance.

It wasn't until around the time that she started moving around towns on the outskirts in search of a cheap leased property that she came into possession of the knife.

 The communities on the outskirts had weak security. Odette was still a child, but she had some understanding of the meaning behind the nasty jokes and the look in the eyes of the bad lads. In the worst case scenario, what type of danger would she face in the future?

The day that Odette found a pocket knife that had been stashed away at the back of a drawer was the same day that she had the epiphany that her hapless father, who drank every day, would never be able to safeguard her or her sister, Tira. It was more like an amulet harboring a ferocious will than it was a weapon that could be used in the real world.

At the precise moment when she was beginning to get a little frustrated about the fact that the only person who recognized it was that man, Bastian levelled his rifle. The well-balanced posture, the way the pistol is held, and even the way the look is directed are all important aspects. It was just how he had described it.

The moment she realized that that man was a capable soldier, a gunshot rang out. Odette let out a small scream involuntarily and took a step back from him. Bang! Bastian's bullet went right through the center of the target.

Bastian approached with a light smile, holding out his gun, "Take it. Now it's your turn." 

"You shoot very well." Odette, feeling a bit embarrassed, awkwardly complimented him.

Bastian smiled again and proceeded to correct Odette's posture as she accepted the rifle, "Spread your feet a little more. Keep your back up and make sure your shoulders are down." 

"Like this?" Odette attempted to adjust her posture.

“No, not like that, Odette.” However, Bastian wasn't satisfied and let out a soft sigh as he observed Odette's awkward stance, which resembled that of a broken soldier's doll.

"Scared?"

"Not at all."  Odette confidently replied, but her stiff body and trembling fingertips betrayed her true emotions, making it apparent that she wasn't very effective at lying.

Realizing that giving more advice was pointless, Bastian walked towards her from behind. As he pressed his chest against her back, their arms and legs were aligned in one straight line. Together, they formed two overlapping shadows of different sizes, holding a gun in unison.

"Look ahead." Bastian gave a quiet order to Odette, who kept looking back. He then instructed her to raise her head. As he lifted her chin, his hand wrapped around Odette's cold hand, which was holding the gun barrel.

"Inhale slowly, and now exhale."  Bastian slowed his breathing and suggested a suitable pace. Eventually, he synchronized his breathing, and Odette's tension had eased considerably by the time he did so.

Bastian pointed the gun and aimed it at the target, "Are you ready?" 

"Perhaps.” Her voice no longer trembled as she replied.”.... By the way, Bastian." Once the preparations were complete, Odette urgently called out his name., "Is there anything else I need to know?" 

Bastian noticed Odette's hand was slightly out of shape and corrected it. He then gazed at the target in the sunlight with narrowed eyes, "Well, don't close your eyes."

Their fingers, which held the trigger together, were filled with strength.

 "Perfect!  Exactly!" 

BANG! 

As they followed the final advice, gunshots echoed in the air, marking the first gunfire of Odette's life.


Chapter 65
The Greatest Jewel of My Life








‘I won’t die alone like this.’

Duke Dyssen concluded his lengthy letter with a resolute conviction, steeling his heart which had briefly faltered. This final missive was written with an unwavering rationality, surpassing all previous attempts.

As he set aside the capped pen, Duke Dyssen shifted his gaze towards the vista beyond the window. The once lush and verdant forest had transformed into a dazzling array of autumnal hues, awash with shades of crimson and scarlet.

On a vibrant spring day, when the flowers were in full bloom, he arrived at the hospital and remained incarcerated for three successive seasons.

"You're free to languish in this hospital room like a lifeless body until your dying breath," Duke Dyssen snarled, before summoning his caretaker with a sharp jingle of the bell.

Despite granting Odette ample time and opportunity, all that returned was a deafening silence, prompting him to relinquish his paternal role. For it was Odette who had severed the bond between parent and child.

At the thought of the immense riches possessed by the despicable man who had taken Odette, Duke Dyssen felt a searing inferno erupt from the depths of his being. To think that even with such vast wealth at his disposal, he had the audacity to believe that paying a mere hospital bill would absolve him of his heinous crime... it was an unfathomable outrage.

"Duke, you summoned me?" the caretaker's voice roused Duke Dyssen from his furious reverie.

He was about to lose patience when the carer showed up.  Duke Dyssen, who had just developed a serious case of laziness, scowled and tossed the weighty letter over the edge of the bed.

 "Send this letter as soon as you can, please."

Duke Dyssen issued a pressing command, sinking back into the plush pillow that supported his aching back. Despite the impossibility of fully healing his ailing body, he was determined to secure better treatment for himself.

By setting forth explicit demands and the dire consequences that would ensue if they were disregarded, he was certain that Odette would not dare to ignore his letter. His first course of action would be to ensure that Tira, the girl who was no different from a murderer, was apprehended and imprisoned.

As he stilled his mind with breathtaking imagery, the hesitant caregiver gingerly retrieved the letter.

The caregiver examined the envelope and spoke softly, "This appears to be a letter addressed to your daughter. Is she the one who married into the Klauswitz family?"

Duke Dyssen bellowed at the caregiver for overstepping their bounds, admonishing them to follow his instructions without question. The woman pursed her lips, took hold of the letter, and exited the room.

With a glimmer of hope in his eyes, Duke Dyssen gazed up at the clear blue sky. I just need to get out of here.

The townhouse he had spotted earlier that day held promise as a suitable abode, provided there were sufficient servants to attend to his needs. Despite Odette's treacherous betrayal, he still held a faint hope for her – after all, she was a remnant of the foolish love he had once felt, the greatest jewel of his life.



As each shot was fired, the bullet mark gradually edged closer to the center of the target.

Odette beamed with delight, turning to face Bastian who was standing behind her. "I'm doing much better this time," she exclaimed with a flushed face, her expression radiating with happiness.

Rather than telling them that it was time to wrap up their practice, Bastian offered a polite smile. As they continued to shoot, the western sky began to shift into a reddish hue, signaling that it was time to end their session.

"Take some rest," Bastian ordered curtly before turning to attend to his own tasks. He carefully set down the pistol on the table and picked up his rifle, loading it with practiced ease. As he worked, a new target was swapped out to replace the honeycombed one from their previous rounds.

After experimenting with various firearms, it appeared that the rifle was the most suitable one for Odette's skills. While it wouldn't be fair to say that she lacked talent, she could improve significantly with more training to strengthen the necessary shooting muscles.

Bastian, who had finished reloading his rifle, stood in front of the target again. Odette, who was sitting in a chair and rubbing her aching arm, hurried back to her husband.

Bastian approached her from behind and turned over his rifle before adjusting her posture as before. He squeezed his massive, muscular body against hers, and she was overcome by a sense of hopeless strain.

"You have a talent for teaching, just as well as your shooting skills," Odette said to Bastian. Her heart was racing, and she tried to ease the tension with an awkward compliment. She realized too late that it might have been silly, but thankfully, Bastian laughed and saved her from further embarrassment.

"I'm delighted." Her ear was touched by Bastian's quiet whisper.

The scent of the man standing behind her became more discernible as the nighttime wind grew chillier.

By focusing on her shot, Odette was able to block out her distractions.  As instructed, she took her position, pointed her gun, and released the trigger. She recalled to keep her eyes open till the very end.

 After inspecting the target, Bastian gave instructions, "Just a bit more to the left, please." As he spoke, Odette adjusted her posture and nodded.

"By the way, Bastian, why did you choose the Navy?" Odette caught her breath before asking Bastian a question. 

Bastian lowered his eyes slightly and looked at Odette in his arms. 

"Well, I've seen comments about you fighting like an army. You're also considered the best polo player and have excellent shooting skills, so I think you would have done well in the army. Do you have a particular reason for choosing the Navy?"

 “Ah. That.” Bastian chuckled like it was no big deal.

Conservatives in the Admiralty who opposed the shipboard hand-to-hand fighting at the Battle of Trosa advanced that line of reasoning.  The naval way of fighting was not hand-to-hand with knives and guns.  The absurd argument would typically come to a sarcastic conclusion with the statement, "If that's the case, why didn't you join the army?"  It was an aristocratic curse that suggested they were well aware of the real reason he joined the navy.

It didn't really matter if he was the grandchild of a junk trader or not; his grandfather, who felt bad about passing the label, chose to become an officer for him. He only became a navy officer because it was simpler to advance in life in this way.  A commander without a title at the time did not sit well with the aristocratic and traditional army.  He was able to advance to a position where he could reassure his grandfather because to the relatively open nature of the navy.

Choosing the bigger fish was a must.  It didn’t matter who were willing to do the hard work anyway. The opinions of the aristocrats, who saw pragmatic choices as dishonorable, didn’t matter. Bastian's idea of honor was not the same as theirs. He believed that fighting valiantly in a naval battle and being laid to rest with his battleships was worthy of respect, but he had yet to witness such a precedent.

“Bastian?” 

Odette’s voice broke the silence. Bastian, lost in his thoughts, looked at her with innocent curiosity. “I liked the clothes,” he answered with a silly remark. The peaceful moment had been long-awaited, and perhaps a bland joke was worth more than an unnecessary truth.

“Clothes?” Odette frowned and asked, puzzled.

Bastian responded nonchalantly, pointing at the target with his gaze. "I just prefer the navy uniform," he said.

 Odette, who had been looking at him with a blank expression, chuckled softly and turned her head. "I agree. The navy uniform suits you much better," she said, and her gentle laughter resonated through his body. It didn't take long for Bastian to join in and laugh along with her, feeling the ripples of joy spreading through his heart.

As the laughter died down, the sunset's glow intensified. Bastian resumed his role as the skilled instructor when Odette readied her gun again after regaining her composure. Three shots were fired in quick succession.

Odette had now mastered handling the gun's recoil without Bastian's assistance. Her previously unstable firing posture was also almost entirely corrected.

Bastian released his grip on Odette, and without needing to say anything more, she understood the message.

Bastian stepped back a few paces and lit a cigarette, while Odette caught her breath and meticulously readied herself for the next round of shooting. Her form-fitting riding clothes accentuated her svelte figure. As Bastian took a drag from his cigarette, Odette fired off her shots, one after another, without shutting her eyes. Bastian followed suit, keeping his gaze open.

Odette smiled broadly as she turned away from the target.  The muzzle of the rifle still emitted a wispy trail of smoke after it had stopped firing.  There was no need for any extra recognition.  Odette beamed with satisfaction, knowing full well that she had done well.

Bastian exhaled a cloud of smoke and cracked a grin.

Bastian turned to face Odette, taking another deep breath of smoke as he looked at her. "Have you ever thought about enlisting?" he asked. "You're skilled with guns and can dig well. I believe you'd be a valuable asset."

Odette put down her gun and joked with a smile, "Will I be able to command a naval fleet?" Her fine hair fluttered softly in the direction of the wind, flowing along her forehead and neck.

Bastian shrugged his shoulders and tossed the burning cigarette between his fingers into the ashtray,  "That's up to you."

Odette grasped his hand when he extended it to her. 

Slowly, Bastian made his way through the rosy garden.  There were servants beginning to tidy up, and the sound of gently lapping waves could be heard in the distance.

As soon as they entered the mansion, the butler delivered unexpected news. "Countess Lenart is on the line. She mentioned that her father, Duke Laviere, left a message for you, sir. It's related to the railroad company, and she says it's important." Lovis explained with impatience, which was unusual for him. Sandrine seemed to have done a good job with her performance.

"Go ahead." said Odette.  Bastian averted his calm glance from his devoted wife.

 “Bastian. Countess Lenart is holding court."  Odette released Bastian's grip.  Despite the obviousness of Sandrine's motivation, she grinned in knowing understanding.

"It's Dora!  It works out perfectly. The topic of the dinner menu was just what I needed to bring up again."

Odette left Bastian without a sideways glance as the maid emerged in the west corridor. That expression belonged to a flawless hostess who had absolutely no reservations.

Bastian was brought back to the present by Lovis's impatient voice, "Okay, let's go." Hastening his steps, he climbed the stairs, conscious of the time delay. His priority should be Sandrine, even over his wife Odette.




Chapter 66
A Step Back








Maria Gross looked up in surprise. She quickly adjusted the fabric sample she had almost dropped, her knuckles turning white as she gripped it tightly.

"You have a dog?" she exclaimed.

Odette smiled, "Yes, Mrs. Gross. It's a cute little puppy. I'll be sure to show you next time you visit the mansion." She then placed her teacup back on the saucer after taking a sip.

Maria seemed surprised by the news, indicating that she had no prior knowledge of it.

"Can you believe it? Bastian Klauswitz has a dog!" Maria chuckled and leaned back on the sofa.

She glanced around absentmindedly, only turning back to Odette after a moment of gathering her thoughts. The peaceful chatter and laughter of the other guests floated through the calm atmosphere of the boutique.

Maria was left in awe of Bastian's excessive generosity towards his wife. She used to think that such a thing was impossible, but now she was convinced beyond doubt. This was further exemplified when he called Sabine boutique himself and requested a reservation, explaining that he wanted to purchase winter clothes for Odette.

 He even went as far as to mention that she was prone to feeling cold, and he wanted her to have a warm coat. Maria couldn't believe it; if Bastian hadn't called directly, she would have thought it was a scam orchestrated by someone pretending to be her nephew.

As Maria gazed at Odette, a perplexed and worried expression crept onto her face, unable to conceal it. She had never thought that Bastian would fall for Odette's charms, and she couldn't believe it had happened.

His unrestrained behavior was somewhat embarrassing to Maria. She was unaware of Odette's irresistible beauty, but Bastian's lack of restraint was unexpected. Just as Maria began to suspect that Bastian's behavior might be part of a plan, Sandrine arrived at the scene.

Sandrine greeted the socialites in the guest parlor before inquiring about Maria Gross. After the clerk informed her that Maria was occupied with a guest, Sandrine proceeded to greet Maria and Odette with a warm and friendly smile, “Hello, Mrs. Gross! I see Odette is also with you.” showing no signs of hostility towards Odette.

With her lively greeting, Sandrine caught the attention of those around her, proudly displaying her camaraderie. To anyone unaware of the situation, their bond would appear genuine. Despite their dislike for her, they couldn't deny her usefulness as Bastian's wife, much like how Jeff Klauswitz's wife, Theodora, had proven to be valuable.

"I'm prepared. Mrs. Gross."  The clerk, who had been observing the event, followed with caution.

“Don’t worry, I'll be Odette's companion." Sandrine sat down next to Odette as though she had been waiting. "Since our likes are so similar, we get along well. Odette, do we not?"

Sandrine maintained her innocent smile, even as she pushed Odette's boundaries. Odette, who was still fixated on Sandrine, managed to muster a slight smile in response. It was a strange reaction for someone in her position, as if she were a prey facing a snake ready to strike. 

Was she too naive or simply indifferent?

 Like her husband, Odette was adept at concealing her true emotions, making her seem almost childlike in her naivety.

"I understand. Well, have a pleasant conversation," Maria Gross said as she surrendered, caught between Bastian's two women. She felt a twinge of sympathy for Odette, but at this point, it was better for Sandrine to take charge, lest Bastian's carefully crafted plans be ruined by his fake wife, who clung to her only hopes.

She also came to the conclusion that it would be best for Odette if she didn't realize that Bastian's favor was inappropriate.

 What would it signify even if it were love?

No matter how sincere Bastian was, the outcome would remain the same.



"So, I heard Bastian is getting you some winter clothes. That's a hot topic among socialites these days, along with the new hat shop and the well-received opera."

Sandrine's enthusiastic chatter eventually revealed her ulterior motives.

This time, Odette responded with a polite smile, as it seemed to be the most suitable approach based on her past experiences. Sandrine tended to dominate conversations and didn't place much value on the other person's input, particularly when talking to Odette.

Sandrine, with a sharp eye, examined Odette's belly, "Are you sure the dress doesn't need any size adjustments?" It was an obvious provocation.

Sandrine frowned dramatically as Odette raised her gaze and looked at her. "Oh, my god. You scared me," she exclaimed. Then, she continued, "I'm concerned. It would be unfortunate if the clothes don't fit you properly. As you know, getting a reservation at Sabine is difficult, and after Bastian leaves, you might not be able to enjoy the same privileges. It would be a shame to lose them, wouldn't it?" Sandrine's soft voice was filled with joy.

"What do you mean by that?" Odette, lost in her thoughts, couldn't resist asking. She knew it was a trap to hurt her, but she couldn't ignore it.

Sandrine, smiling contentedly, moved closer to Odette, "Oh, you didn't know. Bastian has been given permission to go to the frontline." 

Sandrine had learned about it through her cousin, Lucas.

Although Bastian's application for service had not yet been received, it was as good as done. Sandrine had days when she struggled with not wanting to send him back to the battlefield, but not anymore. She was rather relieved the moment she found out. The most dangerous place for Bastian was right here, next to Odette.

“Bastian will go out again.”

Sandrine revealed that Bastian would be leaving again, to which the other person responded with a conditional statement,

"Going out...?

"Once the naval festival is over, he'll return to the North Sea Fleet, where the Battle of Trosa took place on the overseas front," Sandrine shared.” Sandrine shared.

Odette paid close attention to her explanation, maintaining her usual expressionless face, although her eyes betrayed a slight tremble.

 "I'm sorry. Since Bastian had already talked to me about it, I assumed he had also informed you."

"Ah, I understand now." Odette remarked

"Bastian can be quite callous sometimes. He should have given you some time to prepare yourself, no matter how short it may be. By the time he returns from his overseas service, your contract will have ended, won't it? It won't be long before I take on the role of Bastian's wife."

Observing Odette's pallid countenance, Sandrine sipped her tea with a relieved demeanor. She resolved to take pleasure in life in moderation and deal with matters as they arose. 

Now that it had become apparent that Odette was a person of negligible significance, the time Sandrine spent fretting over her suddenly seemed futile. It was a trivial conclusion that left her feeling as though she had been punching the air all by herself.

"So, Odette, I kindly request that you finish it well and be a little more cautious."

Sandrine sprang to her feet when she saw Maria Gross leave the dressing room.  It was time for her to wrap up her duties as Mrs. Klauswitz's companion.

 "All right, let's go get lots of lovely clothes.  It will be Bastian's final gift to you." Sandrine moved around, releasing her gentle hold on Odette's shoulders.

Sandrine didn't even spare a glance towards Odette until she left the dressing room to collect the finished dress. She no longer felt any obligation to do so.

Bastian had proven that the fake wife's expiration date was imminent, and it was an undeniable truth.



Odette was nowhere to be found, and even her dog, who usually followed her everywhere, was missing.

“Dora.” Bastian closed the passageway behind him and called out to the head maid, Dora, seeking an explanation. She turned around in surprise from where she was tending to Odette's dress.

"Where is Madam?" Bastian asked Dora, who was tending to Odette's dress.

"She went to practice the piano," Dora replied. "She said she'll be late, so you can go to bed first."

"Piano practice at this hour?" Bastian checked the time and adjusted his gown. It was already ten o'clock according to the clock on the mantelpiece.

Normally, Odette would be sewing or reading a book after getting ready for bed.

“I’ll bring the madam right away….”

“No. I’ll go.”

Bastian halted the head maid and left his wife's bedroom. He kept a steady pace until he reached the end of the corridor where the solarium was located, where his steps slowed down.

The sound of the piano could be heard from the darkness beyond.

It was a beautiful melody, far superior to the repetitive mechanical notes of previous practice sessions. It seemed that Odette was determined to become the best pianist in the empire, and her practice was paying off.

Bastian moved in sync with the music, and when he gently pushed the door open, he saw Odette in her nightgown sitting at the piano.

 The solarium was illuminated with pale moonlight from the open curtains, and the only source of artificial light was a wall lamp near the piano. This was an unusual sight as Odette usually kept all the lights on due to her fear of the dark.

Rather than entering the room, Bastian stepped back and listened to Odette play from behind the half-open door.

Bastian, who had little knowledge of music, could still appreciate the beauty of the melody. He knew that Odette would stop playing if she sensed his presence, but he didn't want to interrupt the enchanting performance.

He didn't want to spoil something so exquisite.

He wished that the music would continue endlessly, even until the moon faded and the sun appeared on the horizon. It was an absurd and hopeless wish.

As the melody, reminiscent of the moonlit sea, reached its end, Bastian's lips curved with a tinge of self-deprecation. Odette held down the keys even after the sound had faded away. Normally, after finishing a performance, she would pick up a pencil left on the music stand and eagerly jot something down. However, tonight was different.

The silence between them was broken by Margrethe.

The dog emerged from the partially open door, barking fiercely with a regal air, as if it were a wild animal. As Odette rose from the piano, Bastian stepped over the threshold, causing the frightened dog to scurry behind its owner for protection.

"Bastian," came Odette's voice, echoing through the darkness, its tone as beautiful as a newly started musical performance.


Chapter 67
Trill








Of all the people in the wide world, Bastian was indeed the strangest man. No matter how much she thought about it, that was the only conclusion Odette could draw. 

Bastian slowly approached the piano and stared at the music sheet in silence for a long stretch of time. His sharp gaze was so serious that suggested he carried a deep knowledge of music and melodies.

"I left you a message asking you to go to bed first. Did you not see it because you didn't run into Dora?" Odette broke the oppressive silence by speaking up.

"I saw the message," Bastian replied without looking up from the sheet music.

"Then why didn't you follow it?" Odette asked, confused.

Bastian's hand remained on the piano keys as he explained, "I just couldn't sleep."

After playing the white keys, Bastian shifted his focus to the black keys. Finally, he turned his head to face Odette, revealing a slight smile on his lips. The situation was unexpected for Odette; instead of being reprimanded for disrupting Bastian's sleep routine, he seemed to be in an entirely different state of mind.

"I apologize," Odette spoke up, feeling embarrassed. "It took me longer than expected because I haven't practiced enough, but I didn't mean to cause you any inconvenience. I'll make sure it doesn't happen again next time."

Bastian raised his eyebrows slightly in response to Odette's apology before shifting his attention back to the sheet music.

Bastian looked up from the keyboard and directed his gaze towards the sheet music, pointing at it with his hand. "Can you tell me what this is?" he asked Odette.

Odette inspected the music sheet and identified the symbol that Bastian was referring to. "It's a trill," she replied calmly, despite the question being somewhat obscure.

"A trill?" Bastian repeated, the term sounding unfamiliar to him.

"Yes, a trill," confirmed Odette, taking a step closer to the sheet music and studying the name of the musical notation next to the small note.

Bastian gazed down and observed Odette's profile as she stood beside him in front of the piano. "Is that the sound of waves I hear?" he asked her.

Odette looked at Bastian, her eyes widening in surprise. Soon, she smiled in admiration. "Are you talking about this section?" she asked, placing her hands on the keyboard and playing a trill. The gentle, undulating melody stayed with Bastian long after it had ended. "Trills are ornamental notes," she explained.

"Ornamental?”

"Yes ornamental” repeated Odette, confirming Bastian's understanding. “The piano's notes have a short duration," she added, pressing a key to demonstrate. Despite striking it with force, the sound quickly faded away. "But if you want to prolong a note, you can do this." Odette played the trill again, rapidly hitting the key before, the key next to it, and the one after that. "I embellish it with the surrounding notes to keep this note going," she explained, before stepping back from the piano. "Would you like to give it a try?"

Bastian looked at Odette in surprise "Me?" he asked in disbelief.

Odette simply nodded calmly in response. Despite feeling bewildered, Bastian slowly lifted his hand to the keyboard and attempted to mimic her technique. However, the resulting sound was anything but calm and soothing - it was more akin to a tumultuous and turbulent wave.

As Bastian released the keyboard and burst out laughing, Odette responded with a formal round of applause.

"Actually, it's not bad at all," she offered, skillfully fibbing. "I'd say it's on par with my shooting abilities." Odette had a knack for delivering gentle rejections.

Bastian's chuckles elicited a soft smile from Odette, and for a brief moment, they shared a comfortable gaze. However, their moment was abruptly interrupted by Margrethe's intrusion.

Standing between them, Margrethe began growling at Bastian, causing the amazing atmosphere to dissipate.


"You can't do that, Margrethe," scolded Odette, feeling embarrassed by the dog's behavior. But Margrethe remained steadfast, baring her teeth warily at Bastian.

"I'm sorry," Odette apologized. "I think it's because Meg is still afraid of you."

With a sense of urgency, Odette diffused the situation by quickly scooping up Margrethe. She refrained from voicing her hope that things would improve over time. After all, there was no real need for Margrethe and Bastian to develop a closer relationship, and realizing this helped to declutter her previously cluttered mind.

As Odette pondered this, she wondered why Bastian had remained silent. Throughout the day, her thoughts had been consumed with questions about his upcoming overseas assignment. Time seemed to be slipping away all too quickly.

After Margrethe calmed down, there was a sudden enveloping of profound silence. Fortunately, it didn't seem like the previous disturbance had an effect on Bastian very much at all.

Odette, who was beginning to feel more relaxed, carefully set Margrethe down on the ground, and then began organizing the sheet music. Her eyes wandered across to the item that had caught Bastian's attention, but she didn't give it any thought after that momentary fixation.

Trills had always appealed to Odette, particularly when she was young. Back then, she found the way they prolonged a beautiful moment to be quite charming. Looking back on it now, it seemed like such a naive impression to have.

As she closed the piano lid, Odette turned to face Bastian. The day after their shooting lesson, he surprised her by gifting her with the rifle she had used for practice. Although she initially declined, Bastian was persistent. It was only later that Odette came to understand his insistence - he knew she would need it.

Maybe Bastian's final gesture was to offer her a sense of security, and if that was the case, Odette was immensely appreciative. She wished to hold onto that feeling and have a positive ending. This was also the last gift she wanted to present to the man who had bestowed upon her more kindness and regard than anyone else in the world.

Odette broke into a soft smile as she took in the man who was absolutely unusual but still generous. "The day is drawing to a close. Let's turn around and go back now."



The letter arrived slightly after midday, just as the sun was casting its bright rays over the Ardenne’s Bay. But inside the hostess's bedroom, the thick curtains were drawn tightly, casting the room into darkness. In that dimly lit, cave-like space where time seemed to stand still, Theodora Klauswitz lounged in a chair, idly swirling her glass. In her other hand, she held a half-burnt pipe.

"Madam!" Susan exclaimed, letting out a sigh as she urgently addressed her mistress. Theodora slowly turned her head to look at her maid, but her unfocused gaze gave away that she was already quite drunk.


Ever since it was revealed that Bastian Klauswitz had revoked her husband's right to build railroads, scenes like this had been unfolding on a daily basis. The servants felt as though they were walking on thin ice each day.


"Madam, Duke Dyssen has sent you a letter," Susan stated, getting straight to the point. She had received a visit from her sister, who was the Duke's caretaker and wished to inform her of his recent activities. Susan had expected her sister to prattle on about trivial matters, but this time the news seemed significant as it came in the form of a letter that could prove useful.

"A letter?" Theodora sat up straight in her long chair and eagerly reached for the envelope. She carelessly tore it open and tossed it aside next to her empty wine glass.

Impatiently standing guard by the side of the chair, Susan listened to the sound of papers rustling and prayed that there would be at least one useful piece of information contained within.

Theodora Klauswitz was displeased with the sight of someone appearing helpless like a loser. Susan fervently hoped that her beloved friend, who was also her master and sister, would recover soon and be able to open the curtains wide.

Despite having devoted herself to the man she loved and his family, Theodora felt that the outcome was a pitiful and futile one.

Putting aside the letter she was reading, Theodora ordered “turn off the music.”

As Susan rushed to the opposite side of the bedroom and switched off the power, Theodora got up from her seat and pulled the curtains open.

While putting on her partly removed dress, Theodora made her way to the window, holding the letter she had picked up from the table. Susan observed her quietly.

As Theodora read the letter from the Duke of Dissen, her wrinkles seemed to deepen. Her countenance was now frightfully solemn, and there was no hint of a helpless drunkard about her.

Eventually, Theodora looked away from the letter and fixed her bloodshot eyes on the mansion located across the sea.

As she turned her head back, Theodora burst out laughing - a triumphant laugh that Susan cherished.



"Can I take a vacation this weekend?"

When the meal was nearing its end, Odette posed an audacious question.

Bastian looked up, holding his teacup loosely, while Odette sat elegantly, waiting for his response.

"A vacation?" Bastian repeated.

"Yes. If I don't have any prior engagements, I would love to take a few days off," replied Odette.

Bastian, questioning, asked "Did I ever promise you a vacation?"

Upon comprehending Bastian's implication, Odette's eyes narrowed. "No, you didn't, but... a regular employment contract should include vacation time."

Bastian laughed in amazement, "It would, if I had signed a contract to employ a maid." He noticed how his wife was becoming more skilled in the role of a servant with each passing day. This ability could prove beneficial for her success as a governess, rather than just a tutor.

Odette nodded slightly, lost in thought,"I am aware that my contract is not like that." She then offered a brief apology, saying, "I'm sorry if my request was challenging."

After her apology, Odette continued to eat her meal casually. Bastian was perplexed as to why she brought up the matter if it did not affect her in any way.

Bastian tried to recall any clues that might offer an explanation. He remembered a particular morning that stood out from the rest.

Bastian woke up at his usual time and left Odette's bedroom. He headed to his room to freshen up, shave and prepare for work. While he was getting ready, he heard a knock on the door. It was Odette, who he called the "crappy astrologer."

As usual, she had done an egg fortune-telling that predicted a day of success and determination as strong as a mountain. Bastian was determined to discover Odette's genuine emotions.

Bastian checked the time and without any delay, he addressed Odette, "Tell me, Odette." She was finishing up the remaining eggs and coffee when she looked up in surprise.

Bastian, infused with a sense of authority, asked, "Is there a problem?" His inquiry permeated the quiet morning light.


Chapter 68
A Vacation that Doesn't Feel Like a True Break








As the train from the capital pulled into Carlsbar Station, Tira jumped up from the bench. When the train's doors opened, the passengers flooded out, filling the once quiet platform with a crowd. Tira's school uniform skirt wrinkled as she eagerly made her way towards the train.

After finishing her grooming, Tira made her way towards the train, struggling to squeeze through the crowd. Despite her best efforts to look like a neat and tidy model student since the early morning, she had been pushed and shoved around, leaving her looking disheveled. Suddenly, she heard someone call out, "Tira!"

As Tira's gaze wandered around, she suddenly heard a welcoming voice, but not before her carefully polished shoes had been marred by dust and footprints. Her attention was drawn to a nearby luxury car, which appeared to be relatively quiet amidst the surrounding bustle.

"Sister!" Tira's excitement was palpable as she searched the crowd for her sister Odette, causing her to dash through the throngs of people with fierce determination. Despite Odette's usual scolding gaze, Tira was not intimidated this time. She welcomed the chastisement from her older sister, knowing that it would feel good to be nagged by her. Most of all, Tira longed to hear Odette's voice, which she had missed so dearly.

Exhibiting the poise and grace of a true lady, Tira approached her sister with a resolution in mind, only to be overcome by emotion as she forgot all about it and burst into tears, embracing Odette tightly.

"Don't act like a child, Tira" Despite her initial scolding tone, Odette's demeanor softened as she gave Tira's hand a reassuring squeeze. Againts the chilly delivery, Odette's gesture conveyed a deep sense of warmth and love.

Tira sobbed into her sister's shoulder as she gave her the tightest hug she could muster. It wasn't until she felt a kind touch that stroked her spine that she realized what had happened. It had been almost four months since they had last seen each other, as they had said their goodbyes on the evening of the wedding.

As tears streamed down her face, a smile of pure joy lit up Tira's features, I missed you! I missed you so much!"

Gazing upon her beloved sister's face, Tira was filled with a sense of wonder and admiration, unable to contain her innocent admiration. "You look like a real princess now. You're so pretty, sister," she exclaimed, unable to hold back her awe.

Odette appeared to be the epitome of elegance with a hat that had no brim and was embellished with pearl beads and ostrich feathers. The ladylike and refined body was highlighted by a blue outfit in the shape of a hat and a long string of pearls that hung from her neck.

"You can't imagine how happy I was when you arrived." Tira's eyes shone with happiness.

"I think my heart conveyed my feelings well enough," replied Odette, trying to temper her sister's excitement.

Tira shook her head vigorously. "No, it's not enough. I missed you so much that I wanted to jump over the dormitory fence just to see you."

"Please calm down, Tira," 

"Seriously! If it weren't for your intimidating husband kicking me out, I would have made a run for Ardenne by now," exclaimed Tira loudly, her face contorted with frustration. However, her expression quickly shifted to one of stunned surprise, as if realizing the full weight of what she had just said.

A tall man went down to the platform below while murmuring some things that were left unfinished. The man came to Odette as though to exercise his right of course, and while he was there, he gave a few quick orders to the servants who came after him.

"Come on, Tira. Say hello," urged Odette, using her gloved hands to gently wipe away Tira's tears. Stepping back, she gave her younger sister some space.

Trying to compose herself, Tira hastily straightened her expression before bowing her head in greeting to the man standing beside her sister - Bastian Klauswitz. It was he who had brought her to this place, and his intimidating presence still made her uneasy.



Odette wasted no time as she swiftly removed her hat and coat, carefully arranging them before making her way to the window. With deft movements, she pulled back the curtain, revealing a breathtaking view of the serene riverside landscape below.

Stretching out before her lay the Schulter River, the lifeblood of the northern region of the Empire. Its waters shimmered with a piercingly cold, crystal-blue light, creating a stunning vista visible from the bedroom of the luxurious suite.

"It's a room with an amazing view," remarked Odette in a tone that was more matter-of-fact than impressed. Without wasting any more time, she began to unpack her belongings.

Meanwhile, Bastian settled back into a chair situated near the fireplace, watching the scene unfold before him. He observed as Odette deftly hung a wrinkled dress in the closet and arranged her belongings with the dexterity of a seasoned maid.

After placing the cigarette case on the armrest, Bastian reached into the pocket of his jacket and removed the cigarette case. Soon after that, he located and grabbed the lighter, but he did not use it to light the cigarette. He had just finished watching her while holding a cigarette to his lips. Odette would frequently move about in the bedroom, and she would only turn towards Bastian once she had finished removing all of her belongings from the room.

"Once again, I apologize for Tira's rudeness. I'm truly sorry, Bastian," said Odette, after much hesitation. Bastian, who had been biting a cigarette, put it down and nodded in response.

In truth, Tira Byller's behavior was of little concern to him. Although it was difficult to comprehend why Odette would be bothered by such a thing, he didn't mind keeping the decorum in check, at least to a certain extent.

"Thank you for understanding," said Odette with a relieved smile, standing at a polite distance. In that moment, she appeared more like a secretary or a maid than a wife.

"Of course, I appreciate the consideration of allowing me to take a vacation to come see Tira. It means even more since it's been a long time since we've been together," Odette continued talking then added a belated greeting, seemingly managing to maintain her composure. She had to exert effort to keep the corners of her mouth up so as not to lose her smile.

After hearing about the situation, Bastian granted Odette's request for a vacation. Odette was genuinely thrilled and grateful for the unexpected gift, even though it didn't feel like a typical vacation since she would be traveling with her employer. 

Bastian mentioned that they would be heading to Carlsbar at the perfect time, albeit with a slight frown. Initially, he had planned to send a company executive instead, but since things turned out this way, they could go together. Odette felt that it was not an ideal arrangement, but she had no choice but to accept it.

"Yes, Bastian," Odette replied with a polite and even laughed with the demeanor of a competent wife the previous night. She thought it would have been better not to further complicate their already awkward cohabitation. "That's very kind of you," she added. However, she couldn't shake off the feeling of discomfort. "It's almost twelve o'clock already," she informed Bastian, glancing at the clock.

Despite being in the city for business, Bastian had no excuse to neglect his other duties. A promise made to businessmen from the North had left him with a tight and hectic two-day schedule, which made Odette doubt whether he could keep up with it.

"The car will be here in ten minutes," Bastian announced as he stood up and strode across the room in broad steps. Odette felt embarrassed by his sudden presence but remained silent. Fortunately, Bastian stopped at the right spot, "I'll be back before 7 o'clock, so let's have dinner together, with your sister." It was an unexpected offer from Bastian, who had just put on his jacket.

"No, I don't want to take your time. I'll take care of Tira myself." Odette attempted to decline Bastian's invitation, however, Bastian reiterated his promise, "Seven o'clock. We'll go to the restaurant on the first floor of this hotel." He spoke with a tone that suggested he did not wish to argue further. As he adjusted his tie, a wedding ring similar to Odette's glistened on his large hand.

Odette was taken aback when she realized all of a sudden that this man was not only her boss but also carrying out the responsibilities of a husband. She showed that she was aware of the situation by nodding her head in agreement. From the perspective of the general public, it was a visit from a loving husband to the cherished sister of his wife. Bastian was responsible for a number of things, including having supper with Tira.

"Thank you. I'll make sure Tira doesn't make another mistake," Odette said gratefully. 

"I wish there was something more practical you could do," Bastian replied, taking out a small card from his jacket pocket. Odette was surprised when he handed it to her. It was an invitation with the Herhardt family emblem. "House of Herhardt invited us for lunch tomorrow. He wants a definite answer by phone," Bastian informed her.

 "Is the Herhardt family also part of your social circle?" Odette asked.

 "Up until Matthias von Herhardt," Bastian replied.

Bastian adjusted his jacket and lifted his chin, exuding an air of discipline that would make anyone think he was a soldier. Even as a civilian, his military background was apparent. Odette was certain that anyone who saw him would immediately recognize him as an officer.

Bastian's words caught Odette's attention, bringing her back to the present. She took a deep breath and carefully examined the elegant invitation in her hand. The contact information for a response was written in beautiful handwriting. 

“Should I make the call?" Odette asked, seeking Bastian's opinion. 

"That's your responsibility," Bastian replied.

 "What do you mean?" Odette asked, confused.

 "It's considered impolite for someone of lower status to speak to someone of higher status first, isn't it?" Bastian responded, discussing the matter in a serious tone devoid of any respect or animosity towards hierarchy.

Odette nodded softly. "Oh... yes. Not among friends."

Although a married woman should follow her husband's status, society still regarded one's family lineage as important. Odette wasn't sure if Dyssen's name carried enough weight, but Bastian was correct about etiquette.

"But Bastian," Odette's eyes shook when she saw the name of the dowager Duchess at the end of the invitation. "I think I should decline this. The dowager Duchess is a member of the Lovita royal family."

"So what?" Bastian retorted

 "My late mother...my mother was prince of Lovita’s fiancé when she was the princess of Berg." Odette confessed her mother's mistake as calmly as she could. 

Bastian took a moment to gather his thoughts before summarizing the situation briefly. "The fiancé who was betrayed by your mother is a relative of Duchess Herhardt, is that what you mean?" 

"Yes, In that case, Lady Norma might not be too pleased with me. Perhaps you should visit alone," Odette suggested.

Bastian shrugged nonchalantly. It was clear to him now why the noble Duchess had invited the Klauswitz couple. "Well, I think she'll be rather pleased," he said. "Didn't she know what you just told me?"

Odette hesitated for a moment before answering. "No, I don't think so."

"Well, there you have it," Bastian replied. "She invited you because she wanted to meet you."

"Why?" Odette asked.

"Because it's a satisfying story for the Duchess," Bastian replied. "The daughter of the woman who betrayed her own family ended up marrying the grandson of a junk dealer and becoming a commoner. It's a refreshing ending, isn't it?"

Odette stared at Bastian in silence, feeling insulted but suppressing her reaction as was her habit.

 “It would bring the Duchess a great comfort and pleasure to witness it by herself.” Bastian said.

"Are you suggesting that I should be a tangible reminder of my mother's past mistakes and shortcomings for the Duchess's comfort and pleasure?" Odette asked incredulously.

"It's up to you to find any meaning in it. You just have to make a phone call to the Duke's family and enjoy a nice lunch at their mansion tomorrow. After all, the best aristocratic family in the empire wouldn't serve anything less than excellent food." His expression and tone remained the same as when he discussed noble manners, revealing his class consciousness.

Odette stared at her husband, feeling bewildered. She was reminded once again of who she had married, and it was clear why high society held such animosity towards Bastian Klauswitz. Odette couldn't condone a man who groveled for success like a dog.

However, she understood that Bastian's unwillingness to rebel against the old order and authority didn't stem from envy. Perhaps he believed that one cannot truly understand something until they stand at the opposite end of it.

The notion appeared to be absent from his mind. He was not aware, therefore he didn't have to form opinions on what was right or wrong. It wasn't obedience, it was just lack of consciousness.

"Do you truly believe it will benefit you?" Odette's gaze became firm. The offspring of a betrayed princess. A Duke's daughter with nothing but a name. A guilty being born with inherent sin.

Odette felt liberated for the first time in her life as she looked into Bastian's indifferent gaze, which made her feel like the shackles that had been holding her down had lost their power.

"Suppose the answer is affirmative?" Bastian glanced at his watch and posed a brief question. It was 12:10, the scheduled time for the car he had arranged to send. 

"In that case, I will proceed with it," Odette replied promptly, without any hesitation.

As Bastian gazed at Odette, a wide grin spread across his face, leaving a dazzling impression, like the brightness of noon sunlight.


Chapter 69
Mother Bird








After going around the bend, the carriage that belonged to the Herhardt family drew into the driveway that led to the mansion. The road certainly made an impression with its towering plane trees that flanked both sides.

Odette observed the spectacle outside the window with apprehension and wonder as it unfolded. The route was embroidered with the sunlight's shadows as it passed through the spaces between the arches made by the meeting of branches. 

The entrance door, which was situated at the vanishing point, was equally as beautiful and splendid as the majesty of Herhardt.

It's alright.

Odette inhaled deeply, strengthening her resolve once more.

The mother of Duke Herhardt, whom she had conversed with the previous day, had been amiable. Based on the passing reference to the imperial family, Bastian appeared to be correct in assuming that they were already aware. Nonetheless, even if they had opted to invite the daughter of Princess Helen, the objective would not have diverged greatly from his conjecture.

With the biggest challenge now conquered, the only task that remained was to enjoy a delightful lunch.

As Odette pondered over Bastian's guidance, even the slightest trace of doubt lingering in the recesses of her mind vanished into thin air. She chuckled softly, taken aback by how effortless it felt to recall her mother's name. As she shifted her attention away from the passing scenery outside the carriage, she couldn't help but notice how much brighter everything seemed.

'Bastian', suppressing the name that nearly escaped her lips out of habit, Odette shifted her gaze towards the man seated beside her. Bastian sat slouched in his seat with his eyes closed.

Feeling reassured, Odette observed the sleeping Bastian with a sense of ease. His sharp eyes were softened by his unusually long eyelashes, and the contrast between his sharp, high nose and delicate lips was striking. Bastian Klauswitz was not only a handsome man but also a distinguished soldier and accomplished businessman.

Regardless of the public's opinion, Odette did not view her decision to marry this man as a disgrace. It was difficult for her to empathize with the disdainful labels given to him by the nobility, who ridiculed his maternal grandfather's lineage.

As Odette pondered these thoughts, Bastian abruptly opened his eyes, causing her to realize that he had been watching her all along, and right from the beginning. The realization dawned on her so suddenly that she didn't even have a moment to avert her gaze.

Although the situation was rather awkward, Odette endeavored to maintain her composure, and Bastian appeared unruffled as well.

Breaking the uncomfortable silence, Odette spoke up first. "I believe your tie might be slightly askew," she remarked, using it as a pretext to divert attention away from the uneasy atmosphere.

"Where?" Bastian inquired, furrowing his brow as he inspected his appearance.

With a hint of anxiety that her falsehood might be exposed, Odette hastily retrieved Bastian's tie and straightened the knot that had been slightly askew. As she did so, the carriage approached the entrance to the Duke's estate.

"Done," Odette exclaimed with a natural smile, withdrawing her hand from Bastian's tie. However, Bastian remained silent and did not respond.

"How are you feeling? Are you alright?" inquired Odette, masking her apprehension with a tone of genuine concern.

"I'm fine," Bastian replied in a hushed voice, maintaining his prolonged and penetrating gaze at her until the carriage came to a stop. As the door to the carriage opened, Odette let out an uneasy smile and cast her eyes downward, grateful that she no longer had to struggle to find the right words to say.

"Are you prepared?" Bastian asked before alighting from the carriage and extending his hand towards Odette. With her mind cleared of any extraneous thoughts, she grasped his hand and took the first step towards what promised to be a delightful lunch.

She walked with grace, carrying herself with an air of refinement befitting the title of Mrs. Klauswitz.



Norma von Herhardt, the Dowager Duchess of the Herhardt family, set down her glass and began to speak about her grandson. "Matthias is an officer in the army, currently serving on the overseas front," she disclosed, all the while keeping her gaze fixed on Odette.

"We had hoped that he would join the Imperial Guard, but he refused to yield. He is undoubtedly a Herhardt, stubbornness and all," remarked Elysee von Herhardt, the Duke's mother, her face glowing with pride. She too, like the Dowager Duchess, kept her attention fixed solely on Odette, seemingly having forgotten Bastian's presence. It was a display of sophistication and refinement in their mannerisms.

Bastian ate his meal with the demeanor of a courteous but unassuming bystander, as he had expected from the outset. Knowing that older and higher-ranking aristocrats could be rigid and uncompromising, he appreciated the gracious hospitality of the two ladies from the ducal family. At the end of the day, what mattered was that he had been invited as a guest of the Herhardt family.

Despite knowing Matthias von Herhardt, without the recognition of the two ladies, Bastian felt only partially connected to the family's social circle. However, after today, that would change. An invitation bearing the signatures of the family ladies was like a key to the heart of high society. By accepting and reciprocating the invitation, a deal had been sealed, solidifying Bastian's place among the elite.

Bastian was fully aware that both of the duke's wives were considering the same thing at the same time. Since they had all succeeded in accomplishing their individual objectives, the only thing left to do before heading back was to take some time off formally.

"It would be nice if he could come back for a vacation. I am worried about how well he's doing in that rough terrain." Norma von Herhardt expressed her worry for her grandson serving in the Army overseas. As she spoke, her usual cool and elegant demeanor softened into that of a typical grandmother's concern. Bastian showed his sympathy with a gentle expression, acknowledging her worries.

"I'm sure he's doing his best out there, but it's natural to worry about those we love." Odette, taking on a maternal role, chimed in to offer comfort. I also heard that the situation on the overseas front is not too bad," said Odette, smoothly redirecting the conversation. She turned to Bastian and asked, "What do you think, Bastian?" Her innocent and curious expression caught the attention of the Herhardt family members seated around the table, who followed her gaze.

Bastian gracefully placed his cutlery down and turned towards his attentive audience, wearing a subtle smile. "The situation on the North Sea front is currently in Berg's favor. While there are occasional local battles, our troops are prevailing in ground battles, and Duke Herhardt is a skilled soldier. Therefore, I believe he is doing well," he replied, diffusing the tense atmosphere with his composed answer.

The Dowager Duchess of the Herhardt family observed him closely, nodding in agreement and displaying a kind smile. Odette's previous comment had not seemed to offend her.

Odette frequently offered to assume the role of the mother bird, even after that incident. She would wait patiently and pounce quickly on suitable prey before carrying it away. During lunch, Bastian had intended to relax and leave, but Odette's topic of conversation, primarily focused on international affairs and war, disrupted his plans.

As the topic of last spring's polo tournament was brought up, Odette's previously light-hearted expression turned serious once again. Bastian felt a wave of confusion as he observed his wife's sudden shift in demeanor.

Odette had always been like a mother bird of prey, providing for those under her care, but now she seemed unwilling to open her beak for even the weakest of them. Bastian couldn't help but wonder if the sharp ladies of the duchy had also taken notice of Odette's change. In fact, the grandmother of the Herhardt family was watching Odette intently with an odd expression.

When Bastian and her locked eyes, she raised her eyebrows and smiled, showing her admiration for the new bride's efforts to maintain a good relationship with her husband.

Bastian briefly acknowledged her with a grateful glance. The Dowager Duchess, known as a distinguished figure among the nobility, held a special affection for Odette. Perhaps it was a generous sympathy for the daughter of an abandoned princess who had managed to gracefully transform her life, but the exact reason was insignificant.

Odette proved to be a surprisingly valuable wife, despite her disadvantaged position and past struggles. It appeared that the power of her lineage had not completely vanished, even though she had experienced a period of hardship and uncertainty.

As he pondered whether the emperor had burdened him with an inconvenient task, Norma Catharina von Herhardt spoke up. "Captain Klauswitz must be feeling bored, sitting all alone without someone of his own age. If Matthias were here, he would have made a great companion."

Matthias's grandmother shifted her gaze towards Bastian, marking their first direct conversation since their initial greeting. Despite the curious onlookers fixating their attention on her, she remained utterly unconcerned and unperturbed.

"Matthias appeared to hold Captain Klauswitz in high regard. Given that you both share a background as soldiers and businessmen, it's likely that you have good communication between you. When I met you in person, I couldn't help but notice certain resemblances to the boy." said Norma.

"You flatter me too much." Bastian remarked.

"When Matthias returns, you should come for another visit, accompanied by your wife, of course," Norma suggested, turning her attention to Odette. Her expression held a mix of pity and admiration. "Well, now that it seems the meal has come to an end, shall we adjourn for some tea?"

Norma, signaling the conclusion of the luncheon, silently communicated her instruction by fixing her gaze upon Bastian once more. Interpreting the unspoken message, Bastian rose discreetly and made his way towards the head of the table. Extending a courteous gesture to accompany her, the elderly lady gladly presented her hand.

As they prepared to depart the lunchroom, Bastian cast a glance in Odette's direction. She resembled a contented mother bird, having nourished her fledglings to their heart's content.



"The food was exceptional, don't you think?" Bastian remarked.

Odette, who had been observing the ducal residence receding in the distance, nodded in agreement. Her smiling countenance was as resplendent as the bouquet of roses cradled in her arms—a farewell present from the ladies of the Herhardt family.

"If you enjoyed it that much, I could consider hiring the chef," Bastian mused, reclining against the seat of the carriage as he playfully uttered whimsical words.

"What are you discussing?" Odette inquired, her forehead creasing as she tilted her head curiously.

"I was referring to the chef from the Herhardt family. She appears to possess remarkable culinary skills," Bastian explained.

"Yes, but how would you manage that?" Odette responded, her expression indicating that she recognized the impracticality of the suggestion. Nevertheless, a faint smile graced her lips.

"I'll offer her a higher salary," Bastian replied, determinedly asserting his intention.

"Well, it seems like she wouldn't easily be outdone by you when it comes to money." 

"Nevertheless, I excel in strategic battles, Odette. I possess weapons that others can never acquire." 

"What kind of weapons are those?" Odette inquired.

"The audacity inherited from my grandfather," Bastian revealed.

Odette burst into laughter at the lighthearted jest. Her laughter was delightful, reflecting her pleasant demeanor.

"I apologize, but I surrender. Our chef is more than capable," Odette gracefully played along with his prank. She appeared entirely transformed from her usual serious demeanor, no longer resembling a dull nun.

Once they departed from the duke's residence, the carriage gradually picked up speed. Odette observed the scenery passing by through the window, a lingering smile adorning her face. The afternoon was radiant, with sunlight filtering through the trees, creating a dazzling ambiance.

Bastian cast an oblique glance in the direction of his wife as she sat next to him. Along the route of the golden sycamore, one could frequently hear the rhythmic sound of carriage wheels and the hooves of horses. 

A clear bell started ringing just as he was beginning to convince himself that the elderly woman's insistence on a horse-drawn carriage might not be such a horrible idea after all. It sounded like the bell from a bicycle, but it was coming from the opposite side of the road.

Shortly after, a young schoolgirl rode past the carriage on her bicycle. Bastian's gaze, which had casually swept over the scene, once again settled upon Odette's profile.

Having fulfilled her duties, Odette appeared completely at ease, exuding a sense of tranquility.

Bastian swallowed, feeling his throat dry, and instinctively tugged at his tie knot. However, he ultimately couldn't bring himself to loosen it. As the suffocating sensation gradually subsided, Bastian released his grip on the stubbornly tangled tie. A hint of self-derision washed over him, yet his resolve remained unchanged.

He desired to let it be.

Just as it was, for a little while longer.


Chapter 70
Because We Are in Love








"Shall we go?" Bastian suggested, his voice akin to a gentle breeze brushing against her ears.

Odette's head swiveled in surprise as she turned to face him. Without any prior notice, Bastian appeared by her side and positioned himself next to her in front of a window that offered a picturesque view of the riverside.

"It doesn't appear to be too far from here," Bastian commented, his eyes narrowing as he surveyed the sunset-kissed Schulter River. In his gaze, the Ferris wheel from the amusement park Odette had been observing came into view.

"No, I'm alright," Odette replied, attempting to brush off the topic.

"You were observing it last night, weren't you?" Bastian persisted, refusing to let the matter drop, despite Odette's evasive response.

"That..." Odette hesitated for a moment, shifting slightly to the side. It was difficult to deny. It was evident that she had spent late nights in front of this window, captivated by the shimmering lights of the Ferris wheel. "It's just... because it's beautiful. That's all."

After considerable deliberation, Odette finally disclosed her most genuine sentiments.

By sheer coincidence, they found themselves staying in a room that afforded a view of the enchanting Ferris wheel, and all Odette desired was to gaze at the mesmerizing lights. 

The recollection of that spring evening when they made a pledge to embark on a field trip to the amusement park weighed heavily on her heart, but she chose to keep this sentiment concealed, locked within the depths of her being. How could she possibly confess to this man that she now regretted ever making that promise to Tira?

If that had been the reality, Tira wouldn't have been driven to such desperate measures to safeguard their emergency fund. Consequently, their father would not have resorted to taking the money in their customary altercation.

Perhaps it could have been an unremarkable day, filled with simple pleasures like cotton candy, merry-go-round rides, the Electric Palace, the horoscope machine, and the Ferris wheel. If only Tira hadn't been so thrilled, resembling a child, as she gleefully shared tales and chattered away.

She convinced herself that it was because of her sister Odette's immaturity, but in reality, Odette was just interested. The bright lights of the amusement park that she saw as she travelled through the central business district of the city. She also pictured herself riding over the night sky on what appeared to be a giant golden ferris wheel atop a gigantic ferris wheel.

Even on that particular night, as she stirred the stew with a ladle in hand, the mere fact that she had felt a tinge of excitement added an extra burden to Odette's heart. She knew she shouldn't have allowed herself to indulge in such emotions.

Recalling her past foolish mistakes, Odette pressed her lips together tightly, determined to suppress her sentimental thoughts. It was time to fulfill her role as a wife, and with that in mind, she composed herself, ready to face Bastian with a composed expression as she recollected her unfinished task.

"You have a dinner engagement," Odette informed Bastian.

Bastian had a scheduled luncheon at the House of Herhardt and an evening meeting with northern businessmen. Odette was well aware of today's itinerary; there was no room for error. Once Bastian left for the evening, she had made a promise to visit Tira.

"You should leave now," Odette insisted, making another attempt to get Bastian's attention. However, he remained unresponsive. His blue eyes were fixed upon the Ferris wheel gracefully traversing the sky as nightfall approached, captivating Odette once more.

"The schedule has been altered," Bastian calmly conveyed the news. The primary objective of their journey to Carlsbar had been to engage with the Herhardt family, and having fulfilled that task flawlessly, he felt at liberty to handle the remaining tasks as he deemed appropriate.

It was a decision Bastian reached during the carriage ride back to the hotel. He made the firm choice to forgo his official obligations, including the meeting he was expected to attend later that night.

His desire was to be with this woman, Odette.

Bastian yearned for it with unwavering clarity, and as a result, he acquiesced to his own longing.

"Prepare yourself," Bastian calmly ordered, his gaze fixed on Odette's astonished expression.

After the parents' event at Tira's girls' school the following day, they would need to return to Ardenne. Before that, Bastian thought it would be lovely to bestow a small gift upon Odette. However, she exceeded his expectations, proving herself to be even more capable than he had anticipated.

"Bastian!" Odette called out urgently, causing him to quickly turn around. He faced her as she hesitantly continued.

"May I bring Tira along?" Her lips, tinged with the warm glow of the sunset, uttered the name with a hint of unease. "I made a promise to her, you see. I plan on visiting her tonight. So... if I have to go, I would like to take Tira with me."

The eyes of the helpless mother bird flashed with a steely resolve, betraying her desperation.



"Sister, why are you so thoughtless?" Tira's stern reprimand carried over the cacophony of the bustling amusement park.

"Thoughtless?" Odette tilted her head in confusion, appearing unaware of what she had done wrong.

"Why would you bring me here? I expected it to be uncomfortable and suffocating," Tira exclaimed, clicking her tongue and gesturing behind her to highlight her sister's error.

As Bastian made his way towards a cotton candy stall, Tira's persistent plea for a taste still echoing in his ears, Odette devised a plan as a means to grant her sister an opportunity to have a conversation.

"Don't be impolite, Tira. Bastian hasn't done anything to harm you," Odette reprimanded her sister, contemplating her words carefully.

In her state of disbelief, Tira let out a sigh and guided her sister to an unoccupied bench. She made sure to keep an eye on Bastian's movements intermittently.

Bastian had just reached the cotton candy stall, his tall and imposing figure standing out prominently in the bustling crowd. Thankfully, there was a long line, granting them a bit more time.

"When did I ever say the captain is bad?" Tira shook her head and took a seat next to Odette.

Upon hearing the news of her sister's visit, Tira had been filled with joy. It meant she could escape the stifling dormitory and have some fun. However, that happiness quickly dissipated the moment she encountered Bastian in the first-floor lobby.

"It's not the captain who's bad, it's you, sister," Tira exclaimed, her gaze filled with thorns. Despite Tira's piercing eyes, Odette remained baffled, her expression one of confusion.

"Me? Why?" Odette questioned.

"Why would you bring your sister along on a date with your husband?" Tira retorted. 

Odette's frown deepened, as if she had been deeply offended. Tira expressed her frustration by tapping her chest to emphasize her point.


"Oh? How else can you describe this situation?" 

"We just..." Odette began, her words trailing off.

"Look. It's a date," Tira sighed once more, casting her gaze upon Odette, who vehemently denied her words. "Even if it's not officially labeled as such, being alone with the captain feels intimidating. It's like sitting on a cushion full of thorns."

"Bastian is a generous person who is doing you a great favor. Don't speak that way,"

"I'm afraid of him, so why can't I say so?" Tira retorted.

"You're afraid of Bastian?" Odette questioned once more, her disbelief evident.

"Are you not afraid of the captain?" Tira seemed perplexed by Odette's lack of understanding. Odette glanced at Bastian, her brow furrowed in contemplation.

The brightly colored light bulb decorations at the cotton candy kiosk with the grandiose moniker Fairy Thread were drawing a lot of attention to themselves. It was a scene that swirled around like water and oil while Bastian was there standing in line with a stance that was straight and upright.

Odette gave a small shake of her head and then turned her attention to Tira.

 She did not have any fear of him.

It goes without saying that she experienced an overwhelming sense of unease in relation to the man; yet, terror was not one of those emotions. He was always nice, despite the fact that he had no facial expression and said very little. In point of fact, he was not only a gentleman but also a really clever man.


"Probably because you love him," Tira stated casually, causing Odette to be taken aback.

No.

Odette managed to restrain the words that nearly escaped her reflexively.

"Nevertheless, I'm afraid of the captain. Even making eye contact with him sends a shiver down my spine. He's as cold as ice," Tira expressed with an exaggerated tantrum, her gaze fixed on the cotton candy stand. Bastian's turn was approaching.

She was startled when she heard a voice yelling her name vehemently just as her eyes began to become dim with the notion of her being an obstruction once more.

 Her fellow students who resided in the same dorm room smiled and waved at her as she passed by. There was also a group of male students from the nearby school who were present there.


"I'll go see my friends," Tira exclaimed, seizing the opportunity for an escape and leaping with joy as she stood up from the bench.

"Tira Byller!" Odette called out her name with a scolding tone, but it was insufficient to deter Tira's determination.

"See you later, sister! I'll be in front of the Ferris wheel by 9 o'clock!" Tira left her unilateral notice and dashed off towards her friends. As she made her way to escape from her sister, Tira passed by the cotton candy stand. Odette's intimidating yet wonderful husband was now receiving a fluffy white cloud of cotton candy.




"I’m sorry, Bastian." Odette lowered her head once again after sharing the circumstances of Tira leaving them. "I suppose at her age, spending time with friends is more enjoyable. I'm sorry it turned out this way, especially after all the effort and thoughtfulness you put into it."

Bastian glanced between the cotton candy in his hand and his wife, who appeared distressed, and let out a laugh.

Odette's sister had disappeared. She came to this town by chance and ended up meeting several of her friends here. She gave the impression of being an immature person who lacked any thoughts, but it seemed as though she had at least some value.

"Don't worry about it." Bastian replied, casting a kind glance at the clock tower. He shook his head gently, noting that there was still over two hours remaining until their agreed-upon meeting time of nine o'clock. In a rare turn of events, Tira Byller had proven to be useful. "She's still young. As you mentioned, this is the age for making friends."


Odette's face finally brightened with a sense of relief. "Thank you for understanding," she expressed gratefully. Draped in a short cloak over a checked wool dress, Odette appeared more youthful than ever. It was a stark contrast to her elegant noblewoman guise from earlier in the afternoon.

He did not give it a great deal of thought, but it was possible that it was an illusion generated by the space being filled with the cheers and laughter of youngsters.

First, Bastian passed on the piece of cotton candy that he had been holding in his hand. When Odette unexpectedly received it, her eyes widened with surprise.

"I guess I'm not the kind of person who enjoys these things," Odette remarked with a playful tone. Bastian chuckled heartily and reached out to take Odette's hand. The illuminated rides cast a vibrant glow over the nighttime amusement park, creating an atmosphere as lively as daylight.

With confidence, Bastian led the way towards the lights that had captivated Odette's attention. Walking hand in hand, they ventured through the park together, Odette clutching her cotton candy tightly.


Chapter 71
Fantasy Night








Hand in hand, Odette strolled through the bustling amusement park, immersed in the festive atmosphere. Her grip on Bastian's hand resembled that of a child on a carefree picnic day.

Her gaze lowered to the cotton candy she held, a sweet gift given in place of Tira. It felt almost like a dream to Odette as she contemplated taking a bite, yet hesitation held her back. She couldn't bring herself to discard it either, leaving her in an awkward predicament.

Odette released a soft, resigned sigh and lifted her gaze to meet Bastian's eyes. Despite the vibrant glow of the colorful lights surrounding them, his expression remained unchanged. He had a certain degree of kindness, yet there was also a hint of detachment.

Why was he still keeping her in the dark about his departure? Did he consider their relationship to be inconsequential, not requiring the courtesy of a proper farewell? If that were the case, why was he extending this kindness to her now? The questions swirled in Odette's mind, leaving her feeling uncertain and perplexed.

As the multitude of questions lingered in their minds, the two of them arrived at the heart of the amusement park. The plaza, adorned with a grand palace-like structure made of steel frames, teemed with a multitude of holidaymakers.

Caught off guard, Odette's gaze naturally gravitated towards the spectacle, and a soft gasp of awe escaped her lips. The electric palace shimmered with an array of colored lights, casting a magical glow upon the surroundings. The melodies from the merry-go-round and the joyful laughter of children blended harmoniously, enhancing the beauty of the autumn night that was gradually enveloping them.

Odette came to a halt, captivated by the enchanting panorama before her. It seemed as though she had stepped into a page from a fairy tale—a reward bestowed upon the protagonist who had triumphed over countless trials. 

It was a chapter at the story's end, where a bright and promising future unfurled, promising a lifetime of joy and contentment. However, her ephemeral daydream was abruptly shattered by the gentle breeze that carried with it the sweet fragrance of cotton candy.

In that moment, Odette redirected her gaze to the reality that surrounded her. She glanced down at the cotton candy in her hand and then shifted her attention back to Bastian, their eyes meeting once again.


"Bastian," Odette uttered softly, prompting him to turn towards her. His visage bore no discernible expression, yet his eyes held a tenderness as they met her gaze. However, it was difficult to perceive it as a profound intimacy. Bastian Klauswitz was a man of impeccable manners, after all.

He was typically courteous and kind, never displaying more than what was deemed appropriate. Odette was well aware that this was merely a facade, a surface-level portrayal of their marriage. It was clear that he approached their union with such a mindset.

However, there were moments when the truth broke through.

On a spring day, she discovered that the stake he had won in a hidden gambling den belonged to the partner chosen for her in the arranged marriage set by the emperor. A ribbon, originally intended as a symbol of victory, was carelessly discarded in the mud. A heartless hand extended a contract offering a two-year employment. In the depths of the mountains, a night unfolded with untamed desires, devoid of any reservations.

Bastian's raw emotions always had a way of piercing her heart. The truth that had been overshadowed by the peaceful days suddenly resurfaced as she looked at Bastian's composed face. Yet, it was through their combined efforts that the contractual arrangement had progressed relatively smoothly.

They both aimed to fulfill the shared objective of successfully completing the contract. There might have been moments of understanding and empathy that blossomed from their time together, but they were as ephemeral as the fleeting illusions created by the cotton candy.

Therefore, pondering over such questions seemed futile.

Her mind, which had been like a tangled ball of thread, was finally beginning to be sorted out just as she felt something dull hit her shoulder. Odette was pushed to the side as she tried to make her way through the crowd that had gathered to watch the Electric Palace. She was able to avoid falling because to the support provided by Bastian; nevertheless, the cotton candy that she missed was already laying on the ground.

"Just let it go, Odette. I'll get you another one," Bastian chuckled, gently persuading Odette not to retrieve the dropped cotton candy. His demeanor carried a nurturing tone, akin to soothing a child. 

"No, it's alright," Odette replied, declining his offer.

Odette gazed at the cotton candy, now tainted by footprints, and shook her head, wearing a smile. The ethereal thread of enchantment, resembling a wisp of cloud, had vanished, leaving behind only a crushed lump of sugar. It was a disappointment, yet there was no sense of remorse. With a newfound sense of ease, she turned to face Bastian.

Even if Bastian up and moved to the front lines unexpectedly one day, their contract would not be affected in any way. All that is required of her is to come back within the allotted time frame and pay the prize. Therefore, all that Odette could do was show humility in the face of any choice and carry out the responsibility that had been assigned to her.

"There's quite a crowd here. Let's move to a quieter spot," Odette suggested, leaving behind the shapeless remains of the cotton candy. Her resolve to fully embrace this enchanting night was unwavering. It was her way of reciprocating Bastian's kindness.




"Exercise restraint," Theodora cautioned, interrupting Franz as he reached for the final button on his jacket. Startled, he wearily turned his body to face his mother. Theodora Klauswitz sat comfortably in her chair by the fireplace, appearing far from an intruder who had barged into her son's room in the dead of night.

"I believe you were recently giving advice to Ella about performing well," Franz attempted to mask the rising irritation in his mind and responded. It had been an incredibly exhausting day, filled with visits to stock exchanges, banks, and countless business partners. He had spent the entire day navigating the bustling Ratz financial district, constantly learning about the workings of the company.

However, his father would not give up easy, despite the fact that it appeared as though he was about to get bored of the complicated figures and equations. He dismissed Franz by ranting and raving at the successor, who he deemed to be unacceptable, and using abusive language. 

Every day has been a living torment for Jeff ever since that lowly beast stripped him of the right to construct railroads and put an end to his railroad building career.

"Indeed, it is essential for you to treat Ella kindly. During moments like these, we must hold onto our inner childlike innocence. We need to ensure that Count Klein does not belittle us or harbor any alternative thoughts," Theodora stated as she set her pipe aside and rose from her seat. Franz, with eyes tightly shut, anxiously discarded his jacket and tie onto the bed. The mere mention of his fiancée's name, Ella, now evoked a sense of sickness within him.

His mother had claimed that Ella would be the one to uplift and support him, and Franz had believed it. Consequently, he had accepted his engagement to Ella von Klein. Little did he imagine that she would turn out to be such a repulsive, indulged individual?

Ella frequently demanded Franz's love and attention, resorting to rushing to his mother and fabricating stories when her desires weren't fulfilled. She carried herself with the dignity and pride befitting a noble family.

Franz nonchalantly removed his glasses and watch, settling himself on the edge of the bed as he let out a heavy sigh. Theodora stood right before him, in close proximity.


"It appears that there is another woman who requires some restraint," Theodora remarked, her voice soothing as she comforted her son's weary shoulders, her grip gentle as she held his hand. Franz's complexion grew pale as she directed his attention to the lower shelf of the chest of drawers, where Odette's portrait was concealed.

"No... You didn't... search my room again, did you?" Franz's voice quivered with disbelief.

"Since you refuse to speak up, am I not allowed to take any action?" Theodora questioned with a hint of frustration in her voice.

"Oh my god, Mother!" Franz exclaimed, taken aback by his mother's words.

"Thanks to that, I now understand why you became so neglectful of your fiancée all of a sudden. Although it is disheartening to realize that she is, in the end, Bastian's wife," Theodora commented, her tone tinged with disappointment. Despite Franz's astonishment, Theodora maintained her composure, not even raising an eyebrow.

"How intimate are you with her?" she inquired calmly, facing Franz directly.

An eyebrow arched, Theodora pressed on, determined to elicit a response. "How close are you with her?"

Silence hung in the air, stretching uncomfortably.

"Hopefully, the muddy water she splashed isn't close enough to stain you," Theodora added, her words filled with subtle implications.

Still met with no answer, Theodora's patience wore thin. "Answer me, Franz Klauswitz!" she demanded, her voice carrying a mix of frustration and concern.

Franz stubbornly maintained his closed lips, his face, once and a blank canvas, now flushed with a hue of crimson, unbeknownst to him.


"Could it be that you're the only one experiencing these emotions?" Theodora questioned, her eyebrows furrowing as she observed her son's unsettled gaze.

As Franz's eyes darted about in instability, Theodora couldn't help but remark, "To think that my own son was captivated by a mere piece of flesh he sank his teeth into. What an ironic twist of fate." She chuckled and took a seat beside Franz.

Now equipped with a general understanding of how to utilize the seemingly providential letter, Theodora had a plan in mind. With the minor issue that had arisen earlier now resolved, the only thing left to do was wait for Bastian's wife to return.

"It may seem unlikely, but until this matter is resolved, ensure that you don't even come near that woman," Theodora warned, her voice filled with caution.

Franz's eyes, previously clouded and lost, suddenly regained focus as he questioned, "Has something happened to Odette?" His gaze fixated, filled with a desperate intensity. This level of enthusiasm had not been present when discussing his own fiancée.

"It's not your concern. Your responsibility is to focus on your job," Theodora retorted firmly.

"But, mother..." Franz attempted to interject.

"She is a valuable pawn in our game. Don't fret, she won't cause any harm," Theodora assured with a smile, gently grasping her son's hand, which was damp with cold sweat. "For now, put Bastian's wife out of your mind. Concentrate on learning the workings of the company and assist your father in his difficulties. And, of course, fulfill your duties as a loyal fiancé to Ella."

"What are you contemplating? You are well aware of the kind of person Bastian is. If something goes awry, Odette could be in jeopardy," Theodora expressed her concern.

"Franz, you must remain composed. Do you honestly believe now is the opportune moment for you to be consumed by worry for her?" she questioned, trying to bring a sense of calm to the situation.

With a sigh, Theodora rose from her seat, observing Franz, who appeared astonishingly feeble. In that moment, he evoked both pity and a sense of pathos. It seemed that all of this stemmed from the influence cast by the woman's son.

"You just need to live your life diligently, one step at a time. If things go smoothly, that desirable outcome will naturally be yours, so don't worry," Theodora reassured, her affection for her beloved son still evident in her expression.

Bastian was not a naive individual. It was evident that while she could manipulate his wife to their advantage, she couldn't keep such a secret hidden indefinitely.

Regardless, Odette was merely a card to be utilized for a temporary period. Even if the truth were to be exposed, it would be handled with finesse. Bastian possessed the skill and ability to manage such situations efficiently.

If, by some stroke of luck, Odette were to secure a divorce, there would be no obstacle preventing Theodora from bestowing the child upon Franz as a gift. While the notion that Odette was a woman associated with Bastian held an undertone of unease, when viewed from a different perspective, it amplified her value as a prized possession. Ultimately, it would be Franz who would claim her.

"If you desire to have her, demonstrate your worthiness. Understood?" Theodora communicated her request as she firmly grasped her son's shoulders.

Franz was taken aback by the revelation, unable to deny its truth. He gazed at Theodora in a state of blank astonishment, then shifted his gaze towards the open window with curtains billowing. In that moment, as their eyes met once more, Theodora sensed a certainty. There was no possibility that this young man would fail in his task.

Franz, in various respects, was an estranged child, and such was the nature of blinded love.



Upon reaching the Ferris wheel, they arrived 30 minutes ahead of schedule. Bastian narrowed his eyes, examining his watch intently.

"I'm alright," Odette assured.

Throughout their time together, Odette persistently echoed the same response as they strolled through the amusement park. Whether it was rides, snacks, puppet shows, or souvenirs, Bastian attempted to offer various things, but the consistent answer remained unchanged. As a result, they aimlessly meandered around the park, and before he realized it, it was time for his appointment. In light of this, Bastian couldn't help but wonder what exactly intrigued her. She was a woman of puzzling complexity.


"Would you care to go on a ride?" Bastian asked politely, surprising Odette with his unexpected question.

"I'm fine," she replied, offering a polite smile. However, this time, the silence that followed seemed unusually prolonged.

Bastian, feeling perplexed, directed his gaze downwards towards Odette, who stood beside him. He noticed her gaze fixed upon the Ferris wheel, her eyes carrying a hint of seriousness.


"Will it be finished in 30 minutes?" After some time, Odette cautiously turned her head and inquired. It appeared that the reason behind her freshly flushed cheeks was not solely due to the chilly autumn evening.

"Perhaps," Bastian responded without hesitation. Although he lacked knowledge about the specific boarding time for the ride, he answered confidently.

"As long as you're alright, then yes, let's go," Odette affirmed, her gaze fixed on the Ferris wheel once more, nodding in agreement.

Bastian couldn't help but chuckle at the air of elegance displayed by Odette as she gave her consent. In response, a serene smile graced Odette's face as she quietly observed his expression. It was a look that made Bastian feel as though he was witnessing the blossoming of a flower, a truly captivating moment.

Instead of providing a verbal response, Bastian chose a different course of action. He reached out and firmly grasped Odette's hand, taking a decisive stride forward. It was a significant step towards their ultimate destination, symbolizing the answer he had finally discovered.


Chapter 72
Like That Light








"Oh my, I apologize for this," the Ferris wheel manager said with a kind smile as he reached the barrier line, marking the restricted area with a gentle tap.

When Odette approached the sign positioned at the center of the chain, the final passenger of the Ferris wheel disembarked.

"We had to close early today due to an issue with the rotating shaft, which was causing an increasing noise. I decided to shut it down for inspection. I hope you understand," the manager explained hurriedly, making his way towards the machine room. With a quick motion, he pulled down the lever, and a sharp metallic sound resonated through the air, bringing the Ferris wheel to a halt.

"It's alright, Bastian," Odette said, her expression tinged with disappointment. Though unfortunate, it was nothing out of the ordinary. She preferred not to dwell on things she had to accept, maintaining a resilient spirit that had carried her through thus far.

"How about something else?" Bastian turned around, gesturing with a nod of his chin towards the other side of the amusement park. "We could try the merry-go-round, or..."

"Now is the time I promised Tira," Odette interrupted gently, her smile softening. She reached out and took hold of Bastian's sleeve. "I've had plenty of enjoyable moments today, so that's enough. Let's not dwell on it."


"I'm not accustomed to your intricate way of speaking, Odette," Bastian remarked, his gaze shifting from the static scenery back to Odette. His head tilted, bringing his eyes to meet Odette's level. "Are you truly alright?" His tone matched his straightforwardness as he asked.

"Yes, I genuinely mean it," Odette replied, taking a small step back and nodding. Her eyes quivered slightly, yet her voice remained steady and composed. "Let's find a bench and rest until Tira arrives. I've been walking quite a bit, and I'm feeling a bit tired."


Having deftly concluded their conversation, Odette swiftly departed from the Ferris wheel. She sensed Bastian's gaze upon her back but refrained from turning around. She assumed everything was in order. However, it wasn't until later that she noticed Bastian's absence.

Sitting on a bench to catch her breath, Odette scanned her surroundings with a perplexed expression. It seemed they had left the Ferris wheel together, but Bastian had vanished without a trace.


"Bastian!" Odette exclaimed, rising swiftly from the bench. The surroundings were hushed due to the Ferris wheel's cessation of operation, making it implausible for their paths to have diverged. After all, Bastian was the type of person who never failed to notice Odette, even in a crowd.

Calling out his name several more times without receiving a response, Odette hastened her steps as she circled the Ferris wheel. Just as she started to entertain the suspicion that he might be playing a mischievous prank, Bastian emerged into view.

Odette sighed in exasperation as she sat back down on the bench for a second time. Bastian was walking up to Odette in a casual manner. In one of his hands, he was clutching a cup made of colorful paper.

"Take it." The item was handed over to Odette, who was present and stood there when Bastian did so.

It looked like chocolate, with a cloud of white steam rising.



"I’m so sorry, Bastian," Odette said with a tinge of remorse, glancing at her watch before lowering her head. She attributed the delay to her half-sister's failure to arrive at the agreed-upon time.

Bastian chuckled softly, observing how many times Odette had found herself in a similar apologetic situation within just two days. It sparked his curiosity about the intricate history shared between the two sisters in their past lives.

"Do you always behave like this?" Bastian's eyes narrowed slightly as he lowered his gaze. Odette observed him, still clutching the untouched cocoa in her hands. "When your sister faces an accident, you fervently pray. It appears to be a relationship defined by strict roles."

"I apologize, once aga—" 

"I don't need an apology, Odette. Especially not from you."  She was swiftly interrupted by Bastian's resolute tone. 

In spite of the fact that Odette acted as though she were the mother of her half-sister, she was actually simply a young woman who had recently turned 20 years old. Up until this point, Bastian had written it off as merely her foolish and pathetic side; however, now that he has arrived to this point, he has become truly curious. 

What the hell does this woman's family mean to her if she was willing to devote herself to them with such unquestioning devotion?

"Regardless, she is your younger half-sister, born from a different stomach. Perhapsthe most honorable action taken by Duke Dyssen was to refrain from bestowing his surname upon the illegitimate daughter of a maid,  don't you think?" Bastian voiced his perspective.

"I understand your viewpoint, and it's not an entirely incorrect opinion. But, Bastian... please refrain from speaking about my family in that manner." After pausing for a moment, Odette cautiously offered her counterargument. "It's not Tira's fault that she was born out of wedlock. It's our father's responsibility and something he should feel ashamed of."

"Seems like your family's love is solely reserved for your half-sister, isn't it?"

"Because my father chose to abandon his role as my father," Odette whispered softly, a hint of loneliness passing over her lips. She had made great sacrifices to come to terms with this truth, yet Bastian refrained from mentioning the Duke Dysen's name any longer. "No matter what anyone says, Tira is my family. And I will never feel ashamed of my family,"

"Will Tira truly love you to that extent?" Bastian asked.

"Even if that's not the case, it's alright," Odette replied, her smile exuding comfort as she turned towards him. "I don't desire for Tira's love to be overwhelming to the point of pain. Instead, I wish for her to simply like me. Someone whose heart feels bright and joyous at the mere thought of me," 

With a serene expression, Odette raised her gaze and fixed her eyes on the Ferris wheel after taking the final sip of cocoa. Despite the ride's cessation, its lights continued to illuminate the night sky, resembling the kind of radiance she sought.

Bastian kept his gaze steady on Odette while maintaining a low whisper. The woman who was daydreaming about the bright lights of an amusement park had a serene look on her face, as if the water were calm and still.

He was clueless about it.

After giving it a great deal of consideration, Bastian was unable to arrive at any other conclusion. Odette's statements were not adequately understood. In addition to that, it was very similar to a foreign language that he had never mastered.

"By the way, Bastian," 

A voice as enchanting as the night itself broke through the deepening silence. Odette had a tendency to frequently address her conversational partners by name, a habit Bastian found himself somewhat drawn to avoid acknowledging.

"I don't believe it's a negative thing that I can't ride the Ferris wheel. Thanks to you, I had the opportunity to admire it from here to my heart's content. It appears even more beautiful up close.”

"Don't you think you're excessively justifying yourself?" Bastian retorted, questioning her line of thought.

"You're welcome. Inside the Ferris wheel, you can't see the Ferris wheel itself. If I had been riding it, I wouldn't have been able to enjoy this beautiful view," Odette replied, turning her head and gracing Bastian with a radiant smile. "Thanks to you, I've created wonderful memories. Thank you, Bastian."

"Let's ride together next time. There's a Ferris wheel like this in Ratz as well," Bastian impulsively promised, his words tinged with the sense of bidding a final farewell, stirred by Odette's presence.

Odette, who had been gazing at Bastian for a while, responded with a soft, smiling glance instead of providing a verbal answer. Then, with a graceful and effortless motion, she rose from the bench. Her purpose was to discard the empty paper cups, a task she accomplished naturally.


However, even after attaining her objective, Odette didn't return. She halted a few steps away from the bench, her gaze fixated on the Ferris wheel with awe.

Bastian rose from his seat and approached Odette. She must have sensed his presence, yet she refused to meet his eyes. Growing impatient, Bastian advanced, positioning himself to block her path.

Taken aback, Odette turned her head away, but Bastian remained determined. He reached out his hand, gently cupping her face, and looked at her intently.

Gone were the surprise and fear that once filled her eyes, replaced now by a gaze that held only him within its depths. Their radiance resembling the serene and crystalline surface of calm waters. 

She appeared anxious, yet there was no sign of resistance in her expression. Bastian's hand, which had been tenderly grazing her cheek, gently brushed against her quivering red lips.

"Sister!"

At that very moment, when the unfamiliar sensation that had stirred within their chests transformed into a lingering sigh, a familiar voice resonated. Startled, Odette hastily retreated from him, taken aback by the sudden interruption.

Bastian, choosing to step back at that moment, willingly released his hold on her. As he lowered his gaze to his fingertips, still tingling with the lingering sensation of her soft touch, Odette departed. Her path led her towards Tira, the beloved family member she cherished dearly, despite the delay.



"I believe the teachers genuinely like you. But who wouldn't? Their fondness for you has even bolstered my own spirits. See? How high did it soar? It must be taller than the Ferris wheel at the amusement park," Tira's enthusiastic voice resonated across the campus, mingling with the falling autumn leaves.

Odette attentively listened to Tira's lively chatter, responding with a warm smile. She knew that Tira tended to exhibit more varied emotions when her feelings were intense. Yet, Odette refrained from pointing it out, understanding that Tira was making an effort to conceal the sadness that lay ahead of their impending separation.

Odette's vacation reached its conclusion as she arrived at Gillis Girls' Academy for the parents' event. It was 4:00 PM, and she stood in front of the school gate, only ten minutes away from the time Bastian had informed her earlier that day.

"I still can't believe you're here, sister," Tira remarked, a hint of disbelief in her voice. "Even though I saw you every day for three consecutive days. Is it because our time together was too short? It feels like a dream." Tira's steps slowed down significantly as she noticed a black car parked outside the school gate. Although she wore a bright smile, her eyes already showed signs of redness. She was a child who shed tears as readily as she laughed.


"Take good care of yourself and study diligently, Tira. So when I next meet your homeroom teacher, my pride will soar like a Ferris wheel." Odette halted her steps and gently opened Tira's school uniform jacket, a tender gesture filled with love. 

"I'm sorry, sister. Even though I love you, it seems challenging," Tira confessed, her expression a mix of a grimace and laughter, on the verge of tears. Odette reached into her purse and retrieved a handkerchief, delicately wiping away Tira's tears.

"When we meet again, I'll introduce you to my new family. I'm sure you'll love Margrethe too. You've always wanted a dog, haven't you?" 

"What good is that? My family is broken apart now," Tira responded, her gaze fixed on the car beyond the school gate, resembling a child who had lost a cherished toy.

"If you're going to throw a tantrum like that, you might as well go back," Odette replied calmly, diffusing the tension. Tira quickly realized her outburst and promptly apologized.

As Tira's agitated emotions gradually settled, Odette resumed walking, their footsteps creating an echo on the path adorned with fallen leaves.

"I'm glad you're doing well. Thank you, Tira," 

"What is there for you to be thankful for? I'm just a younger sister who doesn't contribute much. It's me who should be grateful and apologetic," Tira responded, her voice tinged with a mix of emotions.

By the time tears welled up in Tira's eyes once again, the two sisters had reached the gate. The driver, recognizing Odette, hastily emerged from the car.

"Goodbye, sis. I love you," Tira sobbed as she hugged Odette tightly, her voice filled with tears.

"Take care and stay well," Odette bid farewell in a composed tone. "I love you, Tira."

A soft sob echoed in the air, but fortunately, Tira seemed unaware of it. After gently disentangling herself from her sister's embrace, Odette approached the waiting car where the driver stood. The sound of Tira's whimpering reached her ears, yet she resisted the urge to look back.

Taking a seat next to Bastian, Odette closed the door behind her, and the car began to move.

It was not until the driver settled back into the driver's seat and the passing scenery outside the window began to blur that Odette mustered the courage to steal a glance behind her. Tira was still there, waving her hand and crying as if she were Odette's own child.

"Odette," Bastian called out, his voice cutting through the moment. The car was now picking up speed, and Bastian gently grasped Odette's chin, redirecting her gaze away from the distant landscape.

Momentarily caught off guard by the unexpected gesture, Odette quickly regained her composure. Politely, she gently moved his hand aside and composed herself, straightening her posture. Instead of uttering words of apology, she expressed her remorse through a brief moment of silence.


Chapter 73
But What If









Odette was taken aback as she received an unexpected invitation from a familiar yet distant place. The name on the invitation, Theodora Klauswitz, puzzled her. 

She requested Odette's presence at her home for a tea time meeting sometime during the following week. The simplicity of the reason only added to Odette's confusion. Ever since Theodora and her family reluctantly attended her wedding, there had been no personal communication between them. Considering the strained and perpetual tension between Bastian and his father, this invitation seemed even more perplexing and difficult to comprehend.

Odette read the invitation repeatedly, her mind consumed with thoughts, before setting it down on the desk.

 As she tried to gather her scattered thoughts, Margrethe, who had just awakened from her slumber, approached Odette. The delicate pink lace collar that Odette had crafted to conceal the cruelly shorn patches of fur on Margrethe's body fluttered as she groaned and affectionately scratched against Odette's leg.

In the midst of Margrethe's playful antics, Odette found herself momentarily distracted from the weighty matter at hand, and a smile graced her face as she embraced her furry companion. 

When Odette fed Margrethe pieces of dried meat from the drawer, the soft clinking of tea cups being filled resonated in the background, signaling the arrival of their tea.

"It looks like Meg enjoyed a satisfying breakfast." Dora commented with a smile.

 "I didn't give her as much as before," Odette said, recalling her commitment to providing the appropriate portion of snacks.

Having finished her piece of meat, Margrethe gazed eagerly at the treat box on the desk, wagging her tail in excitement. Unable to resist the playful temptation, Dora teasingly took the treat box away.

"I understand your deep affection for Meg, madam, but it won't be long before she becomes a professional house thief," Dora remarked with a touch of humor. 

"I apologize for breaking my promise."

"It appears you do have a soft spot after all. Perhaps it's time to find a strict nanny, madam." Dora playfully suggested, adding an unusual jest to her words. Odette, a bit slow to grasp the full meaning behind Dora's statement, awkwardly smiled and averted her gaze.

"I apologize for the presumptuousness, madam, but I feel compelled to bring up the matter of an invitation from the Master's family," Dora hesitated as she glanced at the desk, struggling to find the right words. "In my humble opinion, I believe you should decline the invitation. However, please remember that this decision ultimately rests with you."

"Dora, I share the same thoughts as you," Odette acknowledged. Setting Margrethe down gently, she reached for the troublesome invitation once more. 

Observing how meticulously Dora had chosen her words, Odette sensed that there was a far more intricate tale behind this invitation than initially anticipated. 

"Dora, may I seek your counsel once more? I could use one more piece of advice."

As Odette posed her question with caution, Dora nodded, awaiting her inquiry. "Yes, madam. Anything," 

"Should I discuss this matter with my husband?"

"Madam, it appears you have the capability to handle it as you see fit. With the approaching festival, it would bring immense honor to the master on that day. There is no need to burden him with unnecessary concerns," 

"Is that so? In that case, I shall stand my ground and decline," 

"That is an excellent decision. The master would not be pleased to hear that name," 

Dora's eyes lit up with excitement. Her expression revealed her readiness to divulge the intricate history of the Klauswitz family, meticulously prepared to share the details.

"Thank you, Dora. Your assistance has been invaluable," Odette expressed her gratitude sincerely. She calmly chose to ignore the signal, knowing deep down that she didn't want to uncover whatever secrets Bastian might be hiding through such means. 

Their relationship was not entangled, and there was no need to needlessly complicate things. With a resolute decision made, Odette reached for a pen and began drafting the letter of refusal. Fortunately, Dora had guided her in the right direction.

 "Now, it's time to prepare for our guests," Dora mentioned, bringing up the next item on the agenda just as Odette sealed the letter.

"Yes? Oh...yes, I'll take care of it," Odette responded, her gaze flickering slightly as a memory resurfaced. She recalled the appointment she had made with a newspaper journalist for an upcoming interview. 

The purpose of the interview was to delve deep into the life of Bastian Klauswitz, the central figure of the naval festival, which would be featured in the empire's leading daily newspaper. Odette was included in the schedule to provide a photograph for the article.

A request was made for a photograph featuring the Klauswitz couple, intended for use as propaganda. The prospect of their faces being publicly recognized in such a manner was far from appealing, yet Odette found herself with no alternative. The looming command of the Emperor left her with no room for refusal, and reluctantly, Bastian agreed to comply.

‘it was part of an effort to secure Princess Isabelle's national marriage,  If you don't feel like it, convince the emperor.’ he said

For Odette, it was akin to being informed that she must stand before a camera without any room for objection.

Odette concluded as she rose from her seat with a pleasant grin that this, too, was part of her job.

It was time for her to take on the role of wife.



The interview unfolded in the grandeur of the guest parlor, a spacious room adorned with tall, expansive windows that showcased the awe-inspiring vista of Ardenne's sea. 

Bastian, a devoted and honorable soldier of the Empire, effortlessly fulfilled the assigned task. The majority of the reporter's inquiries fell within the anticipated spectrum, and Bastian's responses flowed smoothly, having been reiterated numerous times before.

"Thank you for your valuable time, Captain. I will now proceed with taking photographs to conclude the interview," the journalist expressed, closing their notebook and extending a polite farewell. Bastian gracefully rose from his seat, responding with a suitable acknowledgment. Odette, who had remained as silent as a shadow, quietly trailed behind him.

Bastian swiftly retrieved and put on his gloves before skillfully guiding his wife out onto the balcony, where the photographer patiently awaited their arrival. Odette adorned a white dress that complemented Bastian's uniform, clearly mindful not to overshadow the central figure, yet exuding the grace befitting her role. Odette Klauswitz proved herself to be a devoted wife, a fact that Bastian accepted without any lingering uncertainty.

"Please take a seat here, ma'am. And Captain, please stand right here," instructed the photographer's assistant, presenting the desired composition for the photograph. Following the instructions, Odette gracefully took her place on the prepared chair, while Bastian positioned himself behind her, assuming a poised stance for the photo.

After all the preparations had been completed, the photographer suddenly voiced his dissatisfaction, "This composition doesn't quite seem to be working, especially considering the Lieutenant's height. Captain, I apologize for the inconvenience, but would you mind taking a seat instead?" Casting a discerning gaze over the subjects, the photographer proposed an alternative approach.

Once again, they dutifully adhered to the photographer's suggestion. Bastian occupied the chair initially prepared for Odette, while Odette positioned herself where Bastian had previously stood. Finally, the photographer nodded in contentment. 

"Could you both come a bit closer?" the photographer requested, gesturing accordingly. Odette took a step nearer as instructed. 

The familiar fragrance of her meticulously prepared body, an aroma nurtured each evening, mingled with the gentle sea breeze and tantalized their senses. The radiant light from the pristine, expansive sky was dazzling, and in that very brilliance, Odette herself seemed to emit a radiant glow.

Had Bastian chosen to do so, he could have rejected the request. However, Bastian accepted this reality with composure and averted his gaze. The radiant sunlight streaming down from the lofty and cloudless sky was blinding, and Odette, immersed in that luminosity, shone just as brilliantly.

The Emperor's desire to utilize a photograph of the affectionate couple, Captain Klauswitz and his wife, as propaganda material for the naval festival was once again communicated through Admiral Demel, as customary. However, this time it came with a condition that Bastian's honor would not be compromised. It was a stark contrast to the past, when he was relentlessly pushed forward without any consideration. With such an honorable excuse at hand, Bastian had the option to decline the interview and photograph. 

The Emperor held a particular fondness and pride for the North Sea Fleet. No matter how crucial it was to appease Crown Prince Belof, the Emperor would not opt to tarnish the reputation of the hero of the Battle of Trosa.

Despite being fully aware of the circumstances, Bastian complied with the request because it was what he desired—a moment captured in a photograph with Odette. 

As he confronted a resolute conclusion, a subtle tension coursed through Bastian's hand resting on his knee. Odette, who had maintained her gaze straight ahead, finally shifted her eyes toward him. The fleeting surprise in her eyes quickly dissipated, replaced by her graceful smile. 

"Both of you, look straight ahead!" called out the photographer, who had retreated beneath the dark cloth once again.

With a sense of duty resurfacing, Bastian averted his gaze from Odette. As the photographer signaled, an assistant stationed at the far end of the balcony swiftly approached, meticulously adjusting the appearance of their uniforms. Ensuring the epaulets and decorative cords were properly aligned, the assistant then departed, signaling that all preparations had been completed. 

Bastian fixed his gaze directly at the camera, his determination shining through. There were no plans to preserve any photographs or portraits commemorating this marriage. It had been decided that there was no need to preserve remnants of a contract that spanned only two years. 

But, what if...

The flawless facade of his grand plan began to show cracks ever since their marriage. Bastian had made that decision under the assumption that Odette was merely a tool to strike a deal with the emperor, serving no purpose beyond that. However, if Odette could continue to offer substantial advantages as his wife even beyond that initial arrangement, the narrative would take a different turn.

The process of undermining his father was progressing with unexpected speed and ease. If the trajectory remained the same, it appeared feasible to accomplish the objective without the need for a marriage alliance with Laviere. 

While their existing collaboration with the railway company would be implicated, successful completion of the ongoing project would grant them a fair share of the operating rights. Duke Laviere, known for his astute calculations, would not hesitate to strike a deal that promised substantial profits without sacrificing his daughter.

If such were the circumstances, it wouldn't be entirely unfavorable to carry on with this marriage. With that realization, there seemed to be no reason to decline the photo shoot requested by the Emperor.

"Now, this will be the final shot. Ma'am, if you could show a bit more affection and place your hand on the Captain's shoulder?" The photographer's call reverberated through the tranquility.

Odette complied with the final instruction, her hands gently resting on Bastian's shoulders, their fingers interlaced. The photographer appeared content as he began to count aloud. 

Upon fulfilling the assigned task, untangling the intricate web of relationships, and the day arriving when they could start afresh, perhaps considering Odette as a genuine wife and building a family wouldn't be so unfavorable.

 Feeling the warmth transmitted through his shoulder from Odette's touch, Bastian confronted his burgeoning desires. Then, just as his assumptions were being affirmed, a brilliant flash of white light temporarily blinded his vision.

Chapter 74
Marriage's Proof








The Hero and the Beauty. The photographs of Captain Klauswitz and his wife were accompanied by rather endearing compliments. 

With a wry smile, Theodora opened today's newspaper. The featured article about this year's naval festival was akin to a tribute to Bastian Klauswitz. The extent to which the Admiralty praised the grandson of a junk dealer as a hero was so disheartening that it caused a pang in her chest. 

She casually discarded the folded newspaper to the edge of the table where the morning tea was arranged, ensuring that Bastian's photo remained hidden from view.

Theodora pondered the possibility of granting her husband's wish to groom Franz into an army officer. However, deep down, she understood that such a pursuit would be futile. Franz was never cut out for a military career, regardless of his father's insistence. Even if he had reluctantly acquiesced to his father's demands, it would only have ended in his eventual inability to endure the path.

Theodora acknowledged Franz's wise decision and dismissed her own futile worries by ringing the bell. Within moments, Nancy appeared in response to the summons.

 "I received a message from Molly," Nancy disclosed, approaching the bed and extending a letter that she had concealed up her sleeve.

 Theodora accepted it, setting her teacup aside, and read the letter that outlined Odette Klauswitz's meticulously planned schedule for the week. It appeared that the most suitable time for their purpose would be in the afternoon today.

"I have great admiration for your niece. If things go as planned, I will always remember her and your contribution," Theodora praised her loyal maid, beaming with a wide smile. 

The morning sun's radiant rays bathed Nancy, who wore a deeply moved expression on her face. Ever since Theodora received the letter from Duke Dyssen, she had kept the curtains open, allowing the sunlight to stream into the room. The sight of the twin mansions standing opposite each other no longer seemed unfavorable; instead, it ignited her motivation.

"Get ready to go out. I'm heading to Ratz. We'll leave around noon," Theodora announced as she lazily stretched upon rising from bed, then made her way to the balcony. 

Odette, Bastian's wife, had declined the invitation, showing her unawareness of Theodora's plans. It was evident that Odette had no knowledge of what Theodora had in mind. As for Molly, it seemed reasonable to trust her innocent demeanor and assume she wasn't playing the role of a double agent. If that was the case, it was time to start taking action.

Leaning against the sun-warmed marble balustrade, Theodora took a drag from her cigarette, savoring the smoke as she gazed across the sea. Bastian's wife had made plans to visit Ratz this afternoon, specifically to see the Countess of Tree, a relative of theirs. 

Exhaling a plume of smoke, Theodora's eyes lingered on the mansion in the distance. "If you won't come to me, then I'll come to you," she murmured with a hint of annoyance. 

The task ahead was bothersome, but Odette Klauswitz warranted such attention. After all, she held significant importance to Theodora, at least for the time being.




Perched on the third floor of the naval headquarters, Admiral Demel's office awaited Bastian's arrival. Ascending the staircase, Bastian reached the top step and discreetly confirmed the envelope tucked securely into his uniform pocket. 

Within it lay his meticulously filled-out service application, destined for Trosa Island, the frontline once more. This task demanded ample time, and it was a decision that had been carefully pondered and deliberated upon.

The downfall of his father wouldn't instantaneously restore everything to its rightful place. The aftermath required a substantial amount of time and effort to clean up the mess left behind. As Bastian contemplated how to effectively utilize that time in a profitable venture, a plan had taken shape in his mind. The service application he held in his hands was the optimal choice he had discovered.

Bastian's involvement in his grandfather's company extended to devising intricate schemes to ensnare his father. However, the subsequent tasks were efficiently managed by Thomas Muller, a pragmatic individual. It was reasonable to believe that Bastian's absence would not result in any detrimental setbacks.

With the envelope securely tucked back into his pocket, Bastian resumed his interrupted stride. The sound of his firm footsteps reverberated through the lengthy corridor. 

The reason for his extended deliberation stemmed from the demands of the Navy department's work. The counsel from his peers that serving at the headquarters would prove beneficial to his career carried weight.

Bastian's own musings echoed a similar sentiment. Ascending to esteemed ranks was not solely a product of exceptional prowess. Unavoidably, navigating through the intricacies of politics with limited authority was imperative, and occupying pivotal roles within the headquarters presented a formidable weapon to gain advantage in the fight against his father.

By following such calculations, it seemed prudent to remain in this position. Yet his resolve to avoid a lifelong existence as a soldier remained unwavering. Instead, he reasoned that donning the military attire for a period would serve to fortify the honor he had diligently earned thus far. If that were the case, adorning a few more glistening medals, perhaps those befitting a major, would be the perfect finishing touch, enhancing his achievements.

and Odette.

Bastian couldn't shake off the name that kept echoing in his mind, causing him to slow down as he repeatedly wrote, tore, and rewrote his job application. 

if she to become my real wife…

The mere thought haunted him, lingering in his subconscious. What was once a hazy daydream had now taken on a tangible form, consuming his thoughts regularly.

Odette exemplified unwavering dedication and love towards her family, which assured Bastian that she would undoubtedly remain loyal to their new family too. Even if her current feelings towards him were not romantic, Bastian was confident that over time, her affection for him would blossom. Although he wasn't quite familiar with the concept of a harmonious family, he believed he could provide a better family environment for her compared to the Dyssen family, who had exploited her throughout her life.

Bastian knew he had much to offer as a husband to Odette.

He was determined to bestow upon her a life of unparalleled nobility, surpassing that of any aristocrat and  vowed to provide her with the most precious and exquisite things the world had to offer. Whatever her heart desired, he would stop at nothing to acquire it. Above all, he would shield her from any further hardships, ensuring that no more stains tainted her already challenging life.

With unwavering conviction, Bastian believed he could embody the role of a devoted husband, a caring father, and the cornerstone of a loving family. It was only a matter of time before their hearts would intertwine, as Odette had never been a woman who would betray his trust.

The possibility of attaining such a fulfilling life made him contemplate relinquishing the alliance with Laviere. Yet, he acknowledged that this inclination might be nothing more than a fleeting impulse, a delusion fueled by his longing for the woman he desired.

However, as he reasoned that time could potentially resolve this predicament, he decisively penned his signature on the service application. It was a resolute choice, devoid of any lingering uncertainties.

Bastian reached Admiral Demel's office and took a moment to straighten his posture before lightly tapping on the door. 

"Come in," the admiral answered, his voice coming through the closed door as strong and cheerful as always.





"Take a look at this. It's wonderful to have such compelling evidence," remarked Countess Trier with a satisfied smile, as she unfolded the newspaper in her hands.

Upon laying eyes on the photograph, Odette responded with a soft smile and gently cast her gaze downward. The stirring of a cup, with sugar long dissolved, filled the air, adding to the quietude that enveloped them.

"I've always been troubled by the absence of a wedding photograph for the both of you. Whenever the portrait artist was mentioned, he consistently refused. It almost led me to suspect that your husband was intentionally avoiding any evidence of the marriage," 

"That's not the case. Bastian..." 

"I completely understand and comprehend. Please don't fret. Observing the warmth and affection displayed by your husband, it's evident that the two of you are still immersed in the honeymoon phase," Countess Trier reassured, setting aside the newspaper as she let out a joyful laugh and applauded. "If his intentions were malicious, he wouldn't proudly showcase his wife to the entire Empire. It appears his feelings for you run even deeper than I had initially perceived. There's no need for you to harbor unnecessary worries any longer."

As Countess Trier tightened her grip on the teacup, the delicately crafted sapphire ring glimmered on her wrinkled hand, catching the light.

Odette's gaze fixated on the subtle, ethereal blue radiance of the ring. With a practiced smile, she concealed her inner turmoil once more. It was a challenging misconception, one that couldn't be easily clarified or explained.

Countess Trier began showering Bastian with effusive praise, a complete reversal from her hesitant demeanor when she reluctantly delivered the news of their marriage. The stark contrast in her attitude was impossible to ignore.

Odette gently placed the teaspoon she had been idly playing with, her gaze fixated on her own reflection mirrored in the teacup.

Just as Countess Trier had mentioned, Bastian had been meticulous in avoiding any traces of their marriage. Only now did Odette start to grasp the underlying motives behind the excessive acclaim and acknowledgment bestowed upon him. It was a situation that could easily arouse suspicion.

Odette couldn't help but feel a tinge of foolishness for not recognizing it sooner. Thankfully, Bastian's foresight had allowed them to quell any doubts that might have arisen, a stroke of good fortune they were fortunate to have.

"Still no news of a child?" Countess Trier's chattering came to an abrupt halt, culminating in a perplexing question.

Odette answered the inquiry with a slight nod and cast her eyes downward. "...No, not yet," 

"Well, both of you are still young and healthy, so there's no need to be hasty. However, do understand the longing in this old woman's heart, yearning to cradle your baby as soon as possible. A child born to such extraordinary parents, imagine the sheer beauty they will possess!" Countess Trier shifted her attention back to the picture in the newspaper, providing Odette with a moment to compose herself and arrange her expression.

In recent times, discussions about children had been cropping up more frequently, indicating that the topic was drawing near. However, Odette found respite from these awkward inquiries only when Bastian was away on the battlefield.

As her thoughts reached this juncture, Odette began to comprehend Bastian's choice to depart from Berg. He proved to be a skilled captain in the journey of their marriage, skillfully charting a course toward their desired destination. His triumph would be her triumph, so all Odette needed to do was place her trust in him and follow his lead.

"Excuse me, a letter has been received for Mrs. Klauswitz," announced the maid, presenting a tightly sealed envelope just as Odette had started to regain her smile.

Perplexed by the unexpected development, Odette inquired about the origin of the letter, her voice tinged with surprise. The maid nodded emphatically, providing additional details to shed light on the matter.

"The letter was delivered by a messenger, marked as urgent, which is why it was brought to your current location. It bears a message from Lady Rahner," the maid explained.

Rahner. 

Odette silently echoed the unfamiliar name in her thoughts as she carefully opened the envelope. The sight of the opulently adorned golden letter paper caused a sudden tightening in her chest, as if her throat constricted. 

While there was no explicit indication of the sender's identity, Odette instinctively recognized it. She had encountered this distinct, custom-made letter paper before.

Theodora Klauswitz…., someone who wasn't bound by blood but regarded as family. A connection beyond mere neighbors, akin to true neighbors. That was who she was.

Odette recalled the recent invitation she had received from Theodora, adorned with the same distinct golden pattern. The familiarity of it all resonated deeply within her.

"Are you alright, Odette? Did you receive some distressing news?" Countess Trier's concerned question snapped Odette out of her reverie, prompting her to swiftly regain her composure.

"...No, it's nothing," Odette hurriedly said, gripping the small folded letter tightly in her hands. "It was from the wife of a high-ranking officer whom I know. She mentions an urgent matter to discuss regarding the Navy Festival."

Despite her hands trembling from the cold, Odette mustered a convincing smile. Thankfully, Countess Trier nodded without a hint of suspicion.

"It's regrettable, but please go ahead. We cannot overlook the preparations for a day that will bring glory to our family," 

"Thank you for your understanding, Countess," Odette swiftly rose from the tea table, bidding her farewell with politeness.

Managing to depart from the parlor without her unsteady legs attracting notice, Odette hurriedly fled from the House of Trier. She no longer possessed the capacity to pay attention to the inquisitive gazes of the household servants.

Determined to quell any futile doubts, Odette made the choice to temporarily set them aside. Above all else, her priority was to meet Theodora Klauswitz.

With that singular thought guiding her, Odette began running, relying solely on her determination to reach her destination.


Chapter 75
Do You Love Your Husband?








Today, the music store on 12th Rahner Street appeared deserted. Aside from the tired-looking owner seated behind the worn-out display shelves, there were just two customers present. One was a middle-aged woman leisurely browsing through sheet music, while the other was a young lady who seemed out of breath. The speakers filled the space with a vibrant waltz, its melody blending with the shimmering specks of dust suspended in the air.

"Why the rush? You still have ten minutes left," Theodora chuckled, breezing past Odette with a leisurely stroll, seemingly relishing the experience.

Sauntering along the aisles adorned with stacks of antiquated music books, Theodora paused when she reached a corner where an abandoned piano sat, obstructing the view. It provided an ideal spot for a private conversation.

"I'm not surprised," Theodora said calmly, turning her body to directly face Odette, who had hastily caught up with her. Although Odette appeared disheveled from her hurried arrival, Theodora's gaze, while tranquil, carried an underlying sense of stern restraint.

The child displayed remarkable intelligence, leaving no doubt that the first and foremost requirement had been met.

"Why did you summon me through such a preposterously threatening letter?" Odette began boldly, taking a deep breath to deliver her opening statement. Theodora nonchalantly shrugged and flipped open a nearby music book.

"I came across a letter penned by Duke Dyssen himself. It appears that he has regained his complete memory of the day he forgot due to the shock of the accident. How much longer do you intend to perpetuate this falsehood?"

"Are you suggesting that my father personally sent the letter to you?" Odette inquired, seeking clarification. Theodora, with a leisurely demeanor, continued browsing through the bookshelves, a smile playing on her lips. Despite Odette's visibly pale complexion, she met Theodora's gaze without hesitation.

"I suppose that's true," Theodora responded casually.

"I believe my father has misunderstood something," 

"Is that so?" 

"Yes, as you mentioned, my father must have been profoundly affected by the incident that day. It appears that his memories have been greatly distorted as a result."

"Ah, distorted memories," Theodora remarked.

"I regret that you recklessly believed the words of a patient who was in a vulnerable state of mind and body. I will give you the benefit of the doubt this time, but I kindly request that you refrain from insulting me and Tira in such a manner again. Furthermore, I hope you will cease prying into my whereabouts."

Without displaying any surprise, Theodora appreciated the fact that Odette possessed a bolder side than her appearance suggested. 

"If you have nothing else to add, I shall take my leave," Odette declared, maintaining a composed demeanor. After carefully scanning her surroundings, she bid a polite farewell. 

Theodora silently observed her departure, a hint of delight sparkling in her eyes. She had initially regarded Odette as a pawn to be cautiously utilized, but this unforeseen turn of events brought her a sense of satisfaction.

While a lone woman might not possess the ability to single-handedly bring Bastian down, her involvement could still result in a substantial impact. Even if their plans didn't unfold exactly as intended, they had little to lose. After all, their relationship was far from its best state.

If Bastian, upon uncovering his wife's act of betrayal, opted for a divorce, it could potentially be a blessing in disguise. It could serve as an opportunity to swiftly tarnish his painstakingly built reputation. Being cast out from the Emperor's favor would be an ideal outcome, leaving no room for improvement.

“Wouldn’t it be embarrassing to be so confident in front of me?” Theodora's low humming voice blended into the music. Her heart felt like it was sinking, but Odette turned around without showing anything.

Don't be swayed by her.

"Mrs. Palmer." As Odette tried to convince herself and took a few steps forward, an unexpected name reached her ears. "Does the name ring a bell? The wife of the building caretaker, with whom you resided for three years. Your father thought she might be a valuable witness," Theodora's voice echoed with a hint of amusement. 

Odette stifled a groan, feeling a lump forming in her throat, and abruptly halted her steps.

Tira's claim to have seen the caretaker's wife behind the stair railing flashed through Odette’s mind. Her own image, dismissed as delusions stemming from fear, followed closely behind.

Did Mrs. Palmer really see that?

As Odette attempted to recollect her memories of that day, her efforts only served to intensify her confusion.

"Duke Dyssen requested a three-way meeting, urging the presence of Tira and Mrs. Palmer at the hospital. If his heartless daughter chooses to remain oblivious until the end, I believe it would be fitting to alleviate him of his injustice," Theodora contemplated aloud. "If you depart in this manner, I shall consider it a positive indication. Naturally, I will need to discuss this with Bastian."

Keep going. I have to keep going. 

Pressing forward was imperative. Odette compelled herself with unwavering resolve, yet she found herself unable to even twitch a finger.

Her father's memories had resurfaced, and there was no longer any denying that fact. Moreover, it appeared that Theodora Klauswitz had become privy to all of those recollections.

Tira…


Odette leaned against a bookshelf, seeking support for her faltering legs. Her little sister quivered on her trembling lips, and her breath accelerated to a point where concealing it became impossible. It felt as though she was confronting the scorching noon sun, or rather, a darkness so impenetrable that not even an inch could be discerned ahead.

"Now, it appears we can have a little conversation." 

Theodora's footsteps, previously resonating in unison, came to a halt behind Odette. 

"Bastian is still unaware, isn't he? That calculating man wouldn't have married a woman harboring such a dangerous secret, would he?" Her hand slithered like a water snake, wrapping around Odette's shoulder. "An illegitimate daughter who attempted to kill her own father, and an elder sister who became an accomplice to such a half-sister. A father left crippled by the actions of these two daughters. And now, the central figure in that incident is the daughter of Princess Helene and the wife of the war hero, Bastian Klauswitz. This is an incredibly amusing situation, don't you think? It would be enough to ignite a scandal that would send the entire Empire into a frenzy."


The dormant gramophone suddenly resumed playing music, breaking the silence that had enveloped the room. Odette, opening her tightly shut eyes, instinctively shrugged off the uncomfortable grip on her shoulder. As she pivoted to confront Theodora Klauswitz, her mind unexpectedly cleared.

"If your intention was to create a scandal and besmirch Bastian's reputation, there would have been no need for this summoning and the accompanying threats," Odette looked at Theodora with an unwavering coldness and composure. "Tell me what your motive is. I am willing to listen."

"Before we proceed, allow me to ask you one question," 

Theodora stated, placing the sheet music down and crossing her arms loosely. The sunlight filtering through the window cast its glow upon Odette, who stood trembling yet upright.

 "Do you truly love your husband?" 

The chilling question reverberated alongside the phonograph's melody. Odette found herself unable to provide a straightforward response. No matter how many times she pressed her lips together, the outcome remained unchanged. The immense chasm between her sense of duty and her genuine feelings seemed insurmountable.

"Very well," Theodora nodded, as if receiving a gratifying answer. "It appears we can now proceed with our business."



Bastian traversed the hallway that linked the bedroom of the couple, his steps slower than usual. The exhaustion he had accumulated seemed to intensify, further exacerbated by the intoxication following his shower.

His application for deployment had been submitted successfully. Despite his outward display of disappointment, Admiral Demel, thankfully, did not exhibit further stubbornness. However, Bastian found himself paying the price of being the admiral's drinking companion until late into the night.

As the passage door opened silently, a gentle voice emerged from the shadows. 

“Bastian.” 

Bastian's gaze shifted gradually to the dancing flames of the fireplace, only to discover Odette, whom he presumed to be asleep, standing before him.

"Oh, Odette. I thought you were already in slumber," Bastian stole a quick glance at the table clock resting on the mantelpiece above the crackling fire. The hour had already struck midnight, typically signaling her deep rest.

The silence deepened, punctuated only by the crackling of firewood that filled the air. Bastian patiently waited, but Odette remained unresponsive.

Bathed in the warm glow of the fireplace, she fixed her gaze upon him, unbroken and without end. The lace shawl, once resting on the chair's armrest, slipped silently to the floor, unnoticed by her.

Steering away from his intended path towards the bed, Bastian changed course and moved closer to the fireplace. Retrieving the fallen shawl, he tenderly extended it to her.

Taking a step back, Bastian observed as Odette hastily enveloped herself with the shawl, her pale countenance carrying a subtle flush. It bordered on the comical to witness her assume such a modest, almost nun-like demeanor, yet it was not entirely an inaccurate portrayal. After all, she remained a bride whose marriage had not yet been consummated.

Should everything unfold as intended and the contract come to fruition, Odette would find herself transformed into a chaste divorcee. And the subsequent husband would be her inaugural partner.

As Bastian's musings reached this juncture, a chuckle inadvertently slipped from his lips. 

A virgin divorcee. 

Truly, the world harbors an array of peculiar word pairings.

Yet, if he persisted in such frivolous behavior, it appeared he risked earning the reputation of a divorced and emasculated man. This was not a trifling matter; his actions held weight beyond mere thoughtlessness.

"I believe you've had quite a bit to drink, Bastian,"  Odette said, tightening the shawl around herself.

Bastian smiled and nodded, acknowledging the pitiful nature of his thoughts. They seemed to be the lingering effects of indulging Admiral Demel's desire for excessive drinking.

"Now, let us retire to bed," 

Odette advised with genuine concern, as if tending to an ailing person. While the unnecessary worry didn't leave him with a pleasant sensation, it also didn't entirely displease him. 

"Would you like me to accompany you?" 

"Why don't you sing me a lullaby as well?" Bastian asked playfully.

Odette's eyes widened, taken aback by the unexpected request. Though she appeared aloof due to her lack of emotional fluctuations, she possessed an unexpectedly innocent side.

Bastian released a gentle sigh, closing the remaining gap with his final stride. Odette, startled, instinctively took a step back, but Bastian's movement to place his hand on her shoulder was swifter.

"Odette," he uttered her name with a distinct fervor, infusing his voice with passion.

Bastian's huge hand that had been hanging on to her shoulder and had now let go covered her face as she struggled to keep her breath under control. She struggled a little, but Bastian's hold was too strong to be overcome by her efforts.

"Bastian, please don't do that. I... "

Before Odette could finish her pleading, Bastian leaned in and gave her a passionate kiss. His breath, which was thick with the smell of alcohol and flowed through their opened lips, took her by surprise and did not give her a time to react.

It wasn't a kiss that was aggressive and forceful like the one that came before.

Bastian devoured her lips in deliberately before entwining his tongue with hers. His kiss was quite delicate, but it lingered for a very long time. The same thing happened when he gently stroked her cheek with his hand.

Odette merely bore the strange experience with a blank expression. It seemed to her that Bastian had become intoxicated because the booze that he consumed. No matter how hard she tried, she was unable to conceal the delicious moans that slipped between their combined lips, which only served to intensify her feelings of embarrassment.

The kiss lasted she had forgotten about that terrifying evening.

Odette, fixated on Bastian with a vacant stare, averted her gaze, overcome by an indescribable sensation. However, the memory of his gaze, brimming with an unfamiliar longing, lingered in her thoughts, etched into her consciousness.

"Why?" 

Her mind lost in contemplation, Bastian approached her once more. Before she could attempt to push him away, his lips gently met her forehead.

Odette tried to create distance between herself and Bastian dwindled, but her hands dropped in a gesture of helplessness. Overwhelming confusion overwhelmed her, eroding the remnants of her earlier resolve, leaving behind a persistent question that intertwined hope and despair.

Starting from her eyelids and tracing a path across her cheeks, the journey of Bastian's kisses continued until they reached the bridge of her nose, culminating on her lips.

Bastian exhaled a soft sigh, parting his lips in anticipation. His hand, cradling the back of her head, tenderly caressed Odette's disheveled locks, much like her own gentle touch when she comforted Margrethe. It was a touch imbued with tenderness and authenticity.

"Bastian…."

Odette whispered amid her lips, reddened and moist, infused with a glimmer of hope. From his silent gaze, a comforting warmth radiated, reminiscent of the cozy glow emanating from the fireplace.

"Is there something that you wanted to say...?" 

She nervously raised her hand and grabbed the cuff of Bastian's sleeve as she raised her voice.


Chapter 76
If Someone Has to Go to Hell








Her dilated pupil, brimming with Bastian's presence, gleamed with a luminosity. Within that gaze lay an emotion akin to trust, distinct from the time when fear and vigilance clouded her eyes.

Bastian looked at Odette with tender serenity, his words momentarily held in gentle silence. He had reached a definitive resolution, and now was the opportune moment to convey it to Odette. 

He was acutely aware of this. But what should he say?

'Let's go together.' 

He yearned to utter those words that lingered at the tip of his tongue.

Situated on the Trosa Islands within the Berg Territory, there were dwellings allocated for military families stationed in the Northern Fleet. While it couldn't be equated with the luxurious lifestyle they currently enjoyed, it provided a peaceful and suitable environment where they wouldn't endure hardships.

 Odette, being no stranger to a life outside the social realm, possessed the adaptability to thrive in such circumstances as well. Perhaps, it could serve as an ideal location for their honeymoon, away from prying eyes and unwanted intrusions.

This was precisely why Bastian found himself unable to articulate those words in the end.

The choice of bringing Odette to the new assignment felt like a proclamation that their marriage would endure eternally. However, as desire intensified, so did doubts.

There was no denying Odette's stunning beauty. 

Bastian was acutely aware of how effortlessly he could be entranced by a woman of her allure. In fact, it may have already happened.

For a while now, emotions had overridden reason whenever he stood in front of her. It would be imprudent to base the trajectory of his entire life on judgments made in such a state. Consequently, opting to proceed alone after their decision might prove beneficial for both of them.

"No," Bastian hesitated once more, "there's nothing."

A serene response intertwined with the warm glow that permeated the surrounding darkness.

 "Ah," Odettw nodded. A sudden soreness tingled in the fingertips where she had released her hold on Bastian's sleeves.

Just as she was about to take a step back, Bastian leaned in, capturing her with another kiss. His lips brushed against her cheek, still radiating warmth, but it was merely that—a fleeting warmth.

While her father's intoxication often led to verbal abuse and destructive behavior, Bastian, on the other hand, exhibited a gentle and affectionate demeanor when under the influence. 

Though they resided at opposite ends of the spectrum, they shared the unfortunate commonality of being influenced by alcohol.

Ultimately, they were no different in this regard.

Accepting this reality, Odette concealed even the remnants of futile hope. Bastian concluded the meaningless drunkenness by planting a light peck on Odette's cheek, akin to a playful jest, as if a bird gently nuzzling its beak.

"Could you lull me to sleep?" Bastian playfully quipped, releasing his hold on Odette's hair.

"I'm sorry, but you seem a bit too grown for that," Odette cautiously took a step back to create more space between them. Bastian offered a faint smile, nodding as if comprehending her hesitance.

He then sighed and turned away, his movements noticeably slowed and muted, as if he had reached the threshold of his intoxication.

Bastian stumbled, his movements unsteady, as he traversed the room and tumbled onto the bed, collapsing as if in a free fall. Odette stood by the fireplace, standing watch over him, observing the scene unfold. The man, typically composed with an impenetrable demeanor, drifted into slumber without properly enveloping himself in the covers.

Odette approached the bed, tending to her final duty of the day. Dealing with an inebriated individual posed no challenge for her. Her experience in caring for her father had honed her proficiency in this less-than-warm skill.

Odette adjusted the lighting in the room, subtly dimming the glow that emanated from the bedside table lamp. She diligently tidied up his scattered slippers, restoring order to the disarray. Straightening Bastian's body on the bed proved to be a more arduous task than anticipated, given his robust and imposing physique—a stark contrast to her father's frame.

Holding her breath, Odette worked silently, meticulously covering Bastian's body with the blanket, ensuring he lay flat and comfortably cocooned within its warmth.

Yet, to safeguard Tira, she has to betray this very man.

Confronting the harsh reality, all traces of hesitation that had lingered within her were now extinguished, leaving her resolute in her decision.

Bound by a profound sense of loyalty towards her cherished family, and tethered by a contractual obligation spanning two years as an employer.

A child, Tira, endowed with little, and a man who possessed abundant wealth and privilege.

The decision, once cast, was firmly set in stone, and Odette harbored no desire to reverse the course she had chosen.

As she found herself transfixed by the tranquil visage of Bastian, his slumbering countenance captivating her gaze, the resonant chime of a clock striking one o'clock reached her ears.

With half-closed eyes fluttering open, Odette extinguished the lamp's glow and gracefully rose to her feet.

If someone had to descend into the depths of hell, it will be her.

Driven by an unwavering resolve to unearth the truth for Tira, Odette made a solemn vow. And now, the time had come for her to bear the weight of those words, unwavering in her determination.



The day started off pretty much the same as any other for Bastian.

The alarm went off at the prescribed time, and he got himself cleaned up and ready for work. The only indication of the chaotic night before was the way he occasionally looked over his shoulder in Odette's direction, almost as if he were looking for her.

He was clueless about it.

The conclusion he reached, in the end, just as pointless as that.

Odette sat at a slight distance from the breakfast table, creating a perceptible gap between her and the scene before her. Although no overt signs of discomfort lingered from the events of the previous night, it remained challenging to ascertain her true state of mind.

Skilled in concealing her emotions, Odette wears a gentle smile even when she doesn't genuinely desire to do so. Yet, in that moment, Bastian found himself suffocating under the weight of this aspect of her character that he had once admired. It appeared to him as nothing more than a whimsical foolishness.

"Are you not inclined to assume the role of an astrologer or fortune-teller today?" Bastian's playful query broke the silence, trying to make a light-hearted tone into the atmosphere. 

Odette, taken aback by the unexpected question, finally looked up at him. Her eyes betrayed a faint redness, perhaps indicating a lack of sleep.

In a gentle observation of him, Odette grasped the spoon delicately, and shortly thereafter, a subtle cracking sound filled the air as she deftly cracked a boiled egg.

"According to a whimsical horoscope, fortune favors those who steer clear of alcohol," Odette playfully imparted a fabricated prediction, her gaze focused on the fractured eggshell. 

Prompted by her mischievous remark, Bastian couldn't contain his laughter, his mirthful outburst echoing in the room. It appeared that his tipsy husband's demeanor clashed with the grace and poise befitting an elegant lady like Odette.

"In a change of roles, allow me to read your fortune this time," Bastian's laughter subsided as he reached out and took hold of Odette's egg cup.

The butler, who had been in the midst of approaching to pour coffee, was caught off guard and froze momentarily in his tracks. With careful precision, Bastian imitated his wife, gently cracking the eggshell. In that moment, he seemed to transform into an entirely different individual, a sight unfamiliar to those who knew him well.

Lovis, struggling with the inability to determine an appropriate response, looked in a different direction. The newly bright morning sunlight was accompanied by the sound of someone pouring weak coffee into a cup.

After giving the egg a cursory examination for a moment, Bastian's eyes swiftly returned to Odette. “Today, you must being careful of drunkards.” 

Odette's eyes blinked rapidly as she smiled slightly. It was a face expression that lasted for only a split second, yet its residual impact was felt for a considerable amount of time afterward.

"Odette…" near the end of the breakfast, as the atmosphere grew more relaxed, Bastian's voice impulsively called out her name.

"Yes, Bastian, please go ahead," Odette placed her water glass down and met his gaze directly.

'Is there something you want to say...?' The question Odette had asked to him the previous night suddenly resurfaced in Bastian's mind. It appeared as though her eyes were filled with desperation, as if silently pleading for an answer, yet he found it difficult to trust his intoxicated memories.

"Did... Did you mention that you were also invited to the Emperor's banquet?" Bastian eventually opted for a deflective question, evading the heart of the matter. 

It felt like a morning where the haze of last night's alcohol still clung to his thoughts.



‘You are to become Odette's shadow for the time being’

With the duty to meticulously observe and report every minute detail, Molly received an additional instruction to keep a close watch on matters related to her father.

Having committed the contents of the letter to memory, Molly tossed it into the burning drum barrel, its flames consuming the written words. Unnoticed by the others engrossed in their own tasks, the young maid went about her duties with little notice.

Stepping across the yard, bathed in the faint glow of sunlight, Molly made her way back to the mansion, ready to continue her assigned responsibilities.

Under the gentle glow of the pale sunlight, Molly made her way across the yard, heading back to the mansion. The morning followed its usual routine, with Molly diligently assisting the lady of the house and tending to Margrethe's meals. After carefully arranging the festival hat and dress that had arrived from Sabine's wardrobe, a long-awaited break finally arrived.

A summons came from the madam's study, cutting through the moment of respite. 

"It's the madam's study. I'll leave!"

Without hesitation, Molly raised her hand. A tinge of regret washed over her as she glanced at the untouched tea in her cup, but she knew there was no time to dwell on such trivial matters. Duty called, and she was ready to respond.

"Oh, my! If anyone catches sight of you, they might mistake you for the lady of the house herself," the housekeeper chuckled.

Molly felt a slight flush of embarrassment, as if her innermost thoughts had been laid bare, but she maintained her composure and showed no signs of being flustered.

"Madam!" Molly hurriedly made her way to the small study, her heart pounding with anticipation. She knocked on the door with a sense of modesty and respect.

"Come in, Molly," came Odette's serene voice from behind the closed door.

After giving a playful pat to the lively puppy that had eagerly approached her, Molly stood before Odette's desk, her expression radiant and cheery.

"We have another guest arriving this afternoon. Should I inform Dora to adjust the preparations for tea time?" Odette asked, looking up from sealing the final letter.

"Yes, madam" Molly responded promptly, her voice filled with dutiful respect.

"Here are the letters to be sent out today. I would be grateful if you could take care of them," Odette handed over the stack of mail.

"Yes, of course. Is there anything else I can assist you with?" 

"Will you please inform Hans that I will be going out tomorrow morning?" 

Molly's eyes lit up with excitement "Are you visiting Ratz, madam?" 

"No, I am going to visit my father," Odette smiled as she organized her pen and ink. "I've tried to keep my distance from my father for the sake of my husband, but no matter what, it feels too heartless. It seems that my father has been seriously injured and is lying in a hospital bed. Can't you understand my feelings?"

"Indeed," Molly nodded. Memories of her father, a drunkard who had met his demise due to alcohol, had long faded away. But now, it was time to fabricate a worthy lie to satisfy Odette's expectations.

"Well, wouldn't it be better for me to come with my husband? What do you think,  Molly?" 

"So you wanna go to the hospital with master?"

"It would be a nice opportunity to show my father how well our marriage is going. I believe there would be much for the two of them to talk about."


Molly's eyes widened in surprise. She may not have been well-informed, but involving Bastian Klauswitz in this game or situation didn't strike her as a wise decision.

"Of course, that would be ideal, but with the naval festival approaching, will master, who is already so busy, be able to find the time?"

"Fortunately, it appears that he will have some free time tomorrow," Odette reassured, her smile warm as she gently stroked the puppy in her arms.

"You may leave now. Well done, Molly," Odette praised, her gaze filled with kindness.

Molly nodded and quickly left the small study.

 It seemed that she would have to embark on another swift journey through the forest today.


Chapter 77
Prey in a Mousetrap








Odette pulled on the reins, directing the horse away from the promenade and onto a side road. The horse, displaying its intelligence, promptly understood the command and turned as instructed. The rhythmic beat of their hooves resonated along the forest path, which was adorned with the rich and lively colors of autumn leaves. As Odette neared the edge of the Black Forest, nestled amidst two grand mansions, their journey came to a pause.

"This is the way,"  

Odette’s eyes unwaveringly fixed on the somber forest despite the brightness of the day. Theodora Klauswitz possessed an informant within her household, allowing her to meticulously monitor her activities and whereabouts, cunningly laying a trap.

During the course of Odette's inquiry, the young maid named Molly emerged as the prime suspect. Molly's humble position as a maid, despite the fact that she played the role of a close observer of the hostess, made it simple for her to keep in touch with the primary family in a covert manner without drawing attention to herself or raising suspicions. 

Molly, who had just lately started working at the estate, did not have any emotional tie to Bastian, which led Odette to the conclusion that she was the most likely person to do the crime. This was especially true when one considers that Molly had only just recently started working there.

With meticulous care, Odette fastened the reins securely to a robust birch tree before venturing into the forest with a sense of confidence. As anticipated, Molly fell into the trap, unable to resist its allure. 

Overwhelmed by fear, the maid hurriedly fled deeper into the woods. From the vantage point of a balcony that offered a view of both the garden and the forest, Odette maintained a vigilant watch over the unfolding scene.

Even in the face of betrayal, Odette remained emotionally unperturbed. The truth was, she had never truly confided her deepest feelings to Molly, despite their seemingly close bond as maid and mistress. Though Odette felt a tinge of shame over Molly's easily deceived nature, she herself remained unaffected. It was all a part of the past. What truly held significance was the future that lay ahead.

“Molly.”

"Ah, Madam?"

Odette stood before her, her gaze fixed upon Molly. The child held a collection of wild flowers delicately in her hands.

Molly, hailing from the countryside, harbored a profound love for the forest. Frequently, she faced reprimands from Dora for her habit of exploring the woods whenever an opportunity arose.

Having discreetly observed Molly on several occasions, Odette detected a burgeoning fascination in the child for plucking wild flowers. It reminded her of Tira, a cheerful child who would joyfully present flowers to others. Odette, unbeknownst to Molly, always cherished the offerings from her hidden informant. Contemplating the situation at present, she found it quite amusing.

"Have you completed your task, Molly?" Odette asked calmly. 

"I apologize, madam," Molly casually expressed, approaching Odette with a carefree countenance and a genuine smile. Odette mustered her resolve to uncover why Theodora had entrusted such a weighty task to this young girl.

"From now on, I will be the one handling all communication between you and your parents.”  

"Yes madam, if that's what you desire," Molly responded casually, nodding her head. A shiver traveled down her spine, but Odette concealed any visible reaction.

 "Then return and deliver the message to your master once again. Inform her that Bastian will not interfere. Additionally, let her know that I will provide a definitive answer once I have met with my father," Odette commanded, locking her gaze with Molly's unwavering eyes. Though Molly wasn't thrilled about taking the longer route, she obediently nodded in agreement.

"Yes. By the way, madam, this is for you," Molly said, almost turning around, as she offered a bouquet of wild flowers. "Don't you want to accept it? Flowers are innocent," Molly sighed, her gaze fixed on the unmoving figure of Odette.

Molly shrugged, then tossed the cherished wild flowers onto the roadside. The wind carried the vibrant chrysanthemums, adorning the desolate path in a scattered exhibition.

Odette remained silent as she watched Molly's figure fade into the distance, reassured that Molly would not jeopardize the plan. At least one concern had been alleviated.



"It's all right now, my dear. Our family won’t fall," Jeff Klauswitz’s face glowing with joy after the phone call. It was an expression that Theodora hadn't witnessed since Bastian had deprived him of the rights to the railroad construction.

"Has something good happened?" Theodora attempted to mask her anxiety and forced a smile. Franz, who had paused his meal, also looked at his father with an awkward smile on his face.

"I have discovered an investment opportunity that can offset our losses. It is a diamond mine with immense potential for extraction," Jeff Klauswitz announced, walking back to his seat at the breakfast table with confidence.

"Can we trust this information?"

"Absolutely. Several influential investors have already put their money into the mine and achieved significant returns. Herhardt is one of them, so there is no need for further verification," Jeff Klauswitz confirmed.

"But my dear, let us not be too hasty. In times like these..." 

"Why? Could it be that your husband is a fool, falling for a tin mine?" Jeff interjected, bursting into laughter. "We conducted a thorough investigation on our part as well. Everything checks out. There is no room for doubt."

"That's reassuring to hear. I'm glad that all our efforts have paid off," Theodora congratulated her husband on his stroke of good luck.

Jeff Clausitz was a stern and uncompromising businessman. Due to his quick temper, he was occasionally susceptible to impulsive judgments. However, he was not foolish enough to fall prey to a futile scam.

"Rise and shine, Franz. You should hurry and head to work," Jeff declared, devouring the remaining food in one swift motion, then clapping his hands loudly. Franz's plate was still partially full, but he seemed unwilling to indulge his son.

The atmosphere was charged with an impending storm, a sense of tension looming in the air. Jeff Klauswitz, filled with impatience, swiftly completed his preparations and departed from the mansion. Franz, faithfully trailing behind his father, followed suit.

Theodora bid farewell to her husband and son, maintaining a cheerful countenance for an extended period. It was a brisk autumn morning that transported her back to the days of yore, when she could envision a promising future and bask in happiness, before Bastian exposed her true nature.

"Bastian…." 

Theodora recollected the name once more as the car carrying her husband and son drove away, disappearing on the opposite side of the mansion's driveway.

In her perception, Bastian was akin to a wild beast, moving with calculated precision. He would patiently crouch, waiting for the opportune moment to swiftly strike at the prey's throat. This trait was evident not only in his strategic maneuvers but also in his ability to seize and accumulate wealth.

Theodora pondered the lingering possibility of the child's hidden motive. As she entered the mansion's lobby, she prepared herself for the worst-case scenario. She understood that she couldn't dissuade her husband without a well-defined plan. This was not the time for hesitation or solely focusing on her own preservation. Nevertheless, the circumstances appeared suspiciously advantageous, reminiscent of a carefully laid trap.

"Madam! Madam!"

 Nancy called out urgently as Theodora prepared to climb the first flight of stairs. The maid scanned the surroundings, then discreetly passed her an envelope hidden under her sleeve before swiftly departing. 

The envelope contained a letter from Molly, originating from a location beyond the woods.



"Maybe I should write a memoir," Duke Dyssen entertained the thought, and a glimmer of hope sparked in his eyes. 

He envisioned narrating the story of his passionate love affair with the imperial princess, the subsequent tragic downfall, and even becoming a victim of his own daughter's crime. If he were to pen this captivating tale, it would undoubtedly become a sensational masterpiece, destined to top the charts of best-selling books.


Why had this idea not crossed his mind earlier? 

He fumed with anger at his own foolishness. Struggling to gather strength, he hastily resumed his seat and frantically rang the call bell. The toll of illness had reduced him to a mere semblance of a living corpse, barely resembling the man he once was.

"Hey, caregiver! Caregiver!" 

Duke Dyssen called out in a rush, his voice filled with anxiety, towards the tightly shut door of his hospital room. To compound the situation, the previously helpful caregiver had abruptly quit overnight, leaving him to face numerous hardships without a single explanation. Despite managing to find a replacement caregiver, he was dissatisfied with her lack of diligence and incompetence.

Never had he envisioned that Odette would persist in treating him with such disdain even after receiving his letter! Overwhelmed by the resentment surging from the depths of his heart, he furiously hurled the pillow onto the floor, followed by a vase and a glass of water from the bedside table.

The anger that was once solely directed at Odette now transformed into a sense of unease. Perhaps she had already found a substitute for him. It seemed she had satisfied her needs, especially since she now had a wealthy and influential husband by her side.

What if he was unknowingly being poisoned within the confines of this prison-like hospital room, with no mice or birds to bear witness? 

The all-consuming anxiety engulfed him, prompting him to cry out in agony as he struck his crippled leg.

Memories surged back, the pain intensified.

This was a tragic outcome triggered by Helene's opposition to the choice of sending Tira to an orphanage. The princess, who had once embraced the maid responsible for seducing her husband and bearing their illegitimate child, now reemerged as a vindictive force, seeking vengeance.

"Are you deliberately ignoring me now? If you don't appear this instant, I will cut all ties with you!"

Summoning his remaining strength, Duke Dyssen reached for the bell string once again. However, before he could ring it, a knock echoed through the room. He abruptly ceased his rattling and turned his head towards the sound. If it were a caregiver or a medical staff member, there would be no need for such formalities.

A glimmer of hope flickered within him as he anticipated who stood behind the door. With a sense of astonishment, Duke Dyssen's eyes widened as he beheld the lady standing before him, her presence both unexpected and intriguing.

"Odette...?" 

In a state of dazed confusion, he observed the graceful sway of the red hem of her skirt, reminiscent of autumn leaves, as she approached with delicate steps. Odette quietly shut the door behind her, maintaining a composed demeanor that appeared undisturbed by the chaotic state of the hospital room.

Bowing politely, Odette exuded an air of serenity, seemingly unaffected by the surrounding chaos. Duke Dyssen found himself unable to tear his gaze away from her, his mind swirling with a multitude of thoughts that left him momentarily speechless. He gasped for breath, as if sensing the lingering taste of uncertainty in the air.

"You...you dare..." 

Duke Dyssen finally managed to find his voice, but Odette, who had paused for a brief moment, resumed her stride. Her eyes held no visible hint of guilt as she maintained unwavering eye contact with him, standing tall and composed.

"If your aim was to bring misfortune upon the entire family, then congratulations, you have succeeded." Odette's voice rang out as she stopped a step away from the bed, greeting her father with a single word. 

Her face, pale and devoid of any emotion, bore an uncanny resemblance to a lifeless wax doll. The lack of vitality in her complexion only served to highlight the cold, gleaming eyes that exuded an eerie aura.

Caught off guard by the intensity of the situation, Duke Dyssen fought to regain his composure and find his voice, while Odette closed the remaining distance between them. 

"Why did you do it?" Odette's question pierced the air, the weight of its significance hanging palpably in the silence. Yet, any glimmer of joy that Duke Dyssen had initially felt swiftly dissipated upon hearing her words.

"Did you truly believe it would benefit you to place that letter in the hands of that person?" Odette inquired, her tone carrying a mix of curiosity and disbelief.

"That person? "Who did receive the letter I sent you?" Duke Dyssen found the question preposterous and responded with genuine sincerity.


Chapter 78
He Bought Flowers








"I never sent her any letter! Don't you know that?!" Duke Dyssen exclaimed, his voice growing louder as he voiced his disagreement.

Odette lowered her gaze and met her father's eyes. She seemed fragile, like a troubled child in need of comfort. She wished it was all a lie, but deep down, Odette was already aware. Her father spoke nothing but the truth.

Theodora Klauswitz had indeed pilfered her father's letters, and considering all the evidence, this was the only rational conclusion. Odette felt her heart racing erratically, but she hid her anxiety behind a composed demeanor. Taking a deliberate breath, she gathered herself and confronted her father with a calm resolve.

"Has there been a recent departure from the hospital staff?" 

"Unexpectedly, one of the caregivers vanished without a trace..." his frustration evident in his sigh. "She took the letter! I'm sure?!" Duke Dyssen vented his anger towards the missing caregiver. 

Despite having two caregivers working in shifts, there was only one woman entrusted with the responsibility of handling the letters. She possessed remarkable intelligence and a deep knowledge of literature. It seemed there was no need to speculate on the identity of the culprit.

While observing the silent Odette, Duke Dyssen's expression suddenly transformed, and he erupted into laughter.

 "This is all about revenge for your sins. So the wicked stepmother, the enemy of the enemy, has exposed the vulnerabilities of a thousand things. Magnificent! If it is revealed in detail, not only will I remain unharmed, but the entire empire will see the true nature of the celebrated hero. I should have sent her a letter! It was my mistake not to do so." Duke Dyssen's glared at Odette. "I will make sure that Tira, who has brought me to this state, is undoubtedly sent to prison! As for you, who have become a partner, you will not escape the consequences, so be prepared. And let us not forget the your-so-called hero husband. All of you shall descend into hell..."

"What comes next then? What fate awaits you?" Odette interjected coldly, she had already found herself trapped in a predicament with seemingly no way out.

Accepting this harsh reality, the true nature of her surroundings became clearer. Her foremost concern was to silence her father's destructive words. While it wouldn't completely resolve the hopeless situation, it would at least prevent it from escalating further. Thus, Odette resolved to take the most appropriate course of action available to her in the present moment.

"I am already half-paralyzed. If I were to die, it might not hold much significance, but the circumstances are different for you," Duke Dyssen threatened, his eyes darting anxiously. "To avert such misfortunes, it would be wise for you to arrange for my immediate release from this place. If you demonstrate enough sincerity in rectifying your past wrongdoings, who knows? Perhaps I might reconsider my stance."

"No, father. That will not happen," Odette shook her head. Her father's true motives, which had become clear to her, aligned perfectly with her expectations. The underlying lust driving him eradicated any remaining shreds of pity and guilt that had once plagued her heart like thorns. "Bastian is unaware of the truth regarding the incident. If he had known, he would never have married me. Why would an ambitious man on the path to triumph choose to marry a woman burdened with such a troubling secret?"

"You are Dyssen, Odette! Are you suggesting that our family is inferior to that of a son of a junk dealer?"

"Yes, I am Odette Dyssen. The daughter of a princess who was abandoned for betraying the fallen duke and the empire. I am merely an aristocrat in name, burdened with a father consumed by gambling and alcohol. That is my identity." Odette's resolute words brought a sudden stillness to the hospital room. "The present-day Dyssen family does not dare to oppose the Klauswitz family. If it weren't for the Emperor's intervention, Bastian Klauswitz would never have married me."

"You, how can you say that..." Duke Dyssen's voice wavered with disbelief.

"That marriage proposal was my final chance at a better life. After your accident, I was overwhelmed by the responsibility of caring for both you, a disabled father, and Tira. I couldn't burden the man who offered me a lifeline out of pity with the truth.”

"My daughter... Odette, the last shred of pride for the Dyssen family. Are you implying that you've stooped so low as to become a prostitute to the grandson of a junk dealer?" Duke Dyssen's face contorted with a profound sense of humiliation.

Odette couldn't suppress a soft laugh, her heart filled with a blend of sympathy and sadness for her father's pride that he had yet to let go of.

"Now I can't even be a prostitute. Thanks to my father, I am forever tainted,"  

With vacant eyes, she stared on the autumn forest beyond the window of the hospital room.

She wanted to be a good wife.

 Even if it meant adhering to the boundaries of their arrangement. Odette had earnestly worked towards fulfilling her assigned role, hoping that the two years she spent with Bastian would be cherished memories. However, at this moment, everything felt utterly devoid of purpose.

"Please remain quiet, father. Live as if you were dead.” 

Odette looked at her father, but her eyes was devoid of any emotional response. Despite Duke Dyssen's furious struggles and screams, her composure remained unshaken. 

"Is it not sufficient that you've made me into this? And now you dare to threaten me!?" Duke Dyssen exclaimed. 

"Should this become known, Bastian will leave me. Consequently, he will no longer be obliged to cover your medical expenses.”

 "If I can escape this place, it would be for the best!" Duke Dyssen declared.

"Well, then. Once Tira is imprisoned and I am punished as her accomplice, who will look after you? Do you truly believe there are any remaining options for you?" 

"That…”

"Father, please bear in mind that once the truth about the accident emerges, you will find yourself homeless. If fortune favors you, you may even end up in a workhouse," Odette conveyed with a soft voice that contrasted with her youthful visage, delivering a bone-chilling warning. Duke Dyssen, now partially dazed, let out a pained groan. "Even if Tira was the one who pushed you, what does it matter? Your memories have all returned, but why did you erase the fact that it happened because you attacked the child to steal the money?" 

"Odette!" 

"This is always how you are. I've known it all along and always tolerated it, but not anymore," 

Odette took a deep breath as she reached for the overcoat hanging on the back of the chair. In the midst of the chaotic situation, she found herself reminiscing about the good old days—the idyllic moments when her father had been a caring presence, and they were a loving family. Yet, she realized that clinging onto those memories had been holding her back. She understood that the time had come to release them and bid a bittersweet farewell to those cherished moments.


"It was an act of self-defense and a mistake. Father, throughout Tira's entire life, you have denied her existence and treated her poorly. You have no right to pass judgment on what is right or wrong. “ Odette spoke earnestly, her eyes reflecting a deep loneliness that resembled the melancholy of autumn. "This is the delicate line I am managing to walk somehow. Take one more step, and all three of us will plummet off the cliff."

 Her eyes had now turned so red that even the shade of her hat couldn't conceal it.

 "I implore you, for the sake of my mother who watches over us from heaven, please hold onto your last shreds of dignity and humanity, Father."

Odette brought her palms together and lowered her head as she clenched her fists.

After being eerily calm during what seemed like an eternity, the hospital room soon started to quake with bloody howls.



Impulsively, Bastian found himself purchasing flowers. 

His gaze narrowed as he observed the bouquet being packed by the cheerful flower shop owner, who hummed a tune. 

It was the day when Mrs. Gross and Dr. Kramer were to be invited to Ardenne. This decision was made in anticipation of his imminent departure after the festival. Thus, Bastian felt compelled to arrange a final meal together, a place where they could share one last gathering.

Whenever he visited his aunt, Bastian would always seek out a special place to find flowers as a gift for Maria, who had a fondness for them. Today was no exception. As he perused the shop, his eyes unexpectedly fell upon a familiar sight—the very same flower that Odette had discovered near the valley stream last summer. Bastian immediately recognized it. While memories of other wildflowers had faded over time, this particular flower remained vivid in his mind, for it bore a striking resemblance to her.

"Your wife must possess remarkable nobility and beauty." 

The owner, with considerable experience in the floral trade said. He placed the first bouquet adorned with exquisite packaging, picked up the next one, a surprise gift for Odette.

"I have been in this business for a while, yet you are the first gentleman to select an iris, symbolizing resemblance to his wife. Most people tend to favor roses or lilies." With evident curiosity, the flower shop owner fixed their gaze upon Bastian.

In that moment, it dawned on Bastian that he had made an error—a realization that came a little too late.

‘Wouldn't it be lovely if we could have arranged the flowers in a more elegant manner, especially considering her youthful charm?’ 

The primary problem arose when the owner received the request to include a bouquet of irises.

‘Oh, it's fine.’

Bastian replied, though it would have been more fitting if the owner had fulfilled the request earlier.

‘This particular flower bears a resemblance to your wife. I'm certain she will love it’

The owner offered, attempting to justify their earlier oversight with a somewhat feeble remark. Faced with this unsatisfactory response, Bastian had no choice but to manage the frustrating situation at hand.

Iris.

Bastian contemplated the name of the flower he had just been introduced to. As the owner had mentioned, the iris was indeed an elegant and visually striking bloom.

"Very well, Sir. The task is now complete," the owner said, showcasing their astute problem-solving skills and efficiently packaging the flowers for Odette.

After completing the transaction, Bastian hurriedly exited the store. The city center teemed with bustling crowds, and all eyes turned to the resolute figure of an officer striding along the main street, clutching a bag brimming with flowers.

Navigating his way through the throngs of people, Bastian was solely focused on the innocuous nature of the floral arrangement. As he reached the spot where he had parked his car, the street lamps illuminated the surroundings, serving as a poignant reminder that the season of short daylight hours had arrived.

With care, he placed the bouquet on the passenger seat before settling into the car himself. A feeling of irreversibility washed over him, as if he had engaged in an ultimately futile endeavor. 

After all, weren't flowers a customary and unremarkable gift?

Bastian ceased his contemplation and ignited the engine, shifting his focus to the task at hand. Presenting flowers to his aunt held no particular significance, especially considering that Odette's bouquet appeared minuscule and unassuming compared to Mrs. Gross's grand arrangement. It almost seemed fitting, as if it were an apt addition to the existing collection.

Having swiftly adjusted the arrangement of the meticulously tied ribbon, courtesy of the owner, Bastian wasted no time and promptly set the car in motion. The city embraced an air of tranquil obscurity on this early autumn night, cloaked in a serene darkness that enveloped the surroundings.


Chapter 79
If You Don't Give Sincerity








Maria Gross's eyes widened in awe, for in that fleeting moment, it seemed as if heaven and earth had unveiled their secrets before her very eyes. Glancing at the young Bastian, her astonishment mirrored the expression on Dr. Kramer's face, seated right beside her.

With work delaying his arrival, Bastian eventually entered the house, greeted by a room filled with guests. Clutched in his hand was a stunning bouquet. Yet, the enchantment quickly waned as Maria's jaw dropped upon spotting another bouquet he had secretly crafted for his wife.

In a quick glimpse, Odette's bouquet seemed noticeably smaller and simpler compared to Maria's, a deliberate choice by a thoughtful nephew determined to cast his aunt as the day's protagonist. However, Maria immediately sensed the genuine sincerity within the modest bunch of irises that Bastian presented to his wife.

Just as what men would usually do, her nephew selected a bouquet from the array of options—a lovely prearranged creation adorned with a harmonious blend of widely cherished flower types, similar to the one he had presented to her moments ago.

However, it was evident that the irises he bestowed upon his wife had been carefully chosen by his own hands. While not an exceedingly rare bloom, it stood apart from the ordinary. Maria would confidently wager that no sensible florist would include irises in a gentleman's floral order unless expressly instructed to do so.

Maria couldn't help but burst into laughter, finding the situation hard to believe. From the moment Bastian handed the bouquet of irises to his wife, his gaze never wavered, remaining fixated on heis wife every move. 

Even the tiniest gesture or fleeting glance from Odette received his unwavering attention. He appeared like a lovesick teenager experiencing the thrill of first love. On the other hand, Maria was equally astounded by Odette's ability to maintainher proper manners while being intensely stared.

"I didn't expect that Bastian would become such a pathetic husband." Dr. Kramer whispered, and Maria only responded with a faint smile.

"Supper is served. Kindly go to the dining room." 

Just as the butler arrived, Bastian finally turned his gaze away from his wife and approached Maria with a calm demeanor, ready to accompany her.

"Allow me to lead the way, Mrs. Gross," he said with a relaxed smile. It was the familiar countenance of Bastian Klauswitz that Maria recognized, displaying a blend of subtle determination and playful mischief, rendering him all the more captivating.

‘Maybe it was an illusion stemming from my aging eyes.’ Maria reassured herself, grasping her nephew's hand.

If Bastian was still unaware, it was best to keep it that way– he had the face of a man deeply smitten with lovewho was in love.



The dinner was an absolute delight, with delectable cuisine and meticulously crafted drinks. A harmonious blend of heartfelt conversations and laughter filled the air, creating a welcoming atmosphere.

As the final main course was whisked away from the table, Odette couldn't help but release a breath of relief. This extraordinary feast had been prepared amidst chaos, and without the aid of skilled servants, she wouldn't have achieved such culinary perfection.

She drank cold water to awaken her ever-fading consciousness. After meeting her father, she found it difficult to think properly–to the point she couldn't even quite remember how she got back to the Ardenne. The events of a few hours ago seemed distant, almost like a distant memory.

‘Wake up.’

Odette repeated her mantra countless times during the dinner to brace herself. She pushed through the tasteless food, hoping to hold on a bit longer with a kind smile. However, as the dessert was served, the ensuing conversation trapped her in a difficult position.

"It's truly a shame that such amiable newlyweds must endure two years of separation. Why not consider accompanying your husband to his new assignment, Mrs. Klauswitz?" Dr. Kramer inquired.

 Odette grasped  the meaning of the question with a delayed realization, her expression filled with confusion as she scanned the surroundings. She hoped that someone would also show a surprised reaction, but such a wish did not come true. Everyone sitting around the table seemed to already know about Bastian's plan, except for one person—his wife, Odette Klauswitz.

“But you wouldn't be able to stay with Bastian during his training regardless. It wouldn't be much different from staying here," Maria Gross looked at Bastian and raised an objection.

Odette managed to muster a smile. ‘Don't worry, I'll make every effort not to raise any suspicions,’ she reassured, remembering the promise she had made to Bastian.

"I believe it's far preferable for you to stay here rather than living alone, awaiting your husband in an unfamiliar place. The Trosa Islands can be quite desolate, posing challenges for a young woman like yourself, isn't that so, Odette?" 

Odette obediently nodded, “Yes, I would prefer to remain in Ardenne. I don't wish to burden my husband, and moreover, there is still much work in the mansion that requires my attention."

"Your mindset is commendable, Odette. It would indeed be challenging for the hostess to depart when the foundation of the new household has not yet been established,"

"What are your thoughts, Bastian?" Dr. Kramer, seemingly persistent, posed the question once more. 

Odette glanced at Bastian with a hint of tension, her well-proportioned face cast in shadows by the soft glow of the elegant candlesticks

"Bastian?" 

With a smile, Bastian raised his glass, drawing the attention of those present. "I will honor my wife's wishes," he declared, taking a sip of wine to wet his lips. He fixed a calm gaze upon Odette, reminiscent of the moment when he had shared the news of the war with her.

"Thank you, Bastian," Odette expressed, bringing a conclusion to the tense conversation.

If she hadn't been sincere, he wouldn't have been hurt. The betrayal of his deceitful wife wouldn't stain his heart. Odette was glad that her intentions were nothing more than that. 

Once again, she chose to appreciate this fact, which proved to be the right decision.



As Molly entered the bedroom, carefully holding a vase of irises, Odette kept a watchful eye on the child's movements through the vanity mirror. Mindful of the head maid, Dora, who was preoccupied with combing her hair, Odette made sure to be cautious in her actions,  to avoid arousing suspicion.

However…something was amiss.

Just as the head maid, Dora, set down the comb, Molly's behavior took a peculiar turn. Locking eyes with Odette through the mirror, the child furrowed her eyebrows, seemingly signaling something.

Without wasting a moment, Molly discreetly slipped a note concealed in her sleeve and cleverly placed it beneath the vase. Catching Odette's brief glance, Molly smiled brightly. Her expression stirred a pang of regret within Odette,  reminding her of the past when she had believed Molly and Tira to be alike.

"Have a pleasant evening, madam," Dora concluded her tasks and bid a polite farewell before departing alongside Molly. As their footsteps faded into the distance, Odette rose from her seat. With haste, she grasped the vase and discovered a neatly folded note resting beneath it.

Her heart raced, a flurry of anticipation coursing through her, as she fought to steady herself before unfurling the note with hands that trembled. But the air of suspense surrounding her was shattered by the jarring intrusion of abrupt footsteps echoing through the passageway, linking the two bedrooms.

Odette quickly hide the note within the pocket of her gown. Moments later, the door swung open, leaving her with little opportunity to reposition herself. She anxiously shifted her focus to the irises in the vase. With delicate touches, Odette pretended to admire the petals, acting as though everything was perfectly normal.

"Odette," Bastian called out, pausing briefly at the door before entering the bedroom.

"Oh, the flowers are absolutely lovely," she exclaimed with a warm smile, lightly caressing the petals. Meanwhile, Bastian stood by his wife, arms casually folded, watching the flower

“I don't mind, Bastian. I understand you.” Odette suddenly said.

"Understand?" 

Bastian let out a laugh, though inwardly he felt a sense of discomfort. The unexpected announcement of his imminent departure unsettled him. It made him question whether it would seem as if he were deceiving Odette?

He pondered over the right words to dispel any misunderstandings that may have arisen. These thoughts had been swirling in his mind since the incident caused by the talkative Dr. Kramer until the present moment.

However, she assured him that she understood. Her understanding brought a sense of relief to him, as her response aligned with his expectations. Yet, inexplicably, a feeling of unease lingered within him seeing Odette's overly plain attitude.

 “If you were worried that I would insist on going with you…You don't have to worry about that, Bastian. I'll wait here if that is what you want.” Odette said.

Bastian, unable to find a suitable response, remained silent.

“There are not many days left to spend together. I don’t want to ruin the rest of the time with things that have already happened.” Odette murmured softly as she continued to toy with the flower petals “So Bastian, I’m fine.”She chuckled, though her eyes betrayed the shimmer of tears she held back. "I hope you're okay too."

‘Let's go together.’

Bastian found himself clenching his empty fists repeatedly to bear the weight of the words that welled up within him.

“Bastian, you must be tired. Go and sleep first.” 

"How about you?"

"I'll rest soon, after spending more time admiring these flowers," she replied, catching him off guard. Bastian couldn't help but let out a helpless laugh. 

A woman who found joy in the simple beauty of a few flowers. He had conflicting feelings about her. It both pleased and irritated him at the same time. 

Bastian discreetly turned away, hiding the emotions that swirled within him.

With each passing moment, the bedroom dimmed as the lights extinguished, intensifying the glow emanating from the crackling fireplace.

Bidding farewell to the bedside lamp, Bastian settled himself on the bed. Odette remained motionless for an extended duration, waiting patiently until Bastian succumbed to sleep. 

Seizing the opportunity, she cautiously unraveled the concealed note, unveiling its secrets in the depths of the abyss-like night. As her gaze fell upon Theodora Klauswitz's commanding words, an icy chill crept into her thoughts, causing her mind to momentarily freeze, leaving her in a bewildered state.

The mine.

Clutching the word in her mind, Odette cast the crumpled note into the hungry flames of the fireplace. The answer that she was supposed to give after meeting her father had already been decided.


Chapter 80
Recoverable Damages








A knock sounded at the study door. Bastian briefly paused his call, turning his head while gripping the phone's transmitter. The clock on the desk indicated it was 11 o'clock, the usual time for weekend morning tea.

"Come in," he responded, quickly picking up the handset again. "Apologies. Please continue."

After politely requesting the conversation to proceed, he leaned back against the edge of the desk, granting him a panoramic view of the window, the sea, and his father's realm beyond. Unperturbed by the slowly opening door, Bastian stayed fully absorbed in Thomas Müller's report.

The clouds cleared, revealing brilliant sunlight reflecting on the sea's surface, and momentarily blinding him. Amidst that blissful sight, he listened to the long-awaited news - his father had finally fallen into his trap. Despite the prolonged search, he took the bait instantly. Now, Bastian only needed to tighten the grip and ensure his father couldn't escape.

With Theodora Klauswitz as the sole remaining variable, Bastian harbored little worry. Her fatal flaw was her unwavering love for her husband, leading her to endure absurdity and enabling his father's foolish dictatorship for years. 

"We'll still keep an eye on it." Bastian calmly said as he leisurely opened the lid of the cigarette box placed next to the file folder.

Allowing his father to bask in a false sense of triumph, reaching a point of no return, proved to be the optimal strategy, though It was akin to a deceptive bluff, contrary to heroic psychology.

Jeff Klauswitz was among those who dedicate their entire lives to a singular goal. In light of this, Bastian wanted to express a small token of appreciation for his father's final journey.

"Let's exercise patience and continue preparing for our next move," Bastian instructed calmly. 

Knowing one mine wouldn't be enough to bring his father down, he had set up a domino-like plan. The mine served as the initial trigger, setting off a sequence of subsequent traps. If they succeeded in toppling him, it would mean fulfilling his late grandfather's task.

The phone call concluded with scheduling coordination for the upcoming board meeting next week. Bastian set down the warm receiver and turned around, cigarette in hand, searching for a lighter. However, to his surprise, he was met with an unexpected face: Odette

Odette stood in front of him, resembling a porcelain doll, and placed a tea tray at the desk's edge. “I came on behalf of Lovis.”  She spoke with a gentle smile, lifting the teapot. The aroma of brewed tea filled the room, mingling with the rising steam in the serene silence.

She put a teacup beside the spread-out documents. The midday sunlight streamed through the window, casting a glow upon her face.

"Did I break an etiquette rule?" She asked, her eyes shimmering with a captivating brilliance akin to the sparkling sea on a sunny day.

Bastian settled in front of the desk, holding the teacup she served, while the unlit cigarette and lighter sat untouched next to the pen stand.



The pen's scratching ceased, plunging the room into a stifling silence. Odette sighed silently, taking in the study's opulent surroundings. The walls were lined with grand bookshelves, brimming with an extensive collection. The furniture and decor exuded an overwhelming grandeur, making it challenging to concentrate on any one item. 

Resisting the urge to get up, she reached for an unread book and reopened it. Yet, her senses remained wholly attuned to Bastian.

The mahogany desk stood commanding in front of the fireplace, positioned to observe his every move and gauge Odette's actions as well. Bastian held a list of investors and documents regarding the diamond mine, all meeting Theodora's specific and explicit demands.

The deadline loomed before the naval festival. While minor updates and progress reports could be conveyed through Molly, important documents were to be delivered directly. 

Odette's unheard objection to the tight schedule would undoubtedly harm her. With guilty eyes, she glanced at Bastian, who finished reviewing one document before unfolding the next. His unwavering focus on the task erased her presence in their shared space.

Bastian led an incredibly busy life, juggling naval duties on weekdays and managing his late grandfather's business during evenings and weekends. His life operated like meshing of two gears, continuously turning without gaps.

Odette suspected that the conflicts over the family estate played a role. She may not have known much about the business, but she had a vague understanding of Theodora Klauswitz's intentions in involving her as a spy.

Bastian's quest for revenge seemed evident; his father had forsaken their ancestral home and even distanced himself from his own son in pursuit of marrying a noblewoman. He became a deserving target of his hatred and a potential object of his revenge.

Odette squeezed her eyes shut, taking deep breaths to steady her trembling hands gripping the table's edge. 

A doubt crept into her heart. Failure was not an option if she wanted to protect Tira.

Odette raised her gaze to meet Bastian's as he lit his cigarette, his attention shifting towards her.

A tranquil haze enveloped their gaze, marked by the trailing smoke. Odette gracefully masked her unease with a subtle smile. Bastian wordlessly flicked the ashes, and turned his attention to the document before him.

“Wake”

Odette repeated the order to herself relentlessly. She had to protect Tira, even if it meant hurting Bastian. A scandal would ruin the reputation of a war hero. Whether Bastian knew or not, the consequences were dire – he would be labeled as a foolish if ignorant, an accomplice if aware. Even if Tira escaped punishment, the investigation would still shatter her life.

Though Bastian's revenge against his father was incomplete, yet his wealth remained secure. But, a tarnished reputation can never be restored. Odette didn’t want to strip away the hard-earned reputation of a man who fought to transcend his social status. It was better for him to endure a recoverable financial loss instead.

With determination, Odette unfastened the brooch from her shawl while Bastian remained engrossed in signing the documents. Calculating the timing, she discreetly tucked the brooch into the crevice between the sofa cushions and armrest. Her motive was clear - she needed a valid reason to enter Bastian's study alone.

As Bastian's attention returned to the sofa, Odette skillfully concealed the brooch and relied on her smile as a shield. 

Bastian observed Odette and resumed smoking without speaking. 

Could he be suspicious?

As Odette endured his gaze, a sense of powerlessness washed over her. She couldn't shake off the growing unease within her chest. Suddenly, the faint scratching and whimpering of a puppy behind the door reached her ears. 

Bastian narrowed his eyes at the study door. Odette longed for an opportunity to escape, but Margrethe's pitiful whining heightened her distress. Just as she was about to leave, Bastian rose from his desk and strode across the study. He swung the door open, startling Margrethe, who let out a frantic bark.

"Sorry, Bastian.” Odette quickly apologized and stood up. As she prepared to leave with Margrethe, Bastian surprised her by stepping back, allowing the dog to enter the study. Margrethe eagerly took the chance and dashed inside. Bastian casually closed the door and resumed his place at the desk as if nothing had happened.

Bewildered, Odette hugged Margrethe tightly, while Bastian, sitting upright, redirected his attention back to the documents before him.

"You can’t do that, Meg. It's bad." Odette lowered her voice and gently reprimanded the dog. The whimpering sounds momentarily subsided, and Margrethe wagged her tail in excitement.

Suddenly, laughter filled the room, catching her attention. Bastian's chuckle rang out as he casually flipped through the documents, a warm and genuine smile graced his face, replacing his previously stern expression.

Summoning her courage, Odette rose to her feet, holding Margrethe close. Step by step, she approached Bastian's desk, her heart pounding with anticipation.

"Bastian, Margrethe wants to apologize to you," Odette said.

Bastian lifted his head, his gaze meeting hers, pushing her to quickly offer a feeble excuse.

"Margrethe likes you."

"It seems your dog has different thoughts.” 

"She's just a bit shy," Odette replied, finding herself with no other option but to become bolder. "Ladies often become bashful in the presence of gentlemen they like."

Amidst her own absurd reasoning, the sound of Margrethe's growling, teeth bared, seeped into the room. Bastian, silently observing the scene, suddenly erupted into hearty laughter. 

With each step, Odette drew closer. Yet, Bastian remained unfazed,

She approached close enough to read the writing on the documents spread out on the desk. 

Bastian still did not budge

With a smile of relief, Odette softly stroked Margrethe as the dog continued to emit soft growls.

The man's lack of vigilance was a fortunate turn of events.

Chapter 81
Mother's Dog








"See, what did I say? I knew that that child couldn't be our enemy." Jeff Klauswitz's laughter echoed through the bedroom.

Theodora set the newspaper aside and gazed at her husband with a loving smile. The sunbeams pouring in through the open curtains highlighted his figure as he rested in bed. Despite a touch of gray in his hair, he remained an attractive man. She could now understand why other ladies were drawn to him, despite his age being similar to that of their fathers.

Recently, he had once again stirred up trouble by getting involved with another woman. This time, it was undeniably a delicate beauty with platinum blonde hair. How many times has this happened now? The sequence of his encounters with different women who resembled each other had become a hazy blur in her memory.

If she had known the situation would turn out like this, she wouldn't have killed Sophia.

A hint of regret flashed in her eyes as she looked at her husband.

If he had simply divorced his first wife as requested, Theodora wouldn't have been able to harm that woman. Even if Sophia had maintained a secret relationship with Jeff after the divorce, she could have chosen to ignore it. While it might have made her uncomfortable, she wouldn't have had any power to change the situation. Rather than being consumed by jealousy over not being the only woman, it would have been wiser to tolerate some annoyance.

If Sophia had been slightly less emotionally attached to her ex-husband, she could have escaped her tragic destiny, enduring the excruciating pain while carrying their child in her womb.

Theodora clicked her tongue. Of course, thanks to dying at the prime of her youth, she would forever be etched in her beloved man's heart as an everlasting memory.

"If we can wrap up that matter nicely, we might be able to launch a counterattack. This time, we'll dig a pit under Bastian's feet, leading him straight to hell." Jeff stated passionately. After discussing plans to acquire a diamond mine, it seemed that that he was developing a new ambition and felt relieved to finally resolve the persistent issue that had been bothering him..

"Yes, if we come across a favorable opportunity, we should certainly seize it," Theodora responded, showing her backing to her husband. "By the way, the Brandt also mentioned an increase in communication with Bastian recently. It might be worthwhile to investigate further," she subtly conveyed the crucial point afterwards, recognizing it as the most effective approach to dealing with Jeff Klauswitz.

"Are you talking about Count Brandt?"

"Yes, that Count Brandt." She nodded and gently stroked her husband's hair.

Count Brandt was a distinguished nobleman and the leader of a prestigious financial institution, having the same economic prowess as Bastian–who was unfortunately the grandson of a junk dealer. It seemed like an implausible pairing, but Odette wouldn't but Odette claimed to have witnessed this herself, and although Theodora hadn't confirmed the details, she made sure to remember the name as a precaution.

"Being cautious would be wise to ensure a flawless victory. Let's consider the possibilities of what you can build once that damn replica of our mansion was finally removed from its place."

"Is it a gift for me?"

"Consider it a loot offering to my queen."

As the signs of restlessness faded from his body, Jeff gradually regained his composed state.

Theodora loved Jeff in these moments when his self-assured and arrogant charm shone through. It was unfortunate that Sophia Illis had taken away his son who greatly resembled Jeff in his youth, but Jeff didn't seem to dwell on such thoughts because they still had Franz, their precious and adorable child, to cherish.

With heartfelt sincerity, she wished Odette a wonderful day, hoping that she would bring joyful news once again.

The child, beautiful, intelligent, and remarkably brave, grew on her more and more with each encounter. It wouldn't be surprising if Franz found himself drawn to her.

It would be troublesome if something were to happen to that child.

She narrowed her eyes and gazed into the distance through the window. Unlike Sophia Ellis, Odette wasn't the kind of person to intentionally invite trouble or harm. However, there was one aspect that worried her—Odette's husband.

Will Bastian be forgiving enough to pardon his wife's betrayal?

If this were a game of chance, Theodora would never wager her money on blind optimism alone. Bastian was the kind of person who would go as far as beheading a beloved dog if it had bitten him. His ruthlessness was evident even at the tender age of twelve. Now, as a soldier marching into the battlefield, it was uncertain what tragic fate awaited her.

Perhaps Odette's destiny would be even more sorrowful than Sophia's.

Despite everything, Theodora held onto the hope that nothing would shatter the promise she made to Franz.

Once again, she extended her well wishes to Odette and rose from the bed. Stepping onto the balcony, she embraced the refreshing sea breeze. Though the weather was chilly, the presence of her husband by her side provided a comforting warmth that shielded her from the cold.

In the midst of the serene bliss, Theodora watched as the morning unfolded on the horizon. Any fixation on a woman who was already deceased appeared insignificant. She easily brushed aside any replacements for that woman, without giving them much thought.

She has this man.

That was what she desired, and she had finally attained it. Thus, Theodora Klauswitz emerged as the victor. And this fact would remain unchanged in the times to come.



Margrethe was startled. Her confident and fierce nature vanished, and she nervously wandered, whimpering. She only felt safe when she was near Odette, barely making a sound.

Bastian glanced down and observed the dog. Odette briefly stepped away from the table to take a phone call during breakfast, leaving Margrethe alone with Bastian. The dog’s exaggerated reaction, as if the world was falling apart, was so comical that it made him chuckle.

What on earth happened to Margrethe to become such an unusual being?

While observing Margrethe trembling in fear, memories of Odette's stepsister, Tira, also came to mind. Like this dog, she used to be afraid of him. However, instead of causing harm as she did in the past, it seemed that she now enjoyed his great favor and care.

Bastian leisurely sipped his coffee, watching Margrethe's melancholic barks. Odette's coffee, as usual, was excessively bitter, yet he had grown accustomed to it and could tolerate it now. Similar to the peculiar morning rituals involving fortune-telling and the dog that had started shadowing Odette's every step.

"Meg."

Bastian called out to her, and the startled dog quivered. Her fur had grown, and she had slightly increased in size, appearing much healthier than before.

Setting his teacup aside, Bastian reached for an egg from the basket at the table's center. While he peeled the shell, Margrethe, who had been keeping watch by the front door, approached him unexpectedly. Her eyes displayed a mix of fear and curiosity, reminiscent of the early days spent with Odette.

According to his aunt Maria Gross, Margrethe might belong to Theodora Klauswitz. She even inquired if there were any other places nearby where a dog of that particular breed could reside, apart from this mansion.

Bastian concurred with his aunt's statement. Theodora Klauswitz had a penchant for raising beautiful dogs and cats as if they were dolls. After a few moments of affection, she would pass them on to the maids, although she still retained ownership. It was highly probable that the mother dog Odette discovered in the woods originated from Theodora's residence.

Maria couldn't understand why Odette and Bastian would choose to keep Margrethe in their household. However, for Bastian, it didn't matter. A dog was a dog, plain and simple. Considering that the dog was born and raised within his mansion's estate, one could argue that it rightfully belonged to Odette. Even if legal ownership rested with the woman, once Bastian took the dog under his care, it undeniably became his own.

Bastian divided the peeled egg into two halves and placed one portion in a small dish. Margrethe, having quietly approached, now sat beneath the table.

After careful thought, he decided to give her half of the egg from his dish. As Bastian observed Meg, a memory surfaced of a dog that would devour an entire egg in a single gulp.

Once upon a time, a sizable dog, resembling a wolf, roamed the woods. However, its fate led it to meet its demise in that very forest, at the hands of Bastian. Now, it existed only as a distant memory, faded and long forgotten.

Bastian cleaned his hands with a napkin and set the dish with half of the egg beside his chair. Margrethe hesitated briefly but soon approached, burying her face in the dish and devouring the egg with great speed.

Gone was the legance in her eating manners, as her face remained submerged in the dish. Bastian smiled and cleared the now empty dish, tidying up after the meal. Margrethe returned to the bedroom, once again baring her teeth at him, with her mouth covered in remnants of egg yolk.

Suddenly, the door swung open, and Odette returned after finishing her phone call.

"What's this?" Odette asked as she held the dog.

Bastian leisurely poured himself another cup of coffee. With most of the household staff dismissed, he now had additional responsibilities to handle on his own,

"Bastian, did you give Meg some food?"

"Well, why don't you ask the shy lady herself?" Holding his teacup, he responded, subtly avoiding the question.

"Oh my god~Margrethe!" Glaring at the dog in her arms, Odette's scolding voice pierced through the cozy warmth of the room.

Bastian briefly looked up, exchanging a quick glance with his partner in crime. Odette's dog couldn't contain her excitement as she eagerly licked up the remaining egg crumbs, her pink tongue darting in and out.



"I think I lost my brooch in the study that day."

As Odette approached the entrance of the mansion, she gathered her courage and finally spoke up. Despite her inner tension, she adeptly concealed her emotions, ensuring to raise her voice enough for the nearby staff members to hear.

"May I go and look for it?" she asked.

Bastian furrowed his brow slightly. "Why are you asking me about it?"

Odette calmly replied, "Because it's your office. I thought it would be best not to enter without permission." She spoke the words she had rehearsed numerous times with composure.

‘Please.’ As they reached the area beneath the mansion's staircase, where the car was waiting, Odette fervently prayed.

"Bastian?" Unconsciously, Odette reached out and gripped a corner of his cuff.

"Do as you wish, Odette.”At the foolish mistake Odette had made, Bastian couldn't help but release a soft laugh. “There is no place in this house that you cannot enter."

"Thank you."

She masked her bewildered feelings behind a bright smile. It appeared that asking in front of numerous onlookers had proven effective. As the naval festival approached, they, as a deeply affectionate couple, needed to present themselves in a manner befitting their reputation.

"Bye."

With a farewell gesture, Odette let go of Bastian's cuff. In a fleeting moment, Bastian planted a brief kiss on her cheek. It was an affectionate display that momentarily flustered her, but she swiftly regained her composure.

Bastian was a man who meticulously calculated every action, even in the smallest of gestures. It was reasonable to interpret his behavior as a thoughtful response to the attention surrounding them.

Bastian, as usual, hopped into the driver's seat and embarked on his journey to work. As the car gradually moved away from the entrance, Odette turned around and gracefully made her exit, with the staff members playfully trailing behind her like a parade.

"Ah, I need to stop by the study for a moment. I have to find the brooch." Odette declared, altering her course and making her way towards the east wing on the second floor, where the study was situated.

"Shall I go check for you?" Dora, the maid, offered reluctantly.

"No, Dora. I'll take care of it,"

Disregarding the maid's hesitant assistance, Odette hastened towards the study. The weighty door creaked open, and after entering, it swiftly closed with a decisive click of the lock.

Chapter 82
Number of Course








"I'm at a loss for what to do next, as continuing down this path will only lead to more obstacles in our business. On the bright side, our conversations have grown increasingly comfortable." 

Theodora Klauswitz was spotted picking up a sheet music book from an aged bookshelf. She absentmindedly flipped through the pages without truly reading them.

Odette sat before her, examining the sheet music book once again, her hands shaking. The only occupants of the store were the two of them and the elderly shop owner, who sat behind the shelves. Beside him, a gramophone played a record. Today, it featured a whimsical fantasy tune, its beautiful melody filling the empty store. Yet, the enchanting music seemed out of place amidst their tense and suspicious encounter.

"Here is the list of names you asked for." Odette carefully passed an envelope she had retrieved from her coat pocket.

Theodora nonchalantly accepted the envelope and opened it. As she scanned its contents, her eyebrows lifted in surprise. "There are quite a few intriguing names here. Are you certain this is all you have?"

"I haven't managed to gather more information than this," Odette replied.

"We're short on time, and we can't afford any delays. You're aware of that, right?"

"Bastian spends most of his time at the company. The information I can obtain at home is limited..."

"In that case, head to his company," Theodora interjected before Odette could finish her sentence.

"My apologies, Odette. I can't help but be frustrated by your attitude, treating this situation as if it's merely a game. If this is the best you can do, are you simply too complacent and lazy?" Theodora chided.

"If you're not happy, then find someone else!"

"You're hardly in a position to shout at me, Odette!"

"The same applies to you."

Despite her current vulnerability, with her neck in chains and Theodora holding the reins, Odette maintained an air of pride and arrogance. Theodora, however, smiled and nodded approvingly as she placed the paper Odette had given her on the table.

It was this boldness that Odette needed to betray Bastian Klauswitz. No other approach could defeat him. This was the most effective strategy, albeit with numerous limitations.

"Odette, if I may, don't squander your time looking into Mrs. Palmer. It would be best if you focused on the task at hand."

"You're still keeping tabs on me and investigating, I see," Odette sighed, not appearing overly surprised.

Her father had indeed rescinded his decision to involve the building manager's wife as a witness to the accident. Thus, whether Mrs. Palmer was present at the scene was no longer relevant.

She was convinced that Mrs. Palmer hadn't seen the incident, but she wanted to be absolutely sure. That's why she had hired a private investigator to look into Mrs. Palmer. She had tried to be discreet, but it seemed Theodora Klauswitz's spies weren't limited to just Molly.

"I just want to ensure everything is crystal clear," Odette explained.

"Fine," Theodora replied, turning and shrugging her shoulders. "I'll grant you one more opportunity. But remember, time is running out."

"This is the last time. Please honor your word."

"I understand. Once the festival concludes, Bastian will leave Berg, correct? We won't be able to monitor him for a while," Theodora said, her expression tinged with regret.

All she needed was to buy time until her divorce from Bastian was finalized. This reality allowed Odette to bear the weight of her guilt for the time being.

Trusting Theodora Klauswitz had been a mistake. When Bastian returned, she knew that Theodora would undoubtedly make outlandish demands and threaten her once more. However, by that point, she might no longer be Bastian's wife, offering Odette a sense of relief.

After their marriage, she planned to journey with Tira to the New World—a place so distant that they could remain hidden from everyone.

If a scandal were to erupt during that time, its impact would be significantly less than if it occurred in the present. By then, Bastian would have established a much more solid foundation, and his agreement with the emperor would be finalized. She hoped that Bastian would marry Sandrine as soon as possible after their divorce, so her presence as his ex-wife would fade away like a vanishing stain.

"Speaking of which, Bastian's railway company... Is he collaborating with Laviere?" Theodora's sudden mention of the man's name sent a chill down Odette's spine. "It appears the relationship between Duke Laviere's daughter and Bastian is more than just an ordinary friendship. What are your thoughts, Odette?"

"Bastian isn't that type of man.” Without hesitation, Odette shook her head. “Not every family involved in business partnerships has relationships like you're suggesting." She was well aware that Theodora was trying to bait her, and she was determined not to fall for it.

"Do you trust men? You must possess a naive side as well," Theodora sneered.

"I'd rather not discuss my husband."

"I'm merely concerned for you. I have a keen intuition—it's how I met Jeff. Back then, Bastian's mother thought just like you, believing her husband wasn't that type of man. But you've seen the outcome, haven't you?" Theodora smiled as she reminisced about her past affair as if it were a cherished memory. Odette could only listen in silence.

"In that case, my trust in Bastian is even stronger. He's witnessed his mother's struggles, so he won't repeat his father's mistakes," Odette declared.

"People aren't as noble as you think, Odette. Have you forgotten? Bastian is strikingly similar to his father. Haven't you heard that blood is thicker than water?"

"I'm amazed at how proudly you can say all of that. Don't you feel any guilt or shame towards Bastian?"

"Not in the slightest." Theodora laughed, as if she'd heard a hilarious joke, while adjusting her dress collar. "One last piece of advice, Odette: don't be a hypocrite. It's far more contemptible." her whispered words were filled with affection, reminiscent of a fantasy melody playing in the store. "I hope we can meet again soon." she patted Odette's shoulder as she walked past her.

The sound of the bell ceased, but Odette remained motionless, sitting alone at the table for a while.

The fantasy song came to an end, and the gramophone began playing the next symphony—the same tune that resonated in the Reinfeldt living room on a spring afternoon brimming with blossoming flowers.



The Admiralty canteen bustled with soldiers gathering for lunch. The dining area spanned three floors: the top floor reserved for high-ranking officers, boasting the elegance of a fine restaurant, while the two lower floors housed the more casual canteens.

Bastian found a table near a second-floor window. He struggled to recall the last time he had dined with his superiors, realizing it must have been ages ago.

"Bastian! You got here so fast!"

An officer with a somber expression approached and sat across from him. Hailing from a middle-class family, he held no title, and his military achievements were rather ordinary. Although he had served in the military far longer than Bastian, his rank remained at captain, just like the younger Bastian.

"What brings you here? It's not often that someone as busy as you from the festival comes to see me," the officer inquired.

"I wanted to catch up with you at least once before I leave."

"Take it easy. I'm not your superior anymore. You'll be promoted to major soon, so there's no need to be so formal with me." The officer waved his hand dismissively, but his face broke into a warm smile.

The long-overdue lunch reunion between the two officers commenced with polite greetings. They proceeded to discuss current events and news from the Admiralty. As they engaged in conversation, covering a range of topics that were more mundane than intriguing, the canteen filled with even more soldiers.

"How's life on the Trosa Islands these days?" Bastian ventured to ask as their lunch neared its end.

"Why ask me? You used to live there too," the officer responded, puzzled.

"I know, but living there with my wife must be a different experience, right?"

Upon hearing the clarification, the officer smiled and nodded, finally grasping Bastian's point. He reminisced about their time serving together on the Trosa Islands. Back then, Bastian was single, while he had brought his small family—his wife and child—to live on the island.

"In a nutshell, women wouldn't be content living there. The weather is harsh, and the houses are old. Even the most thriving city there pales in comparison to the countryside here."

"Did your wife despise living there?" Bastian probed.

"Well... it's not just that, my friend." The officer grinned and scratched his cheek. "My wife complained daily. But despite the many discomforts, we were happy because we were together. It felt like residing in a hidden paradise—lonely, yet peaceful and joyful."

"I see."

"That place holds a special place in our hearts because our youngest daughter was conceived and born there. With nothing around, I truly experienced life with my little family. I spent ample time with my loved ones, and it felt like living in paradise." The officer's eyes sparkled, his nostalgic memories seemingly dancing in his pupils. Bastian smiled. While his former superior's military career might not have been particularly remarkable, he had found success and happiness in his personal life. That was why Bastian held him in such high regard.

"Speaking of which, wasn't it your decision to go on this trip alone, without your wife? That's the gossip I've heard."

"Just yesterday, I informed my superior of my intention to travel solo."

"Are you having second thoughts now?"

"I'm still considering my options and trying to determine the best course of action."

"You must be struggling with the thought of leaving your gorgeous wife behind," the officer said, nodding before bursting into laughter. "I never imagined there would come a day when Bastian Klauswitz would seek my advice on marital matters. It's refreshing to see you as a regular human being for once." He looked at Bastian with a newfound warmth in his eyes. "If I were in your shoes, I'd be honest with her. Tell her you love her and can't imagine life without her. Suggest that you go together. Trust me, no wife would turn down her husband's invitation after such a heartfelt confession."

"I hadn't considered that approach."

"Well, if you say so."

Eager to shift the conversation, the officer began sharing stories about his youngest daughter. This helped to lighten the mood, and their lunch came to a close on a more relaxed note.

After saying their goodbyes, Bastian headed to the water park instead of returning to his headquarters. He didn't want to backtrack on his decision to go alone, but the thought of spending his nights and mornings without Odette by his side was unbearable. He couldn't understand why he felt this way, having only spent two seasons with her. Had Odette truly become that significant in his life?

How absurd...

Bastian found a bench overlooking the Prater River and took a seat. Lighting a cigarette, he admired the elegant arched bridge spanning the river. In the sky above, dark clouds began to gather, signaling the approach of rain.



As the rain began to ease, she found herself in the bustling financial district at the heart of Ratz city. She had forgotten her umbrella. Seeking refuge under a store awning, she watched the relentless rain show no signs of stopping.

Upon leaving the music store, Odette headed to her car and instructed the driver to go home without her. This deliberate decision allowed her some much-needed solitude to gather her thoughts and strengthen her resolve. Bastian had informed her that he would be working late at the office today. Knowing he was probably still there, Odette had no choice but to seek him out.

She meandered through the city streets, weighed down by her thoughts and unsure of her next steps. Even if she could gain access to Bastian's office, she would need time to search for the documents. And with Bastian by her side, she knew she wouldn't be left alone.

How could she get him to leave?

As she was on the verge of giving up, a sleek black car pulled up beside the central bank. The majestic building, adorned with marble walls, belonged to Bastian.

The driver stepped out from the car, opening an umbrella and the rear door. A middle-aged man and a long-haired redhead woman emerged from the vehicle. It was Sandrine de Laviere, accompanied by her father.

Recognizing the woman, Odette instinctively hid in a nearby alley. What brought Duke Lavière here? she thought. However her lingering doubts were soon dispelled as a familiar figure appeared from within the building. Her husband, Bastian, descended the stairs and greeted the visitors with a courteous smile. After exchanging pleasantries with Duke Lavière, he turned his attention to Sandrine, who stood beside her father. Together, the trio entered the company lobby.

Odette observed the unfolding scene before her, as the torrential rain outside muffled the city's clamor.

Chapter 83
The Man with The Key








The unforeseen appearance of an uninvited guest hastened the conclusion of Bastian's conversation with Duke Laviere.

"Ultimately, Bastian, this is all due to your hard work. I have faith that we can nurture a strong relationship moving forward." Duke Laviere said as he stood up from his seat. He didn’t want to leave his daughter, who was evidently smitten with Bastian, in a state of uncertainty any longer.

Bastian bade the Duke farewell, a smile gracing his lips. He had merely sought a formal gathering to commemorate his business achievements and engage in cordial exchanges with his associates. With no desire to prolong the wait, he had already addressed all crucial matters via phone calls and letters.

"Upon our next encounter, you shall be Mayor Klauswitz." Sandrine abruptly turned at the door, prompting Bastian to instinctively step back.

"Indeed, Countess Lenart."

"Congratulations, I am immensely proud of you." Sandrine took off her right glove and held out her hand for a handshake. 

Duke Laviere allowed his daughter the chance to pursue her wishes. As usual, Bastian shook Sandrine's hand with politeness. His attitude was amiable, but nothing beyond that. When Sandrine tenderly interlaced her fingers, Bastian quickly withdrew from the handshake.

"What gentleman you are. We shall reconvene in Lausanne." Sandrine nodded, her mischievous grin betraying a momentary forgetfulness of her father's existence.

Once he had said his goodbyes to the Duke, Bastian took a seat at the table and reached for the readied cigar. As the secretary exited the room after straightening the table, a hush fell over the space.

Lost in thought, Bastian found himself grappling with a question that had never before crossed his mind.  Had he made the right choice in pursuing a relationship with Sandrine?

As he puffed on his cigar, the sound of rain lashing against the window filled his ears. Though he still had documents to examine before the meeting, his focus had faltered in a way he had never previously experienced.

Odette.

Bastian found himself teetering on the edge of bewilderment when a soft knock echoed through the room.

"Do come in," he responded, a dusty cigar perched between his fingers. As the door swung open, his secretary's startled expression caught his eye.

"Sir, you have a visitor."

"A visitor? But wasn't Duke Laviere the only one scheduled for today?" Bastian's brow furrowed as he studied his secretary's face.

"Well, the person who arrived is..."

A shadow materialized from behind the secretary. As Bastian reignited his cigar, the unanticipated guest came into view.

"Bastian."

The crystalline voice cut through the din of the rain cascading beyond the window. Bastian released a plume of smoke and rose from his seat with haste. His annoyance evaporated in a heartbeat, supplanted by a wry chuckle that slipped past his lips.

The familiar woman, Odette, lingered in the open doorway, her body drenched and trembling from the cold's icy touch. A fatigued grin graced her lovely face.



"My apologies, Bastian, for arriving unannounced and without any prior notice," Odette said, feeling a mix of guilt and unease as the silence around them grew more pronounced.

Bastian merely gazed at her, his face betraying no emotion, neither delight nor astonishment. Nonetheless, realizing he wasn't angered or annoyed, Odette experienced a slight sense of relief.

Setting her teacup down, Odette tried to neaten her disordered rain-kissed attire with hands numbed by the cold. Her raincoat was drenched, yet, by fortune's grace, her blouse and skirt had escaped the worst of the dampness.

"I missed you, and that's why I'm here," Odette confessed with a smile, sharing the explanation she had readied. She gripped the drying firmly. Bastian, meanwhile, leaned against the chair's armrest, his eyes fixed on her but his lips remaining sealed. His reaction caught Odette somewhat off guard, but there was no turning back now.

"I'm sorry if I've caused any inconvenience. It's just that..."

"Where's your car? And why are you soaked like this?" Bastian finally spoke, his sharp gaze causing Odette to shiver.

"I sent Hans back to Ardenne first."

"And why would you do that?"

"I thought we could ride home together…in your car."

A wave of anxiety washed over Odette. She endeavored to maintain a calm facade, smiling and laughing as if it were all a lighthearted joke. Yet Bastian's intense stare persisted.

Desperate to ease her own nerves and avoid arousing Bastian's suspicion, Odette acknowledged the peculiarity of her actions but couldn't conceive of an alternative approach.

This weekend, Bastian was set to travel to Lausanne for the Naval Festival. Today marked Odette's first and last opportunity to infiltrate Bastian's office. Having already ventured too far to retreat, she had no choice but to take a daring leap.

Once more, Odette fortified her determination. The moment she hide in a shadowy alleyway, watching Duke Laviere and Sandrine, she resolved to cast aside her shame.

With an air of boldness, she executed her devious strategy, deliberately exposing herself to the rain in hopes of winning Bastian's sympathy. Theodora Klauswitz's words rang true: -Don't be a hypocrite-. If one must commit a wrongdoing, it should be done wholeheartedly and to the best of one's ability.

"Sir, the meeting is about to commence," announced the secretary from behind the door, dissipating the tension that hung in the air between them. For Odette, this news felt like a godsend.

"Understood, I'll be there shortly," Bastian responded. He quickly returned to his desk, organizing the disarray of papers before placing them on the shelf behind him. At the same time, he stowed the yellow folder in the bottom drawer.

With feigned nonchalance, Odette observed his every move while pretending to dry her damp hair. The bottom drawer... she committed it to memory just as the distinct sound of a metallic click reached her ears. A wave of despair washed over her as she realized Bastian had locked the drawer, slipping the tiny golden key into his jacket pocket before rising to his feet.

"The meeting should take about an hour, so please make yourself comfortable here," Bastian suggested, stealing a glance at his watch.

"Very well," acquiesced Odette, her smile accompanied by a nod.

"Should you require anything, don't hesitate to call my secretary."

"There's no need, Bastian. I'm more than content."

As Odette's laughter filled the room, a faint smile graced Bastian's lips. The fire's dance of light and shadow played upon his face, flickering the subtle shifts in his expression.

"I'll be back for you. Once the meeting concludes, we'll head home together." 

After saying that, Bastian exited his office. Holding her damp towel tightly, Odette listened intently to the voices outside the door, biding her time. As the footsteps in the hallway faded away, she sprang into action.

Though her initial instinct was to head straight for the locked bottom drawer, the absence of a spare key prompted her to save that task for last and search for documents elsewhere first.

Odette sifted through the shelves where document boxes were stored in the cabinet. Her heart raced. Despite her anxiety, she tried to search meticulously, careful not to leave any incriminating evidence behind.

Mine. The diamond mine.

These words haunted her mind, redoubling the pressure she felt. She glanced at the wall clock... in 30 minutes, the meeting would finish, and Bastian would return to his office.

After finding several papers listing the names of new investors, Odette continued to scour the desk drawers. Despite her thorough search, she found no documents pertaining to the mine. In a desperate attempt, she tried to force open the locked bottom drawer, but to no avail. Glancing at the clock once more, she realized she had a mere 5 minutes left. The once-silent hallway now buzzed with chatter as the meeting drew to a close.

Seizing the papers she'd recovered, Odette dashed to the coat hanging near the fireplace. She hastily folded the papers and stashed them in her pocket, as the sound of approaching footsteps grew louder.

"Come on, think!" Odette sighed, gazing at the fireplace. As soon as Bastian returned, they'd have to make a swift exit. This meant that her mission to steal the documents would ultimately fail.

The key in that man's pocket. How could she possibly get it?

After pondering for a moment,  Odette lay down on the sofa and hunched over. She closed her eyes, almost in sync with Bastian opening the door to his office.



As Bastian opened the door, he was amazed to find Odette peacefully sleeping on the sofa, basking in the tender warmth of the fireplace's amber embrace.  He gazed upon his  wife, his heart veiled in a delicate haze of uncertainty.

He had never been a fan of bright lights. A lone lamp on his desk served as the sole source of illumination in his workspace. Yet, the tender dance of the fireplace's flames cast a soft light upon the slumbering Odette, crafting a heartwarming and tranquil tableau that stirred his soul.

With great care, Bastian approached Odette, taking measured, silent steps so as not to disturb her rest. Her dark tresses, waves of midnight silk, cascaded gracefully, veiling half of her tender, ethereal face. Bastian took a seat on the floor, leaning against the sofa's armrest. Tenderly, he brushed aside the hair masking Odette's lovely countenance, unveiling her peaceful expression.

He had long been one to embrace the night's whispers and greet the dawn before her. This routine had naturally evolved since first they shared a bed.  Bastian began to fathom the depths of his actions. He treasured the moments he could steal a glimpse of her serene face beside him.

It was a tranquility, a haven, that he had discovered and welcomed into his heart for the first time. Even as he had resolved to journey to Trosa, unaccompanied, his thoughts were ever tethered to her. Now, everything became clear...... for he could not bear the thought of losing her.

Bastian tenderly traced the contours of Odette's silken cheek, as the fire's gentle glow cast a blush upon her delicate, fair complexion.

"Odette..."

Odette's eyes fluttered open as Bastian whispered her name. To his surprise, the woman who should have been vigilant instead gifted him with an innocent smile.

Bastian sighed and retracted his hand from Odette's cheek, his gaze falling. However, as he tried to rise, Odette quickly seized his hand. Her lips quivered, yet she couldn't articulate a single syllable. She merely blinked her large eyes while clutching the hem of Bastian's sleeve.

Even as Bastian settled back down, Odette refused to relinquish her grip on the sleeve.

"Bastian..." Odette murmured, sitting up and making space for Bastian to join her on the sofa. "Just for a mome...."

Suddenly Odette's world turned upside down. As soon as she regained consciousness, she found herself lying on a sofa, staring at the ceiling of the room.

What happened?

With trepidation swirling in her heart, her gaze was unexpectedly veiled by a face she familiar with. The cry that sprang forth from her soul was swiftly hushed as their lips entwined in a fervent dance of passion.

The man with the key climbed on top of her. As she found herself powerless to resist, their fervent and ardent kiss blossomed like a fiery rose.

The key is in the right pocket...

In the waning moments of her lucidity, as the tendrils of desire entwined her consciousness, that fleeting thought was the final whisper her mind could conjure.


Chapter 84
﻿

 Desperate Hope









Bastian's breath grew labored, intensifying alongside the heat emanating from Odette's touch. Their heightened senses, resembling rushing waves, eroded their rationality without delay. Ultimately, Bastian relinquished the last remnants of self-control he desperately clung to, succumbing to his longing. He untangled her cumbersome skirt and, in succession, slipped his hand beneath her blouse. Odette's scream was engulfed by his fervent kiss, as his lips once more indulged in the taste of her tender lips.

Upon realizing the identity, location, and nature of his actions, a heated laughter escaped his lips. It felt as though the sturdy life he had diligently constructed was gradually crumbling solely due to this woman, imparting upon him a futile yet strangely satisfying sense of surrender.

"Bastian!" Odette's resistance grew as his hand ventured beneath her undergarments, aiming for her breast.

Her abrupt shift in demeanor vexed Bastian, but undeterred, he lowered his head and nibbled on her bouncing breast. It was she who had initially approached him, pretending to be uninterested now would alter nothing.

A suppressed moan accompanied by heavy breathing overtook the sound of the non-stop rain. Bastian sucked at her breasts like a hungry beast. Yet, the more she tried to escape, the stronger he pushed her down underneath his claws.

Though Odette’s consciousness started to fade away, yet, tried her best not to forget her intended purpose. She had just begun to reach for the pocket of his jacket when Bastian bit the hardened tips of her breast.

"Ah!" Startled, she let out a scream that compelled her to hastily cover her lips. Yet, before the lingering intensity of that forceful sensation could fade, his hand warmly seized her other breast.

Consumed by instinctual fear, Odette exerted all her strength to push his shoulder, initiating a fervent struggle. It was only when her moans gradually subsided into soft cries that he finally lifted his head.

Bastian cast his eyes downward, their darkness mirroring the rainy night outside, as he observed Odette, half-naked and breathless, while he remained composed and immaculate. Despite his serious demeanor, his lips were reddened and glossy, betraying the hidden intensity beneath.

His silent gaze tracked her every motion, accompanied by the increasingly strained rhythm of his breath. Odette pondered if this could be her final opportunity—if she declined now, perhaps they could still halt their actions.

However, what about the key?

Overwhelmed with an unshed sorrow, she gazed at the pocket on his jacket where the key resided, still in his possession. If she chose to separate herself from Bastian, this chance would never present itself again.

"Just a little further..."

In the end, Odette found herself compelled to tread this desolate path. They were presently within the company's office, a place that once housed Sandrine. Surely, he wouldn't stoop so low as to violate a woman who was on the brink of divorcing him within these walls. These considerations ultimately led her to take a reckless gamble.

As her futile resistance gradually waned, a stifling silence settled between them. Odette attempted to remain motionless beneath Bastian's presence, yet her body quivered gently with each breath she took. Witnessing this sight, his eyes became increasingly clouded with a mixture of vexation and desire that surged to the forefront of his mind.

Ultimately, the bewilderment provoked by the woman before him manifested as a distorted laughter. He felt like filth, as if he were being ridiculed, yet he had no desire to halt. Bastian now realized that it had always been this way, ever since that fateful moment when he encountered this unwanted stroke of luck at the clandestine gambling table. No, perhaps he had known it from the very beginning.

Bastian exhaled heavily, mingling his laughter with a string of curses. By the time Odette finally caught wind of his vulgar words, he was already devouring her lips with unrestrained fervor, as if the tranquil waters had instantaneously transformed into a raging torrent.

With an intensity bordering on bruising, he passionately kissed her while firmly gripping her face. In the midst of this arduous circumstance, Odette, on the other hand, frantically searched for the key.

"Please!" she pleaded desperately. Her heart pounded as if it might burst, and at last, she succeeded in reaching the correct pocket of his jacket. Bastian, who had been busily nibbling her earlobes mere moments ago, now buried his face in the nape of her neck.

Fearful of him discovering her actions, Odette shielded the back of Bastian's head with one hand while delving her other hand deep into his pocket. Just as frustration was beginning to overwhelm her search for the key, her fingers finally brushed against a chilly metallic object.

Reacting swiftly, she instinctively seized it, prompting Bastian to discard his jacket, swiftly followed by his tie. Odette attempted to push him away, her other hand tightly gripping the key she nearly overlooked. It was upon hearing the sound of a belt being unbuckled that a suspicion crept into her mind, suggesting that something was amiss.

"Stop! Bastian, no!" she shouted desperately, her voice filled with fear, hoping her words would penetrate his indifference. Nevertheless, Bastian callously removed her blouse and bra, which clung precariously, showing no concern for her protests.

"Please, please...," she pleaded, her words cut short as her last remaining underwear was swiftly discarded. Startled by the sudden rush of cool air and the piercing gaze fixated on her exposed form, Odette began to struggle like a trapped creature. She managed to wriggle free from his grasp by contorting her body, but before she could rise from the sofa, she was apprehended and forcefully thrown back down.

'The key!'

In a sudden realization, she hastily concealed the golden key, clasping it tightly within her clenched fists. Meanwhile, he took hold of her and positioned himself between her parted legs. Bastian, unhesitatingly exploring her intimate area, furrowed his brow in concentration. Everything transpired with such rapidity that she had no opportunity to refuse, causing her grip on the key to loosen in response to his unforeseen actions. Ultimately, she had no choice but to turn her head, seeking a secure hiding spot for the key. It was then that she finally spotted a crevice between the backrest and cushion, just as she felt his breath graze her lower abdomen.

She observed the bewildering scene with a mix of curiosity and apprehension, her expression reflecting a near-fearful questioning. The sight of Bastian's face positioned between her spread legs confronted her, evoking a sense of embarrassment she couldn't ignore. Uncertain of his true intentions, she was left in a daze, unable to fully comprehend the situation.

"W-what?" she stammered, only to have his intentions unveiled, filling her with an overwhelming sense of shame. Horrified, Odette began to struggle, her initial focus on protecting the key fading into the background. However, he effortlessly subdued her resistance, overpowering her with little effort.

Soon, the rhythmic sound of moist, intimate kisses intermingled with heated breaths filled the air. Confronted with the inescapable reality of this embarrassing situation, she made the decision to shield her eyes. As her breath quickened in sync with the moist sensations of pleasure, a sudden recollection struck her—she remembered the key she had concealed.

With great effort, Odette forced her eyes open, her hand trembling as she extended it, guiding the key into the hidden crevice she had discovered earlier. Bastian remained fixated, not lifting his head until she had completely concealed it.

"Thank God..." Escaping in a relieved sigh, a spontaneous moan swiftly escaped Odette's lips.

The overwhelming pleasure she experienced left her with a profound sense of being objectified, fueling her heart with guilt and shame. As these conflicting emotions mingled with the ecstasy coursing through her, Bastian finally lifted his head, his wet lips glistening from the taste of her. Without hesitation, he enveloped Odette with his slender frame, ensnaring her within his passionate embrace.

"Bastian..." Her voice trembled as she called out his name, clinging to one last sliver of hope. His narrowed eyes met hers as she raised a quivering hand to shield her face.

She understood the urgency of speaking up, yet her lips remained paralyzed, unable to utter a single word. All Odette could do was weep as she maintained her unwavering gaze upon him—a gaze that was both fearful and enticing, infused with a sense of wretchedness, as if pleading to him.

Bastian, his expression inscrutable, abruptly seized Odette's hair with a brutal grip. His chilling gaze, brimming with intensity, was a facet she had never witnessed before, completely overpowering her.

With a gentle touch, he tenderly wiped away her tears, his voice hushed and soft. As she struggled to grasp the significance of his words, he proceeded to unfasten his belt and lower his trousers.

Odette, silently observing his actions, involuntarily let out a small shriek. She attempted to flee, but her petite frame proved insufficient to overcome his strength. Bastian, on the contrary, laughed in astonishment, enveloping her in his arms. Only after he settled her back down did Odette finally comprehend the intent behind his actions.

Bastian positioned himself atop her, his groin pressing against her, his hand fervently stroking his throbbing erection. Even as his breathing grew labored, his unwavering gaze remained fixed upon Odette—a possessive stare that intensified her feelings of shame.

Unable to endure the scene any longer, Odette swiftly averted her gaze from the vulgar display. However, the audacious and shameless man refused to yield so easily. A large hand seized her chin, forcibly redirecting her gaze.

When their eyes met once more, Bastian's triumphant smile emerged—an impudent ruler devoid of any semblance of shame.



Lying motionless in the corner of the couch, Odette appeared lifeless. Bastian caught a glimpse of her through the mirror as he shut off the running water in the sink. He dried his hands with a towel, meticulously tending to his disheveled hair and clothing. After ensuring his attire was impeccable once more, he approached the sofa with his characteristic calmness.

In contrast, Odette's breaths were shallow as she lay there, devoid of strength. He proceeded to cleanse the evidence of his audacious deeds from the woman's body, using the damp towel in his hand, disregarding the woman's startled protest. His touch traversed her slender form, devoid of any remnants of desire, his demeanor composed and detached as he effortlessly subdued her feeble attempts to resist.

"Stop. I beg you, please," Odette pleaded, her resistance escalating as his hand traveled across her chest and abdomen, eventually reaching her intimate area.

Attempting to rise, she settled herself in the corner of the sofa, hugging her body protectively. It struck Bastian as amusing how she now assumed a naive demeanor, but he was not one to easily relent in the face of such actions.

"Please, give me a moment alone," she requested, as Bastian retrieved her clothes from beneath the sofa and handed them to her. Her cheeks, and even her earlobes, were flushed with a deep shade of red, lending an air of absurdity to her plea.

The bashful side of Odette was difficult to comprehend, yet Bastian willingly acquiesced to her request. Placing her clothes on the armrest of the sofa, he retrieved a cigarette and a lighter, then departed from the office.

As he prepared to close the door, Bastian cast a glance over his shoulder. Odette, who was studiously observing his retreat, averted her gaze. Her hurried embrace of her clothing exhibited an endearing charm, a facet of her personality he had never anticipated.

With a smile on his face, he closed the door to the office and proceeded down the lengthy corridor, reaching the opposite end of the building where a break room awaited. As he entered, the staff who were engaged in conversations and smoking hastily rose from their seats to greet him.

"...Don't worry about it. Carry on with your break," Bastian reassured them, breaking his silence before making his way to a seat by the window.

A light drizzle gently dampened the streets outside. Illuminated signboards, shimmering lights, and passing car headlights painted the rainy night in vibrant hues. It was an ordinary night, yet it conjured memories of the madness he had unleashed


Chapter 85
Diamond








Moments after Bastian's departure and the door's soft click, Odette deftly took the golden key hidden within the sofa's crevice. Clad in barely-there attire, she rushed to the office door, locked it, and hurried to Bastian's desk. 

With utmost care, she slid the key into the drawer lock, twisting it until a satisfying click signaled its unlocked state. Inhaling deeply, Odette pulled the drawer open. Despair swiftly gave way to hope as she saw the meticulously alphabetized pile of documents, reminiscent of the organization in the mansion's library - which seemed to be Bastian's habit.

"Diamond."

With agile fingers, Odette began her hunt for a folder bearing the initial D, stealing furtive glances at the wall clock. Each ticking second gnawed away at her patience. A mere 10 minutes were all she had to locate the folder Theodora sought.

 Failure would render her efforts futile. Yet Odette refused to let that transpire. Her heart lay in pieces, but she wiped away the tears clouding her vision. She tightened her grip to quell the tremors in her fingers as she continued her meticulous search through folder after folder.

Diamond ~ Finally, she spotted a label bearing that name, but alas, it was not the mine document she was looking for. Time had slipped by unnoticed, and five precious minutes had already vanished.

Ah, this is it! Diamond mine.

Upon discovering the coveted document, Odette crumpled onto the plush carpet. Relief flooded her heart, and her breath came in ragged gasps as if she had just sprinted. Nausea churned in her stomach, threatening to expel its contents, while on the other hand, she also wanted to cry.

After calming herself, Odette crawled back to the drawer, methodically gathering the strewn papers from the floor. As she returned the documents to their rightful place and secured the lock, her gaze fell upon her reflection in the glass cabinet.

Before her stood a woman, scantily clad and dazed. The pearl necklace and stockings adorning her body rendered her like a harlot. Rising to her feet, Odette disgust and disappointment that threatened to engulf her like a colossal wave.

With the document and drawer key in hand, Odette unlocked the office door and walked towards the fireplace. The ripped papers were folded neatly and tucked into her jacket pocket. She tossed the file folder into the roaring flames and placed the drawer key on the floor near the sofa, as if Bastian had carelessly dropped it—an idea that had struck her as she writhed beneath his body.

At last, everything was in place. After a thorough inspection of the room, Odette hastily dressed, marveling at the strength she could still summon to move her battered body.

Just as she fastened the final button on her blouse, a knock resounded on the door.

"Yes. Please come in," Odette calmly replied. 

Bastian entered the office wordlessly, greeted by Odette's serene smile.

"Sorry Bastian, I haven't finished tidying up yet. Could you wait a moment?" Odette requested, smoothing her hair as if nothing had happened.

Bastian nodded and settled onto the couch, sinking into its soft embrace. As he reclined, his eyes were drawn to Odette's elegant figure, gracefully braiding her ebony tresses, their dark lustre contrasting beautifully with her alabaster skin.

Fond memories of his touch on her body lingered in Bastian's thoughts, sending waves of anticipation coursing through his fingertips. As Odette artfully secured her braid, her refined updo took shape, transforming her into a picture of perfection— a far cry from the disheveled woman sprawled on the couch earlier.

"Well, I'm done," Odette announced, her smile radiant as she turned to face Bastian. 

A question….weighed heavy on his heart: What do I actually mean to you? But he let the thought dissipate, unanswered. Rising from the couch, Bastian's eyes caught sight of the key to his desk drawer, lying forgotten on the carpet.

'It must have fallen during our tussle …' Bastian mused, retrieving the key and slipping it into his suit pocket.

Odette quietly took in the scene before her, then gracefully rose to her feet. When Bastian donned his coat from the hanger, he noticed Odette's coat drying by the warmth of the fireplace.

The pretty blue Sabine coat, as Bastian fondly referred to it, captivated him, despite his limited knowledge of women's fashion. He had once asked his aunt to craft a new coat for Odette, and he was quite pleased with the result: a beautiful, warm blue coat. Odette's worn, threadbare coat now gently drifted  into the realm of forgotten memories.

"No need, Bastian. I can put it on myself..." Odette interjected, taken aback. She was hesitant to let Bastian handle her clothing; surely, that was crossing a line? Bastian's brow furrowed in response.

Despite her protests, Odette's cheeks flushed a delicate pink as Bastian persisted in helping her into the coat. The warmth of her rosy cheeks and the tender dance of her lashes only heightened her mesmerizing charm.

With a tender touch, Bastian grasped his wife's hand and led her out of the office.

Their silhouettes, tenderly entwined, cast a poetic shadow as they strolled hand in hand through the serene company corridor.



From a distance, the majestic structure loomed above. Odette found herself spellbound, her eyes fixated on the bewitching Ferris wheel. The sparkling behemoth, embellished with soft lights, elegantly glided across the night sky above the city, beneath the tender embrace of the falling rain. Droplets on the car window enhanced the charm of the ride's lights, painting a dreamy twilight scene.

Odette couldn't help but steal a glance at Bastian's face as he focused on driving.

Bastian Klauswitz was a man driven by ambition, willing to go to great lengths to achieve his goals, even agreeing to an arranged marriage by the emperor. He was a relentless man, daring enough to mastermind a sham wedding for substantial gain.

If only Odette could perceive him in that light, everything would be much simpler.

Sensing the tremble in her eyes, Odette swiftly shifted her gaze to the passenger window. Bathed in the soft glow of the Ferris wheel, cherished memories of their time together flickered through her mind. To her, Bastian Klauswitz was a man who deserved both admiration and gratitude. In spite of the world's moral standards and norms, she saw Bastian as an extraordinary person.

It wouldn't be long before Bastian discovered that his vengeance against his father had been thwarted by her actions. Odette knew her fate the moment she decided to join forces with Theodora Klauswitz. Secrets could never be kept forever, so inevitably, her betrayal wouldcome to light. Yet, she clung to the hope that their secret would remain hidden for a while longer, at least until their wedding had safely passed. If the truth emerged only after everything had unfolded, perhaps the sting of failure and betrayal wouldn't cut as deep.

Odette lowered her gaze, escaping the reflective lights that stirred tender emotions within her. In the end, she conceded to herself that she was a greedy,..... shameless,…..and selfish woman…

Bastian's car raced on, slicing through the curtain of rain enveloping Boulevard Préves. The clamor of the tram crossing bell echoed through the lively night street, causing their car to halt and the outside view to freeze.

Bastian turned his head, intending to simply take in the scenery, but instead, his eyes were drawn to Odette.

What had captivated her so? Bastian mused with a smile. Glancing her way, he caught sight of a lavish jewelry store through the car window, its prestigious name emblazoned above the awning.

"Odette," Bastian softly called with curiosity. But Odette remained unresponsive.

As the tram passed, traffic started to flow again. Bastian stepped on the gas and steered the car toward the upscale shopping centre on Boulevard Préves, where the jewellery store that had caught Odette's eye was located.

"How fortunate we are to have a guest who made a reservation so late in the evening, allowing our store to remain open longer today. This chance to serve you, Captain, feels like a blessing from above."

The jewelry store manager's face radiated with a joyful smile. The employees, who had been griping about working overtime, found their spirits lifted by the arrival of the Captain and his wife.

"Bastian. Let's head home now!"

The Captain's wife murmured softly, her voice tinged with anxiety. Drawing upon her experience with countless customers, the manager discerned that the Captain's wife was a modest woman who didn't know how to harness her beauty.

"You've misunderstood; I really don't want anything..."

"Captain, madam, please follow me to this room." Eager to avoid losing such a cherished customer and the potential damage to his business, the manager swiftly interrupted the Captain's wife and guided them to a room inside.

Captain Klauswitz mentioned that he wished to see the jewellery displayed in the showcase while awaiting the genuine pieces to be retrieved from the safe, as the showcased items were replicas to prevent theft or loss.

"Sir, please take your time and browse at your leisure." Wearing a proud expression, the manager gestured towards a table adorned with rows of exquisite jewellery.

Upon witnessing this, Odette let out a soft sigh. The entrancing shimmer of the jewellery radiated a sharp, brilliant light. Although the gems varied in colour, they all belonged to the same category.

Those were diamonds, the very gemstones whose name appeared on the documents Odette had stolen.


Chapter 86


Blue Iris








"Bastian, it's time for us to return now," Odette reiterated persistently. No matter what she tried, whether it was necklaces, rings, or earrings, her response remained consistent, unlike most women who typically transform, as if possessed, when they come across a jewelry store display.

"Bastian," Odette's voice quivered as she called out to him. Her eyes darted around anxiously, and her pale fingertips tightly clutched Bastian's coat sleeve.

"What about this one?" Bastian, who had remained silent until now, eventually gestured towards a different piece of diamond jewelry.

Bastian comprehended the truth that Odette was a modest woman with high self-esteem. So far, she had never wanted any luxury other than the rewards given as wages for being a contract wife. But that was also the reason why Bastian didn't want to give up. 

He longed to present her with something of value. Something distinct from the obligations that had been met with a mere stroke of a pen in the checkbook. Something exclusively intended for her delight, like this exquisite blue-cut diamond.

Bastian recalled the presence of Iris flowers in the vase, adorning their bedroom for the past few days. Odette had an affection for gazing at the flowers, and he often caught glimpses of her standing beside it, simply observing or caressing the soft petals, her face filled with serenity and a tranquil smile.

Those days carried on, until time slipped away, and eventually, the Iris flowers wilted.

An idea struck Bastian abruptly: he contemplated giving Odette something that would provide solace, as a substitute for the fleeting flowers. He sought an object that would remain eternal and not wither away, and gemstones were the perfect embodiment of such enduring beauty.

"How about trying it on first? Often, your perception changes once you experience it firsthand," suggested the store manager, stepping forward. They extended the last remaining piece of diamond jewelry after Odette had turned down nearly every other option presented.

"No, it's fine. We're just...," Odette started to say before Bastian interrupted her, "Could you offer a suggestion?" He said, his attention captivated by the jewelry exhibited in the store's showcase.

"What type of jewelry are you seeking?" inquired the manager.

"Is there something that can be worn constantly, regardless of the occasion?"

"Hmm, perhaps a ring? It's the most versatile jewelry piece as it doesn't require removal and complements any attire seamlessly."

Slightly perplexed, the store manager retrieved a ring box from the center of the table and positioned it before Bastian. Then, one by one, they proceeded to display additional rings.

Bastian's gaze narrowed gradually as he examined the array of jewelry. To him, every diamond ring appeared exquisite, leaving him unable to form a definitive opinion. Despite his earnest efforts to select the finest one, differentiating between the rings proved challenging.

His ability to discern women's jewelry was not particularly keen. Aware of his own limitations, Bastian mustered the courage to make a decision. He reached out and clasped Odette's wrist, selecting the ring nearest to him. Bastian no longer sought Odette's input since she would always decline like a parrot repeating the same response.

Odette attempted to liberate her hand while Bastian slid the first ring onto her ring finger. Observing it closely, Bastian then removed it and moved on to the next ring offered by the store manager.

One after another, he continued this process—another one, and then another. Bastian repeated the process of placing rings on Odette's finger, making occasional remarks, only to remove them again. Odette, having surrendered, relinquished her grasp and lowered her head. The shadows beneath her eyes tinged with red, mirroring the tears that streamed down her cheeks.

Finally, with a smile, Bastian slipped on the last ring. It featured petite, translucent diamond cuts arranged in layered petals surrounding a square-cut blue diamond at its center.

Bastian gazed intently at the jewelry, appreciating its beauty for a considerable time. The blue brilliance of the diamond harmoniously complemented Odette's fair complexion, and he admired its shape, resembling a blossoming flower.

Bastian settled on his selection, opting to leave the final ring in Odette's hand. The store manager beamed with delight and applauded, gently setting down the velvet box they had been holding.

"You've made an exceptional choice, Captain. Diamonds of this hue are exceedingly rare. Furthermore, this particular diamond boasts the utmost quality and has been meticulously crafted with special expertise. You won't find a ring with such a unique design in any store within the empire."

"However, the ring seems to be a bit loose," Bastian observed, casting a glance at Odette's hand. Despite its petite appearance, the ring size remained too large for her. It seemed impractical to have Odette wear an oversized ring.

"That's because Lady Klauswitz has remarkably slender fingers. We can resize the ring to fit her finger perfectly," the store manager reassured.

"In that case, is it possible to have the adjustment completed before the weekend concludes?" Bastian inquired.

"Oh, yes! I completely forgot you have to depart for Lausanne!" the jewelry store keeper exclaimed with enthusiasm. Bastian simply nodded in acknowledgment. "Certainly, it can be done. Please don't worry, Captain. It is a tremendous privilege for me to play a small part in commemorating the momentous day of an esteemed hero of the Empire," the store manager spoke loudly, her posture reflecting deep respect.

Bastian remained silent, refraining from uttering a word. Instead, he gently clasped Odette's cold hand, the ring still adorning her finger. That act served as his response to Odette, who pleaded with her eyes for an answer.




Ardenne remained drenched in rain, the downpour persisting.

Odette, battling to find solace, found herself tossing and turning, sighing, and rising from her bed repeatedly. The faint glow of the desk clock revealed the time had surpassed 2:00 AM. The sound of raindrops amplified the stillness of the approaching dawn.

Leaning against the headboard, Odette cast a tender gaze upon Bastian, who lay asleep beside her. Even in slumber, he appeared impeccably composed and tranquil. His posture remained upright, his breath steady, and not even the collar of his blanket appeared disheveled.

With the rising sun, Odette faced the imminent meeting with Theodora Klauswitz. Her gaze drifted towards the wardrobe, reminding herself once more of her purpose. Hidden within the wardrobe were the document papers she intended to present to Bastian's stepmother.

"All for Tira~" Odette whispered, summoning her resolve. The point of no return had been reached, and she could no longer retreat. Despite feeling overwhelmed and on the verge of giving up, she pressed on.

Turning her head, Odette followed the relentless beat of her heart. In the glow of the firelight, she caught a glimpse of Bastian's face, and memories from their arduous day flooded her mind.

The bond between Bastian and Sandrine still appeared strong.

Odette possessed a profound understanding of the implications. She recognized the sorrowful fate of a woman who clung to futile aspirations of fulfilling a man's desires.

Her mother had experienced a similar journey with a father who had ardently sought her affection, proving to be the most passionate and adoring lover in the world. Odette couldn't help but draw parallels to her own situation as Tira attempted to approach her mother. Undoubtedly, Bastian's father would exhibit similar characteristics.

However, the love and kindness bestowed upon her felt akin to poison, leaving a bitter taste in her heart.

Seeking solace, Odette clutched her blanket tightly, attempting to soothe her trembling heart. At that moment, Bastian, who had been peacefully slumbering, abruptly opened his eyes and awakened.

The powerful gusts of wind shattered the tranquility within the bedroom. Despite the relentless downpour and the forceful pounding of the wind against the window, Bastian remained fixated on an empty expanse, lost in thought.

Alarmed, Odette began to discern an unsettling change in Bastian. His breaths gradually grew labored, yet his eyes appeared vacant and tranquil, akin to a dark swamp. It was as if he were wandering through a nightmare, his eyes wide open but devoid of emotion.

"Bastian..." Odette instinctively uttered his name. Repeated attempts to call out to him proved futile. With a sense of urgency, Odette hastily shook his body, hoping to rouse him from his distant state. Finally, Bastian's drifting gaze fixed upon Odette.

"Ah...!" Escaping her lips, a soft moan emerged when Bastian abruptly clasped her wrist.

Overwhelmed by fear, Odette held her breath, and gradually, Bastian's eyes began to regain their focus. "Odette..." The sound of her name echoed as Bastian's grip on her wrist intensified, causing her pain.

Unable to endure the discomfort any longer, Odette discerned a faint whisper calling out her name. Bastian released his grip on her and proceeded to stroke his own face, his speech becoming incoherent and muddled. He seemed to be in a delirious state, muttering to himself, with a disconcerting mix of vulgar and inappropriate words.

Just as Odette was about to switch on the bedside lamp, Bastian's abrupt shout jolted her. "Don't turn on the light."

Startled, Odette turned her head towards him. Bastian reclined on the bed, exhaling deeply, his gaze fixated on the ceiling.

Attempting to steady her racing heart, Odette instinctively moved away from Bastian, seeking as much distance as possible. It was only then that Bastian's realization dawned upon him, as he noticed Odette concealed under the blanket, curled up in fear.

"Odette, don't touch me while I am asleep," Bastian uttered in a hushed tone, his partially closed eyes now open. His voice possessed a soft yet chilling quality.

"I thought you had a nightmare," Odette attempted to justify herself, but Bastian remained silent. His gaze fixed vacantly upon her before he averted his face without a word.


"...forgive me." Eventually, Odette yielded and offered an apology. Bastian, however, maintained an impenetrable silence, as though erecting a barrier between them. It felt as if the man who once yearned for her and the man who coerced her into accepting his gift existed solely within the realm of Odette's dreams.

Confusion filled Odette's gaze as she observed Bastian, unable to comprehend the true nature of their current situation. He remained a man shrouded in countless enigmas, leaving her uncertain of the depths of his heart. The longer they spent together, the more questions arose, further intensifying the sense of mystery that surrounded him.

"Alright, good night, Bastian," Odette uttered, summoning her final ounce of courage.

"You too," Bastian responded tersely, accompanied by a faint smile. He then reclined, returning to his previous position on his back.

It marked the first instance of such an occurrence since they had begun sharing the same bed. Just as Odette believed they were growing closer, Bastian once again retreated to a distant place. Resigned to the growing distance between them, Odette enveloped herself in the warmth of the blanket and shut her eyes.

Ultimately, Odette arrived at a single conclusion: she could not comprehend this man. The uncertainty surrounding him posed a threat not only to her own life but also to Tira's. She refused to become a woman consumed by the allure of a treacherous poison.

With that final notion lingering in her thoughts, Odette closed her eyes, bidding farewell to the turmoil within her.



As dawn drew near, the rain that had persisted throughout the night finally ceased.

Theodora, immersed in slumber under the morning sunlight pouring through the clear sky, didn't awaken until close to noon. Battling a pounding headache, she resorted to pouring herself a generous glass of alcohol in hopes of alleviating the discomfort.

Just as she settled back onto the sofa, clutching the glass, a knock echoed through the door of her bedroom. "Come in," Theodora uttered, her voice tinged with frustration. Despite her inclination to unleash her anger upon Odette, an overwhelming irritation had seemingly drained her of energy.

Jeff Klauswitz was consumed by his desire to seize the diamond mine swiftly. As long as there was no concrete evidence suggesting it was a trap, he remained convinced that there would be no issues. Theodora, on the other hand, implored him to exercise caution and exhibit patience, but she harbored doubts about her ability to restrain Jeff's impulsive nature for much longer.

In the midst of her mounting anxiety, Theodora found solace in the approach of Nancy, who presented her with a note delivered by her niece, Molly, dispatched by Odette.

Upon catching sight of it, Theodora swiftly stood up from her chair, abandoning her untouched beverage. A glimmer of delight graced her fatigued countenance, which had been marked by a restless night's sleep.

"Prepare yourself for departure. We must hurry!"


Chapter 87
Express Train to Lausanne








As the preparations drew to a close, the devoted butler made his entrance. Gracefully, Lovis strolled through the bedroom, his time-worn face illuminated by a beaming smile.

Bastian, surrounded by attendants helping him with his attire, turned to greet the elderly butler. The shining badges of honor adorning his navy-blue uniform captured the morning sunlight.

"Master, my heart swells with joy and pride. Your mother and maternal grandfather, watching from the heavens, must surely be brimming with pride as well," Lovis's eyes glistened with emotional tears.

"Well, it seems like a story that sends shivers down one's spine," Bastian remarked, a playful smile gracing his lips. Lovis, momentarily surprised, soon let out a chuckle.

Fourteen years had passed.

Lovis had closely watched him for a long time. At first, he had disapproved of Carl Illis's decision to make a child, who bore a striking resemblance to their greatest enemy, as his heir. However, that baseless bias soon dissipated. By the age of twelve, Bastian Klauswitz had matured into an adult. He was distinct from his father in every way, except for his looks. Yet, it was also hard to see him as a member of the Illis clan.

Bastian embodied perfection.

He had not only surmounted countless challenges and tribulations but had also achieved resplendent feats. In his eyes Bastian was the greatest masterpiece. Lovis took pride in this, but it was mixed with a hint of sadness.

Bastian's life had been a ceaseless quest to prove his worth and capability. A model student. An honorable soldier. A skilled businessman. His achievements outshone those of others, but when stripped away, his life resembled a desolate landscape, brimming with solitude and an aching emptiness.

And Odette was the one who filled that void.

Lovis no longer questioned this truth. Lately, Bastian had started to resemble a young man his age, more vibrant and lively. It was nothing short of an extraordinary transformation…

"Please forgive me, Master. It seems inappropriate to shed tears on such a joyous day," Lovis quickly apologized, wiping away his tears. 

Once Lovis regained his composure and professionalism as an adept butler, he began by sharing the train station departure time, followed by providing an update on the completed preparations. He also remembered the crucial task of delivering a message.

"Mr. Mueller contacted me. He would like to speak with you over the phone before your departure to Lausanne. There's a matter he wishes to discuss, and it would be appropriate for you to call him now."

"Very well, I shall."

"One more thing, Master," Lovis hesitated, causing Bastian, who had just begun to walk, to stop. "Master... Ha... have you told her...?"

Bastian's eyes narrowed in confusion at the question, “What do you mean, Lovis?”

"Ah…Never mind, master. It’s just….a slight misunderstanding."

Intimidated by Bastian's intense gaze, Lovis skillfully defused the situation. To his relief, Bastian let out a soft chuckle before leaving the bedroom. The moment the door closed, the attendants burst into a chorus of lament.

"So close! Just one more word!"

"This isn't the time for idle chatter."

"Sir Lovis, aren’t you curious too?"

"Not as much as you'd think."

The attendants shuddered at Lovis's sharp retort. Their eyes gleamed with curiosity.

When would their master reveal his feelings to the madam?

Indeed, when? The grand mansion's servants eagerly speculated about the timing.  Their excitement reached fever pitch after knowing that Bastian had brought back the ring he'd commissioned from the jeweler.

Lovis left his master's quarters, striding with poise and authority, a faint smile on his lips, as the chattering servants remained behind.

Most bets were on two days, with none exceeding four. The servants were convinced that Bastian wouldn't leave for Lausanne alone. In truth, Lovis shared their sentiments.

If money were on the line, he would wager on one day. It was his secret hope for the hero who transformed into an awkward young man when confronted with something called love.



The VIP waiting room at Ratz Station hummed with activity as passengers, majority aristocrats and affluent people attending the naval festival, who awaited the express train to Lausanne.

"Smile, Franz, don't look so glum. If anyone sees you, they'll think you're attending a funeral," Theodora scolded her son. Her irritation was evident, though her lips formed a tender smile.

"Why must I go to Lausanne?" Franz set down his teacup, his expression disgruntled. "You should have visited Bastian directly that day and negotiated with him, so we wouldn't have to play the fool like this!"

"Fool? What do you mean?" Theodora's voice rose. Undeterred, Franz boldly aired his grievances.

"Exactly. Look, Mother! Everyone's staring at us. The social world knows that we and Bastian are enemies, yet you expect us to stand and applaud at Bastian Klauswitz's award ceremony like circus performers?" Franz's face flushed with embarrassment.

The diamond mine, once believed to be their salvation, was exposed as a cunning trap set by the devious Bastian Klauswitz.

The day she obtained the evidence, her mother decided to attend her stepbrother's naval festival. Her father, seething with anger, wanted to eliminate Bastian right away, but her mother's stubbornness won out.

"I am trying to protect this family from danger, so you must heed my words, Franz!"

Despite hurting her husband's pride, his mother persisted in attending the event. Her disregard for her husband's feeling was unusual, as she typically adhered to and honored his wishes.

"When you have a powerful weapon, you must also learn to wait for the right moment," Theodora said, her gaze distant as she spoke to Franz.

Odette was a valuable chess piece. However, Theodora hesitated, as Odette seemed skilled only in playing the role of Bastian Klauswitz's faux wife, lacking the savvy and experience of a spy.

Nevertheless, one could argue that Odette had successfully completed her mission, considering Bastian's unawareness, which amazed Theodora. That's why she now aimed to hide her intentions, avoiding unnecessary attention. Perhaps this offered an opportunity to retaliate against the numerous insults she had endured from Bastian.

"Let Bastian have his time as a hero, Franz. There's no harm in you temporarily playing the part of a fool. Because in the end, you will triumph over that hero."

"What do you mean, Mother?"

"Your father is getting older, and his time is growing short. The moment has arrived for you to stand as Bastian's rival."

"But, Mother! I..."

"Do not think of claiming Bastian's wife without unwavering determination! If you want her, you must be strong. Even animals engage in deadly battles to secure the mate they desire."

"Don't talk about Odette like that!" Franz objected, glancing around nervously to make sure no one else had heard. He felt a sense of self-pity, as his unrequited love was so pitiful that he was tempted to laugh at his own plight.

"That's the way of the world, Franz. Thus, there's no harm in showing Odette that you are stronger than Bastian."

Theodora used the most powerful bait to persuade her son. A blend of sorrow and relief flickered in Franz's quivering eyes, reminiscent of Jeff Klauswitz's raw and naïve side, which she admired so much.

"Look, Ella has arrived," Theodora whispered to Franz, nodding towards a table across the room.

Ella and her mother, Countess Klein, had just entered the VIP waiting area. Franz's expression soured at the sight.

"Be kind to Ella as she will be your wife. It’s the secret why I can tolerate your father's numerous affairs."

"Mother, please..."

"Why? Do you plan to make Odette your wife? To marry your stepbrother's former spouse?" Theodora interrupted her son's futile hopes with a sarcastic smile. "First, ensure Ella's happiness. Then, I will provide you the means to win Odette. Understood?" 

Theodora's gray eyes gleamed coldly. Although Franz's face remained expressionless, she already knew her son's answer. She wished for Bastian to fall for his wife. That way, Franz's triumph would be all the more glorious.



When Bastian Klauswitz made his entrance, Ratz Central Station teemed with spectators who had gathered upon hearing the news.

The bustling crowd filled every corner, and the cheers from the throng drowned out the sounds of trains arriving and departing. With the aid of officers assigned to maintain order, Bastian and Odette walked onto the platform. 

"Please follow me." The officer struggled to guide them towards the Lausanne-bound train.

Bastian moved through the crowd, carrying Odette in his arms. The atmosphere at the train station was extraordinary, as though they were commemorating a triumphant war victory. The articles featuring the hero of the Battle of Trosa seemed to have left a notable impact on the public.

A masterful propaganda effort by the navy and Bastian was well aware of the role he had been assigned.

The Battle of Trosa victory was undoubtedly impressive, but not one deserving such an extravagant celebration. Even so, the navy required a hero to enhance the Imperial fleet's prestige, and Bastian was the perfect fit. Additionally, the Emperor's eagerness to conceal his daughter's scandal contributed another dimension to the intricate game, broadening its scope.

Upon reaching the special train compartment, Bastian first assisted Odette in boarding, then turned around, removed his hat, and bowed to acknowledge the crowd, who gave him a standing ovation.

Having successfully played his part, Bastian boarded the train without hesitation. When the announcement for the last guest's boarding was made, the whistle signaling departure resounded for an extended period.

Saturday, 11:45 AM.

Delayed by ten minutes due to the adoring crowd, the express train to Lausanne departed from the capital city's central station. The sky beyond the steam dissipating along the tracks shone as brightly as the name of a hero who had reached the pinnacle of his glory.


Chapter 88
I'll Find You








As the sky bled crimson at dusk, the tea party attended by the officers' wives gracefully concluded and they departed the venue in accordance with their husbands' ranks. 

 Suffering from a pounding headache, Odette, the Captain's wife, couldn't walk ahead of the others. She patiently awaited her turn to descend the staircase at the centre of the line. In the future, her position would shift when her husband, Bastian, earned his promotion to Major.

"Congratulations once again. Your husband must be overjoyed."

"Please pass along our congratulations to Captain Klauswitz. Ah, he's no longer a captain; should we address him as Major now?"

Hearing this, Odette only smiled, expressed her gratitude before taking her leave. She and several other officers' wives exited the dining room and headed toward their respective train compartments.

The train hummed rapidly, harmonizing with the soft whispers in her ears.  Odette drank in the picturesque tableau unveiled before her: quaint farmhouses and vast, rolling hills rushing past through the gap between the train carriages, all under the watch of the autumn sun as it slowly bowed towards the distant horizon.

"Odette?"

Someone’s voice called her name. Odette turned the corridor's end and spotted Franz Klauwitz standing there.

"Your face is pale; are you alright?" Franz asked with concern, approaching her.

Odette gave a gentle nod. "I'm fine, don't worry."

"Hold on!" Franz suddenly gripped Odette's arm.

"What are you doing? That's impolite!" Odette tried to brush off Franz's hand, but he held on even tighter.

"Are you stressed because of Bastian? Or my mother?"

"Release my hand."

"I'm not my mother, Odette. I'll stand by you, and you can trust me. I can help you. If you want,  I can help you escape tomorrow to a place where neither Bastian nor my mother will ever find you!" Franz declared, his breath quickening.

Odette fixed her gaze on Franz, calm and collected. She had suspicions and wasn't taken aback to discover that Franz already knew everything. 

"If you truly wish to help me, let go of my hand now and leave!"

"Odette, I..."

"All I want from you is this, Mr. Franz Klauswitz." Odette stated resolutely, suppressing both her stabbing headache and her vision becoming increasingly blurry. Still, her gaze remained unyielding—no hints of sadness or uncertainty lingered in her eyes.

Seeing her resolve, Franz finally let go of her hand, and Odette dashed toward the carriage door and flung it open.

"Heavens, Odette! Why are you flinging the door open like a madwoman?" Ella von Klein shrieked in surprise as she sought her fiancé.

"I apologise, Ella." 

Odette quickly passed Ella, who maintained her disdainful glare.

After returning to her compartment, Odette lay down on the sofa. Cold sweat trickled from her temples, and her gloves, damp with perspiration, clenched tightly.

Why were Franz and his mother here? Puzzled, Odette tried to decipher Theodora Klauswitz's intentions, but no answers revealed themselves.

The accord had been reached. She had provided them with what they sought, and they had agreed to maintain the secret. Though Theodora was not entirely reliable, Odette had faith that she would honour her promise, particularly with a provision that, if the scheme became public knowledge before Bastian left, their bargain would be null and void.

Initially, Theodora Klauswitz resisted, but her expression shifted when she presented her with a photograph of them departing an old music store at 12 Rahner Street, snapped by a detective she had employed.

"If it pleases you, I'll hand over this photo to you; after all, it's merely a duplicate."

So she felt assured that Theodora would not disrupt the festival, at least not until all traces of evidence were effectively wiped away.

Drained, Odette reclined on the sofa, striving to compose herself. Ever since pilfering the diamond mine documents and surrendering them to Theodora, a night of restful sleep eluded her while Bastian lay beside her.

She longed and prayed for time to hasten its pace, yet she recognized the impossibility of her wish.



Pausing at the doorway, Bastian's eyes were drawn to the faintly lit carriage interior, where only the soft caress of moonlight filtering through the windows illuminated the space.

Glancing at his wristwatch, Bastian softly approached the slumbering Odette, nestled on the sofa after her taxing day. He wanted to ease her into the bed for added comfort but then thought better of it.

As the train rhythmically clattered across the river bridge, Odette's head found sanctuary on Bastian's shoulder. The resplendent moon overhead bathed the carriage in otherworldly light, enchanting the autumnal night

With great care, Bastian adjusted Odette's position, ensuring her comfort without rousing her from sleep, allowing her to lean against him a little while longer.

Across the river, the train gently traversed through the hazy meadow. Her tranquil slumber painted a picture of pure serenity, akin to being enveloped in the placid pool.  Life, unfolding this way, seemed agreeable, and Bastian felt he could confront any challenge anything that came their way with a calm mind.

He longed to be at her side.

The desire to spend every night together and welcome each glorious morning, with her presence eternally in his life, filled his heart.

‘Come with me…’ Would a sweet smile grace her lips if he confessed his love?

Bastian gazed tenderly at Odette, seeking the depths of her heart. He recognized that her captivating smile occasionally veiled hidden truths, yet he ached for the warmth of genuine sincerity beneath.

With the festival looming, Odette appeared tense and agitated, like a wife fraught with worry over her husband. Yet, she never questioned the ring he bought for her, her demeanour displaying indifference, as if the occasion had evaporated from her memory.

She was a riddle—captivating and seemingly untouchable. Perhaps that was what rendered him a prisoner of his own anxieties. In quiet reflection, Bastian reached into his jacket pocket and retrieved a small velvet box. Upon opening the lid, a dazzling diamond ring sparkled. Among all precious stones, diamonds perfectly echoed her ethereal essence.

With a smile, Bastian returned the box to his pocket. Bastian realized that giving a ring to a woman just awakened from slumber was a less heartfelt so he decided to save the ring for a more fitting moment—when they embarked on a new chapter of their lives together.  Then, and only then, would he lovingly embellish her finger with the cherished token.

He checked his watch again, took a deep breath, and allowed his eyes to close. The upcoming dinner cast a shadow, promising to be drawn-out, monotonous, and draining. Before facing the event, he wanted to rest for a moment

Beside this woman. In perfect harmony with her tender presence.



As Odette awoke, the truth struck her—this was no dream. She stifled a scream to find herself resting against Bastian's shoulder. Gingerly, she raised her head, careful not to awaken him.

"Ah..." She let out a faint grimace as her hair tangled in Bastian's shoulder badge.  Gently tugging at the strands, the entanglement worsened

Bastian's eyes opened, he smiled as he watched Odette shrouded in darkness trying hard to free her hair.

"Forgive me, Bastian." The prior night's events flooding back, Odette hastily apologized. "I-I'm sorry, my hair..."

"Are you okay?" Bastian asked, sensing the fear beneath her words.

That night, his vulnerability lay exposed, brought by the humiliation of his ailment. Though not severe he momentarily lost control over his thoughts and actions, overcome with emotion in Odette's presence.

"I'll set it free." Bastian gently removed the knotted strands caught on his badge. "Odette...if only... If one night, while I sleep beside you, I disappear somewhere..." Whispering her name, Bastian looked at her face  as he traced his fingers through her silky tresses. He was acutely aware that his illness rendered him vulnerable, an easy target, so he had been hiding it.

And yet...

Eyes brimming with unspoken emotion, Bastian's tender gaze met hers, "Should it happen, would you search for me and find me?" His calm question resounded without a doubt.

Odette looked at him, With her hair finally freed, "Yes, of course…..I'll find you."

Her smile illuminated the tender scene—a reflection of the moonlight embracing them.

Chapter 89
Eve








The express train to Lausanne  served as a bustling miniature world of genteel society; its dining carriage overflowing with distinguished personas, comprising of royalty, celebrated opera vocalists, and influential military personas, all gathered for a grand dinner.

En route towards the jubilee, the crowd's favorites were the naval officers, especially the commanding North Sea Fleet's Captain, Bastian Klauswitz. Amidst the festivity, he stood out as the heartthrob of the hour.

"Remarkable character, Mrs. Klauswitz," said Countess Klein, seizing the silence. Theodora, previously attuned to the naval officers' table, redirected her gaze. The Countess could tell  from Theodora's sharp look the impending response.

"Pardon?" 

"I refer to you applauding your stepson's triumph, even though he usurped the railway project from you.. You're an extraordinary mother, aren't you, Ella?"

"Indeed, mother," agreed Ella softly, her eyes carrying a spark of dissatisfaction as she noticed Franz’s continued attention on Odette.

With a sip of her wine, Theodora stealthily prodded Franz's leg, making him glimpse her way nervously. Nearly every gentleman in the vicinity had stolen a glance at Bastian’s wife.

"Countess, your praise seems a bit extravagant. We are, indeed, deeply disappointed, but we must separate public matters from personal ones. Despite our strained relationship with Bastian, he remains part of our family. After all, Bastian is my husband's son, and Franz's stepbrother," countered Theodora firmly, effectively silencing Countess Klein.

With each passing day, Bastian's reputation continued to rise – a phenomenon Theodora intended to exploit. To her, the 'heroic elder brother' image could provide a shining reflection that could cascade onto Franz.

"Ladies and gentlemen, let's raise a toast to the star of our Navy, Captain Klauswitz!" Admiral Demel shouted, rising to his feet and projecting his voice. All eyes in the restaurant fixed on the naval officers' table.

Amid raucous laughter and enthusiastic applause from the Admiral, a wave of jubilant cheers swept the room. As servers delivered toasts and champagne to each table, Countess Klein and other nobles, who were less fond of Bastian, were forced to raise their glasses, much like Theodora and Franz.

While known for his sociability and preference for strong drinks, Admiral Demel was not an easy figure to mingle with. As the Naval Chief and close confidante of the Emperor, his presence at the Navy festival was perceived as the Emperor's proxy. He was here to endorse this grand celebration of Bastian's success.

Gracing Demel's face was a satisfied smile as he observed Bastian and Odette, a vision as breathtaking as the magazine photographs that caught the Empire's eye.

"To the Empire's glory and victory," toasted Bastian, glasses clinking with Odette's.

Seeing Bastian as the focal point, all Theodora could muster was a wry smile. The serene dignity she radiated wasn't learned, but an inherent characteristic.

It was truly beyond her understanding - how could the daughter of a junk dealer and a money launderer birth a son like Bastian? 

Having smeared Bastian with various ignominious tags, Theodora was now tasked with digesting this bitter truth. Bastian thrived in adversity, growing stronger instead of succumbing to failure. To him, poison was not lethal but nourishing. Theodora realized her conventional attempts to oust Bastian were futile, fearing he might threaten Franz's position. So her new plan involved ruining his life from within.

Amidst Admiral Demel's spirited celebration, the lively atmosphere persisted, foreshadowing a late night for the officers. As dessert arrived, Odette suddenly rose. Observing the Klauswitz couple while sipping her tea, Theodora saw Bastian chatting with Admiral Demel before bidding Odette an early goodbye.

Following Odette's exit, Bastian retrieved an iris flower from her hair, pinning it onto his collar, and accepted Demel's offered drink.

Theodora's expression brightened. Bastian wasn't one for grand gestures without an audience, and the only remaining reason was something she had been hoping for. It seemed the time was ripe for Franz to overcome Bastian.



Leisurely nursing his cigar and brandy in a freshly refilled glass, Bastian lent half an ear to the inebriated ramblings of a middle-aged colonel. His view began to clear of the hazy cigar smoke, and his eyes, previously at ease, zeroed in on his reflection in the carriage window.

Riding the rhythmic pulse of the rails, the express train pressed onwards towards Lausanne, past shadow-cloaked hills and fields that unfurled in a swift. As the moon’s silvery glow kissed the tranquil surface of the lake,  Bastian stood, snuffing out the last whispers of his half-smoked cigars.

 The following afternoon, he'd arrive at Lausanne Station, where he'd need to hurry to the ceremony venue. Achievements tainted with coincidence, luck, intent, and political machinations held the same weight. Even as an admiral, the chance to feel a similar honor would prove difficult.

 A sudden longing took hold: he must become Odette's legal husband before the train concluded its voyage.  He wanted to stand beside her on the ceremony as a legitimately wedded couple, not merely contract-bound, so they could reminisce about that day, forever etched in the sands of time.

His newfound resolution seemed to change the landscape whizzing past the train window, and his strides became lighter. Bastian traversed the dining corridor, heading to the adjacent compartment, quickening his pace as Odette's carriage neared.

 "Why the rush? Cooking up another cunning plan?" Franz appeared suddenly, obstructing Bastian's path in the guest room corridor. 

"Move," Bastian curtly dismissed Franz, brushing off his hand and advancing towards the door.

"Does the Emperor know his revered war hero is a scam artist peddling fake diamonds?" Franz tried to block Bastian, his fear akin to confronting his father, yet mustering bravery.

"You've lost the privilege of railway construction, now involved in a mining hoax?” Bastian retorted, a smile playing on his lips.

"Quit feigning ignorance, Bastian," Franz demanded, brandishing a stack of papers. "Your deceit nearly worked. Your commitment to perfecting the lie was unwavering. I'm puzzled how you managed an impressive roster of fraudulent investors. Did you buy them off with the proceeds from selling junk? Yet, those prominent figures won't be easily swayed."

"You're drunk. Go back, sleep in your mother's arms."

"Though Laviere and Ewald are your confidants, I can't fathom Herhardt being similarly taken in. Did you grovel and use your sycophantic skills to reel him in?" Franz proffered the stolen list of Odette's investors, who were duped into believing they'd profit from a bogus diamond mine.

Bastian coolly examined the documents, unnerving Franz.

"You'd do better to shed that military uniform. A magician's career would suit you better. Wasting your knack for conjuring a diamond mine from barren rock is a pity, isn't it, fraudster?" Franz hurled the final paper at Bastian, striking his cheek.

Trepidation seized Franz; his actions risked Odette's safety, but he saw no alternative. He could only hope Bastian wouldn't pursue brutal measures to Odette.

Surely, Bastian wouldn't kill the Emperor's niece. If Odette were harmed and discarded, Franz would rescue and care for her, surrounding her with solace, reprieve, and love. He believed, eventually, she would open her heart to him.

Bastian bent down, slowly retrieving each scattered page.

"You think you're an omnipotent god. A foolish man who's smitten with a woman, oblivious to her true identity—a spy."

"Where is your mother?" Bastian, having read the final page, asked.

"Why inquire about my mother?" Franz bristled,  "This is a matter between us..."

"Best you reveal yourself, Mrs. Klauswitz!" Bastian suddenly hollered, perceptive of her lurking behind the shut door.

Franz's gaze turned sheepish at his mother. Soon, the corridor door swung open.

"Wish to weep on my shoulder? By all means, but shouldn't you meet your wife first? Odette holds your answers, not me." Theodora juxtaposed herself before Bastian with a smile gracing her face,. Concurrently, Franz's fear surged as another passenger's footsteps echoed closer.

"M-Mom."

"Till next, Mrs. Klauswitz."

"Okay. Let's go, Franz."

On departing, Theodora's sight fell on Bastian, firmly grasping the document pilfered by Odette.

"If only you were my son..."  Theodora's whisper lingered in the air as she bypassed Bastian. ‘I would give you the world.’ She swallowed these words, to spare Franz any 

Before the corridor door shut behind her, Theodora glimpsed Bastian entering Odette's compartment.

The eve of a grand celebration was dawning.

Chapter 90
Mother's Son








"Bastian?"

The door slammed open, jolting Odette from her moonlit reverie at the carriage window. She greeted him, adjusting her thin shawl with a smile.

Entering the room silently, Bastian's usual quiet demeanor felt heavy and different tonight.

"What happened?" Odette gasped, noticing the scratch mark on Bastian's cheek. "You're hurt! Let me get..."

"No need, stay there," Bastian interrupted firmly. Disregarding his jacket onto the bed's foot, he locked the room and shrouded the carriage windows with curtains, then walked towards Odette, who stood frozen, tightly gripping a crumpled piece of paper.

Placing the paper in Odette's hand, Bastian watched as she was mute in disbelief. Her lips trembled, her gaze hollow, as the bustle of the train sank into a muted rumble. The piercing whine of the engine was the only sound breaching her numbed ears.

"Take a look," Bastian urged, handing Odette the paper.

"Bastian, this is..."

"Quickly," His cold, abyss-like eyes locked on her.

Odette lowered her gaze, accepting the paper hesitantly. Seeing the typed text and signature, she knew its content and how it reached Bastian's hands. Her secret sin was exposed, and she feared the consequences of her deal with Theodora Klauswitz. Hoping to keep it hidden longer, she knew her prayers would've been in vain.

Accepting her guilt, Odette braced for punishment but vowed to protect Tira. She met Bastian's gaze with tearless, stinging eyes.

"I'm sorry."

Her apology diminished Bastian's smile. "Sorry…." he echoed, that sarcastic word stabbing his heart.

"That's what happened," Odette said, clutching the paper.

"That's what happened," Bastian repeated, his disappointment palpable. "What? Haven't you checked it yet?" He concealed his anger, standing before Odette by the train window's curtain.

Bastian waited for Odette's explanation. He wished to hear her refute the charges―saying it was a trap, a misunderstanding, even slander. He hoped she would ask him to trust her. If she refuted all, he was set to trust and dismiss the matter. He'd accept a cowardly lie, anything but ‘sorry,’ which to him was a dog's whimper.

"Take another look," he said, shoving the document back at her.

Tears brimmed in Odette's eyes, yet she held back. Her pleas came as quiet apologies.

"WHY!" Bastian screamed, flinging the document to the floor. "WHY ALLY WITH HER?!"

"She found a weakness," Odette admitted, voice shaking. She hoped Bastian didn't know she stole the document to protect Tira. The harsh truth must remain unknown to him. "I caused my father’s paralysis," she whispered.

"Beg pardon?" Bastian was taken aback.

"When I found out he met you secretly. I planned to apologize to you―couldn't meet. Upon my return, he'd taken our savings in drunkenness. It led to an argument."

"And?" 

"I pushed him down the stairs. You must know the rest," Odette confessed.

"Duke Dyssen said it was an accident, drunken slip on the stairs.”

"Right. Post-accident, my father forgot the incident ― I chose silence. Little did I suspect his memory's return," Odette paused, fighting back tears. As she looked at Bastian, her sorrowful smile recalled their happier past, deepening her regret.

Odette suspected Theodora Klauwitz had ulterior motives for exposing this secret, potentially to wreck their marriage. Despite the turmoil, it had an upside: she could shield Tira and spare Bastian's reputation, thus achieving her goal.

"My father wanted to send me to jail. He wrote a threatening letter. However, that letter fell into Madam Klauwitz's hands." 

"How?"

"I didn’t know. She had the letter and proposed a deal; I steal your business documents, she preserves the secret. I agreed."

"Why?"

"I didn't want to end up in prison."

"You couldn't inform me?" Bastian scoffed, bewildered. He could understand if Odette pushing her gambling-addict father, even killing him, but concealing this deceit—spying for his stepmother—baffled him.

"I didn't want more people to know about this... I was afraid," Odette bowed, her eyes welling up again. "I'm sorry."

"Do you think I am incapable of solving your problem?" Bastian lifted her chin, reading her expression. "Or you never thought about me?” Holding her neck, he questioned, “Do you think you can get what you want by any means?"

"Bastian, I..." Fear silenced Odette, confronted with his icy gaze.

The documents she stole, pivotal to the company, had been under lock and key in his office. Sense of despair and emptiness filled Bastian's heart as he realised how she could have taken it.  A bitter laugh broke through his lips. Franz had been right – His love for her blinded him, failing to see her as a spy and prey to manipulation. Ironically, if Theodora Klauwitz hadn't handed him those documents, he would've never suspected Odette.

Yes, doubt never crossed his mind.

After Thomas Mueller's call about Jeff Klauwitz's self-interest, Bastian sensed a spy nearby leaking information. Yet he never imagined it would be his own wife, Odette, who had access to his private workspace.

He would have trusted her blindly, out of love….

Bastian released her, a sarcastic smile appearing as he looked at the red marks on her neck. Long-lost memories of his mother resurfaced, her tear-stained eyes caused by his father's betrayal. Despite advice to divorce, she clung to their marriage, trusting and loving him until her tragic end. Though grateful for his birth, Bastian couldn't empathize with his mother's all-consuming love for someone so undeserving.

Gazing at Odette, Bastian recognised his mother's reflection in himself. 

He was his mother's son…

Loving the undeserving…

Trusting a woman who betrayed him…

Just like his mother…

"Bastian, I'll take responsibility," said Odette, gripping his sleeve. "Punish or imprison me, but wait until our contract ends and Tira graduates. I beg you."

"Tira's graduation?" Bastian detached her grasp, purging her touch. "Grasp the damage you've caused, Lady Odette."

"Bastian..." she reached for him again.

"Do you expect me to support your family after all I've lost?"

He finally knew the answer to the question he'd often pondered all this time

‘What am I to you?’

Nothing.

From the beginning until now, and always.

Chapter 91
Last Chance








The rising sun's warm light flooded the room, painting every corner with its radiant hues, and even the tightly closed curtains couldn't dampen the cheerfulness of this bright morning. 

   Bastian straightened himself, shifting his weight away from the wing chair's backrest. He opened a cigarette box without taking his gaze off Odette, seated at the opposite end of the sofa. He would have admired her in the angelic glow of the sunlight cast upon her, if he had not found out that she had betrayed him last night. Only when he took a cigarette from the box did Odette lift her head to look at him. She was deathly pale, emphasised by the redness of her eyes.

   Bastian said nothing and just looked at her as he lit his cigarette. All Odette could do was endure his scrutinising gaze, enduring the punishment that stretched on needlessly.

   Though she was filled with sorrow, Odette refused to let herself shed a single tear. Begging for mercy or forgiveness was futile, so she didn’t waste the breath. All she wanted now was a temporary respite, to delay judgement until Bastian’s business with the Emperor was concluded. After that, she would accept any fate, so long as she could maintain her protection of Tira.

   Please, she pleaded silently.

   Just as her gaze began to waver, Bastian flicked the ash from his cigarette into the ash tray, adding to the ever growing mound.

   “If only you hadn’t gotten caught.” Bastian exhaled a cloud of smoke, which hung in the air above their heads. He did not raise his voice, but the anger was still clear. “How long were you planning on deceiving me, hmm?”

   Odette felt like this might be her last chance, but she struggled to find the words. No lie would last long under his scrutiny, so honesty seemed to be the only option left to her. After all, Bastian Klauswitz was a practical man, the Emperor’s deal held them firmly in marriage.

   “I thought I could hide it until you went to war,” she confessed, her voice trembling. “Our contract ends when you return, so I thought if I could just get through that, I could safely request a divorce.”

   “Ah, divorce.” Bastian remained taciturn, until a slow smile crept along his face. She might have been good at acting like a good wife in the open, but secretly she was a spy bent on betraying him.

   Bastian nodded approvingly, acknowledging Odette’s plan. All he had to do was free himself from any vain and foolish notions to see the woman for what she truly was, a cold, calculating snob. Despite the blue blood running through her veins, she was mean and vulgar. He had let himself be blinded by her beauty and charm, but at the end of it all, she was no different to his step-mother.

   As he looked back on their time together, he true nature was clear for anyone with an ounce of wit to see. Wondering from one low point, to another, seeking a marriage that would elevate her far above what she deserved. She was able to disguise her greed quite well.

   What really niggled at him was that she didn’t even have to try. He was so enraptured by the fantasy of it, that he willingly let himself get deceived.

   Discarding the cigarette butt, Bastian rose from the seat. He took a step toward the train window and yanked the curtains open, making himself temporarily blind by the bright sun.

   I love you, lets go together.

   Bastian’s lips curled into a sneer as he recalled that futile confession of love. He couldn’t help but feel a slight appreciation for his step-mother exposing the lie for what it was. At the very least, it stopped him making a critical error, though he had already made a fool of himself.

   He loosened his bow tie, it felt like it was slowly choking him. His watch said eight in the morning, the moment had arrived to commence preparations. Time to embark on his journey to be a hero.



Bastian went through his morning routine robotically. He washed, shaved and changed into fresh attire. His agile movements went through the motions without thought, composing a countenance that betrayed no hint of how tired he was from the sleepless night. He finished by neatly combing his hair and slicking it back with pomade.

   Odette did not move from the end of the sofa, watching him go through his routine. It felt like she was paralysed in a nightmare. She longed to plead for her judgement, the waiting felt like a punishment itself.

   “Prepare yourself, madam,” Bastian finally said to her.

   He adjusted his medals with meticulous attention to detail, then slowly turned to face her. As she looked up at him with mournful eyes, it felt like a vail lifted, revealing the woman who had captivated him since the day they had met.

   “You said you wanted to atone for your sins, did you not?” His voice was calm. He turned and watched the tranquil waters of Lake Lausanne flowed past. He still desired that woman.

   It drove him mad, especially when he played with the idea to strike up the deal with the Emperor and force Odette into marriage. Tie the knot and have her commit to him for the rest of her life. It felt like he was under the influence of a spell.

   He chuckled as he took measured steps toward her. She had not said a word. Gradually his mind cleared from the pink fuzz with each step.

   He understood Theodora Klauswitz’s intentions in exposing the spy. Theodora had no intention of causing a scandal, she wasn’t foolish enough to challenge the Emperor directly, however it was clear that she deliberately used Odette as a weapon to provoke him. And he fell right into her trap.

   Through no fault of his own, he had disrupted a meticulous scheme and in order to make future promises, he would have to invest a lot of time and money once again. It was clear that the battle to come was going to be a lot more challenging than any he had fought before.

   All because of you.

   Once he stood right in front of Odette, he reached down and seized her chin, noting her enduring beauty. Even in that moment, when all he wanted to feel was contempt for the betrayer, he couldn’t help but feel his heart lift when she looked into his eyes.

   “Act modestly Mrs Klauswitz.” Bastian ordered, but strength in his grip. Of course he would strike a deal with the Emperor.

   Taking a deep breath, he knew he had to fulfil the marriage agreement he had made to compensate for the damages Odette had caused. He had no choice but to tolerate this woman for as long as it was necessary.

   Once the festival was over, he would go to Trosa Island, where he could seize lucrative opportunities for a few days patience, especially if he had to deal with this woman.

   “I know you don’t want to end up in prison, so you need to play along, otherwise you will be exposed as the criminal who attempted to kill her own father. Does that sound like a more compelling reason than adultery?”

   “Bastian…?”

   “Its up to you, live as the perfect little wife to the end of your contract, or I will put you in prison. You’re good at pretending and deceiving everyone, that much is true.” Odette groaned as he pulled her chin up. “Enough with your foolishness, Odette, you’re debts will be brought to count by Tira Bryller.” Bastian warned.

   “No, she has nothing to do with this!” For the first time, emotion flickered across Odette’s face.Bastian was taken aback, but quickly replaced his surprise with a mocking laugh.

“Tira, please, spare her. It's all my fault, please..."

   “Shut up, Odette,” Bastian frowned at her. “All you need to do is obey me. It was clearly stated in the contract you signed. Smile as though you were the happiest woman in the world.” He traced his gloved thumb around Odette’s lips and smiled at her elegantly. “If you wish to safeguard your little sister’s life, you must perform admirably.”



Chapter 92
If I could Live That Season Again








The express train to Lausanne pulled into its final destination and Franz guided his fiancee off the train. The platform of the central station was teeming with onlookers eager to catch a glimpse of the naval officers. Naturally, Bastian Klauswitz basked in the golden praise.

   “Make way, step aside,” the officers shouted, but despite the concerted effort to clear a path, the onlookers remained stalwart and the passengers of the train had to push their way through.

   “He’s just an officer, not the damnable prince,” Ella grumbled, unable to tear her gaze away from the entrance. Franz waited for Bastian with a relaxed smile ever present, he was genuinely looking forward to greeting him. He relished at the idea of witnessing Bastian’s pride first hand.

   While he was concerned for Odette’s safety, Franz recognised the need to sacrifice to free her from a life no better than prison. Revealing Bastian’s true nature to the world, it would significantly ease the divorce proceedings.

   “Oh look, there, he’s getting off now.” The onlookers buzzed with excitement, catching sight of Bastian.

   Franz swallowed nervously and tried to crane his neck over the crowd. Captain Klauswitz appeared with his beautiful wife. They beamed at the crowd with the biggest smiles and greeted the onlookers with such enthusiasm. When Bastian removed his cap and offered a bow, the cheers erupted and reached a fever pitch. Odette looked up at her husband with such affection and pride.

   “Please, look over here,” reporters were shouting, brandishing their cameras like weapons.

   Bastian obliged and turned to the press, posing for them. His smile was charming and the way he embraced his wife displayed his ostentatious possessiveness.  

   Franz looked at his mother, confused. Even Theodora could hide her sense of unease as the couple leaned into one another for a kiss.

   How could this be? Had he chosen not to blame Odette for betraying him?

   Franz forced down a lump in his throat, the flash of the camera’s strobbed in his mind. In that brilliant flash of light, Odette smiled, embodying the image of the perfect wife and they lived happily ever after.



Prince Nikolai decided to take decisive action, ending the lingering doubt that had been plaguing him for months. With a sigh of despair, he made sure there was no more doubt.

   “Princess Isabelle’s side is also clean. Her entourage informs me that her heart is set and she is sticking to her bridal class,” the attendant said.

   Prince Nikolai nodded approvingly as he watched the Belov delegation progress along the main road leading to the naval port, where the Emperors envoy was waiting.

   The streets were adorned with the naval flags of both nations, fluttering in the breeze. Pollen floated on the air, like tiny golden drops blessing the progression. The military band played their marching tunes and the crowds cheered. The parade had surpassed all expectations, becoming a grand spectacle.

   Emperor Berg’s intentions were clear, as he positioned Belov’s name right next to the commemorations of the country’s victory. It was a clear ploy to forge a military alliance between the two nations, perhaps also serving as an apology for his daughters missteps.

   Prince Nikolai smiled a the piece of paper in his hand. They were a summery of Captain Klauswitz’s and his wife’s history, from their initial encounter to their eventual marriage.

   What a mess, suspecting his wife’s infidelity and meddling in other peoples affairs. It may be embarrassing, but it was necessary in preparations for a national marriage. The Berg Imperial Family had done their best to cover up the scandal surrounding the wayward Princess, but there were still many aspects that were unclear.

   Isabelle claimed her love for Bastian was something that had been nurtured from childhood. Even before the national marriage. She couldn’t suppress her feeling and neither could she escape them. Isabelle’s passion for Bastian surpassed all boundaries of mere infatuation. All he could do was muse on the thought that being blinded by love ran in the Berg family.

   What made it worse was the indifference Bastian showed Isabelle. It pained Nikolai to witness the cold treatment from the grandson of a junk dealer, but Isabelle's heart remained unrequited. It also made the marriage to the daughter of a fallen noble very suspicious.

   He had his thoughts, backed up when he met Bastian’s wife, Odette, when they were introduced at a promotion ceremony.

   Nikolai had seen unequalled beauty before, but when he laid eyes on Odette, his breath escaped his body. He could not avert his gaze, no matter how hard he tried. If only she had been the Emperors daughter, he could have secured a marriage with her in a heart beat, but, she was given away like a bounty

 The one-line title, ‘The man who married at first sight still passionately loves his wife’ captured a wife beaming with happiness and a husband gazing lovingly at her. Attached to the report's last page was a photo of the couple from the evening paper, provoking an upsurge of resentment in his chest. It reminded him of the promotion ceremony all over again.

   “I want this report discarded,” Prince Nikolai said, handing over the useless document to his attendant.

   Despite Isabelle’s past, though a source of shame, was not an issue capable of severing the marriage between nations. Nikolai firmly believed that. Despite her immaturity, Isabelle held no lingering attachments to her cousin's husband.

   With the matter resolved, the wedding would proceed as planned. Prince Nikolai stepped out of the car, feeling a little lighter than before. The cheers from the crowd added to the excitement of the festival.

   The Prince made his way to review the vessel escorted by the honour guard. The distinguished guests, who had already arrived, stood as one and applauded, showing courtesy to the allied delegation. Odette could easily be recognised by the stiff, upright manner in which she sat.

   Prince Nikolai glanced at her. It looked as if her face had gone paler over night, making her look sickly. He frowned at the sudden change. She looked at him at the moment, with a bewildered expression, which was quickly covered by a warm smile. Her eyes shone just as brightly as they had always done.

He greeted Odette before passing by. 

Bastian Klauswitz's wife was stunningly beautiful today, leaving the only memory etched in his mind.



Bastian finished preparing for the review, buttoning his gloves before leaving the cabin. As he stepped outside, he was momentarily blinded by the bright sunlight. He took in the view high, blue sky dotted with cotton clouds, the vast sea that connected the horizons and let the fresh wind blow across his face.

   The naval review ceremony was the festival’s main attraction. Today, the empires warships were scheduled to pass by for review in a specific order. Bastian was assigned to the very first battleship, at the head of the review. The honour eclipsed the shame of his past.

   “Hey there, Bastian.” A voice called up to him as he went down the metal stairs. He recognised the voice, it belonged to a senior officer whom he often spoke to when he needed advice. The officer approached with admiration, quickly coming to a halt and waited for him at the bottom of the steps to the bridge.

Recognizing the reason, Bastian calmly reassured him, "We can speak freely when no eyes are upon us."

"But...," He hesitated briefly, eyes darting to Bastian's major rank badge, before smiled lightly. "Alright then, if that's what the Major desires, I'll comply. Thank you, Bastian."

"You're welcome."


“Did the confession go well, will you be going with your wife?”

   “I have received my appointment as planned,” Bastian said.

   “Does that mean you will be departing alone?”

   “Yes, that’s the decision I have made,” Bastian said, calmly nodding. There conversation did not progress as a group of officers were approaching them.

   Showing his courtesy with a shallow bow, Bastian moved on passed the new group as they saluted him and he saluted in return.

   Bastian made his way up to the main deck, where the midday sun felt hotter than it ought to have done. He leaned on the railing, his mind drifting back to when he came out of the admiralty only to find Odette sat by the fountain, waiting for him. It was from that day that their relationship held more meaning than what was consigned to a contract.

 ‘If I could live that season again’   All these thoughts were nothing more than meaningless assumptions about the past. He knew that dwelling on them was futile and he needed to concentrate on what was to come, he should focus on the present.

   As he made up his mind, the sound of the captain boarding brought him back to reality. The officers, who had been chatting away noisily, took their seats and Bastian joined them at the head of the vanguard. This was a position he had worked hard for, not something that was given to him out of privilege.

   He stood at his assigned position facing the Lausanne’s sea, his mind was clear, devoid of distraction. Despite the losses he had suffered, the gains he obtained along the way made it worthwhile. 

   As the captain boarded, a long whistle pierced the silence, signifying their departure. Bastian looked toward the horizon, lifting his eyes from the shadow of his officer's cap. It was a perfect day, marking their voyage blessed by the god of the sea.


Chapter 94
Not Yet








  Bastian turned to look at his wife, who stood confidently by his side. She was undaunted even in the presence of the elderly generals. Odette’s social skills shone brightest when challenged.

   “To leave your wife here, alone, the Major is a soldier of extraordinary will, I wouldn’t be able to do it,” chuckled a silver haired admiral.

   “She is far too precious, I want to keep her safe. Torsa is not a good place for such a young lady,” said Bastian.

   Pleasant laughter erupted from the other officers. “Even if the rumours of you becoming soft because of your wife were true, I still would never believe it. I never thought I would ever witness the day.”

   Once they had emptied their glasses and finished teasing the newly weds, the generals returned. Bastian never once let go Odette’s waist, his smile not once faltering. It was clear that he was experiencing the most unforgettable day in his career.

   “Smile,” Bastian whispered to Odette.

   Startled, Odette who was lost in thought, snapped her head up and smiled broadly. Their eyes locked and her already flushed cheeks grew even redder. Bastian chuckled.

   “Are you not ready to sacrifice your life for your sister? Has your conviction already wavered?”

   Odette did not reply.

   “Just tell me, I will be happy to respect that.”

   Still Odette said nothing.

   “I suggest you answer me, Odette,” Bastian said sombrely.

   Odette avoided eye contact, reluctantly lifting her face toward him. The woman was fragile, like a porcelain doll and he feared the slightest touch could crack her.

   He was almost shocked to find himself wanting to see her cry, to hear her pleas and drop the facade. He wanted her to break down and beg to the point where he couldn’t bear to hear her begging any more.

   “…sorry,” she eventually said.

   A sigh escaped from Bastian’s lips as Odette’s eyes grew cold and emotionless. She was as calm as still water. Her determined expression and elegantly long neck only added to her majestic bearing. She was a remarkable actress. He still believed in her, even after he reminded himself why he had chosen Odette in the contracted marriage.

   Odette let out a laugh, mocking his foolishness. A beauty as captivating as the days that had once fed his fruitless dreams. Ultimately, every moment was a lie.

Confronting the undeniable reality, the slowly drifting warship came to a halt. The time had come for the fireworks display, marking the end of the festival.



Seats had been provided for Major Klauswitz and his wife on the upper deck, a gesture of consideration from the Emperor. As Odette passed through the crowd, she felt like she was walking on a cloud.

   She was going to reach her limit soon, with her exhausted body no longer under her control, her legs numb and her vision blurred. Despite her struggle, she made it to the railing where she took deep breaths of fresh sea air.

   Bastian’s promise remained unwavering in her mind, leaving no room for doubt. He had always been a man of his word, even though he was mean and vulgar most of the time.

   Odette took a shaky breath as the crowd cheered for the first sparks of dazzling light and colour that filled the sky. She did not look up as the fireworks burst one after the other. The world fell silent and darkness engulfed her.

   'Please hang on.'

   Despite the impending punishment, Odette clung to her final regret. Just as tears threatened to break out, Bastian scooped her up before she fell. In that moment, a number of fireworks exploded across the sky, illuminating Lausanne with gold. Ignoring the onlookers, Bastian held Odette tightly under the golden rain.

   He will make her pay for her betrayal.

   Bastian put an end to the days agony. With Odette nearly fainting, he did his best to shelter her from the crowd around them, hiding her condition from prying eyes. He tried to sooth her by stoking the back of her head, looking at their surroundings as if weary for predators.

 Not yet.

Only he could be the one to end her life; no one else would. Until that fateful day arrived, Odette had to remain steadfast and endure without crumbling.

   As the finale of the fireworks approached, Odette’s panic subsided. Her body still trembled, but at least her breathing was steady. Bastian wiped away the cold sweat from her forehead with a gloved hand. Ignoring the strong desire to strangle her.

   As the night deepened and the festival drew to a close, colorful fireworks adorned the skies and sea of Lausanne, the breathtaking spectacle of the fireworks faded to memory. Bastian looked down at her, fully aware of the nosy onlookers.

   “Be patient,” Bastian whispered With a sweet voice that belied the stern command,  as if professing love

   Fear instinctively gripped Odette, resistance was futile. All eyes were upon them. She was trapped, no better than a prisoner and all she could do was brace herself against the impending agony.

   In that moment, they were nothing more than a mere jesters. With sudden realisation, Odette’s vision blurred as tears of shame welled up.

   “Bastian…” she said weakly, but the words were carried away by the air that smelled of gunpowder.

   Bastian lowered his eyes and calmly regarded her. In his pale blue eyes, a chilling sneer danced. Bereft of any remaining hope, Odette released her grip on him and to her surprise, he kissed her.



The Admiralty’s grandest festival to date came to a triumphant close. From the resplendent victory march, the promotions ceremony and the awe-inspiring maritime review, Bastian Klauswitz stood as the heroic figure of the Battle of Trosa.

   Bastian sealed his triumph with a kiss at the climax of the fireworks. The Emperor watched him, having recognised Bastian’s ambition and bright prospects. His accomplishments surpassed all expectations. It was a scene of such dramatic magnitude, so masterfully executed, he was wondering if they had a script writer.

   A self-assured smile graced the Emperors lips. The nations wedding would take place at the end of the year. Prince Nikolai cheered with unparalleled fervour, surpassing even the most enthusiastic onlooker. Doubts about Isabelle’s fidelity did not linger.

   Would Bastian’s continue his marriage to Odette after the promised period has expired? The Emperor looked down at the impudent hero. While it would be preferable for them to stay together, ultimately he would have to honour their choice should they decide to separate.

   The lover’s kiss, as beautiful as any painting, dissolved amidst the final embers of the fireworks. The Emperor applauded them as the rest of the crowd cheered for the fireworks. It was a grand finale that deserved applause.
Chapter 95
Origin








Bastian bid farewell to Ardenne at dawn, concluding the naval festival after a week. Gloomy expressions adorned the faces of the servants lining the front hall, a reflection of the rain that began last night and weighed heavily on the atmosphere.

   Bastian calmly boarded the waiting car, he did not look like a soldier bound for a rough post. Lovis, the butler, watched with some concern as Bastian's car swiftly vanished down the driveway. He held his gaze not daring to turn away as the hostess had yet to depart also.

   How had they ended up in this situation? Lovis looked to Odette, hoping that she might betray some reason.

   When Bastian returned from Lausanne, he promptly issued the order to prepare for departure, he never commented on the changes. The wager that had consumed the mansion ended with no winner, leaving everyone shocked and disappointed.

   There certainly didn’t seem like there was no issue between the two of them. Something the whole staff believed in, at least, but those who witnessed the couple. The same sort of sentiment prevailed among the public. Media outlets in the empire covered the naval festival, and even highlighted the daily kisses between heroes and beauties. It bewildered everyone why the atmosphere between the couple had abruptly shifted.

   Bastian's stay in Ardenne lasted less than two days, and even then, the majority of his time was dedicated to handling urgent tasks for the company in Ratz, which had to be resolved before going to Trosa Island. If one looked closely, they would be able to see signs of distance between the couple, such as no longer sharing the same bed. Even on the night before his departure, Bastian chose to sleep in his own room. Their interactions appeared more courteous than those of a couple about to part ways.

  In the end, many were left to speculate that Odette did not want to leaver her lavish life behind for one of a military wife. As criticism of her grew louder, so too did the sympathy for Bastian, who was going off to war with a broken heart. This seemed the most plausible explanation to Lovis.

   “It is getting cold, madam, we should go in.” Lovis said. Odette, who was still looking down the road after Bastian, turned around.

   “Ah, yes,” a faint smile spread across her face. “Let’s get back to work, shall we.” Odette swiftly made her way back into the mansion, with the servants in tow. The sound of rain pelting the windows filled the otherwise quiet hall.

   “Are you feeling well, mam?” One of the servants said, Dora, who couldn’t help but notice how sickly Odette looked. “Would you like me to call a doctor?”

   Odette calmly shook her head. “Its fine, Dora, I’m just tired. Some rest will be enough.”

   Odette slowly dragged herself up the stairs. She was plagued by headaches and constant chills, but it was nothing she couldn’t handle. It was all done now anyway and it wasn’t until she stopped in front of her bedroom door that the reality of the situation dawned on her.

   Bastian was gone and by the time he returned the contract will be finished. She was technically free. She would have thought the realisation would have made her feel light, but she felt the opposite. She dragged her leaden body into the room, feeling like water logged wool. The sound of a heavy lock marked the start of her new life.

   The earnest dream that had once justified this marriage had crumbled to dust. Now all she could do was wait and in waiting, felt the anxiety of it pressing down on her. When Bastian returned, he would no doubt bring her punishment for her crimes to bare, but in the meantime, she had to wait for it and she couldn’t just forget about it either, it plagued her mind constantly.

   But at least Tira was safe, that one mote of good news lifted Odette considerably and she clung to it like a life raft in stormy seas. With every step she took, she thought that’s a relief, that’s a relief. As if chanting it brought it power to heal her.

   And yet, the weight of inescapable doom still cast shadows, causing her to collapse. Her legs buckled and her vision blurred. When she regained consciousness, Odette found herself sprawled out on the floor. The tension that had been building over the week finally dissipated.

   The bedroom was quiet, save for the mournful howls of the wind. Blankly, Odette over to the window, she did not try to lift her heavy body. Memories from her initial meeting with Bastian played out in the rain drops on the window. She could see the dingy gambling den, their departure marked by a dry kiss, the imperfection of their relationship every step of the way, but it hadn't been entirely terrible, but it was all ashes now.

   Odette noticed Margrethe, her loyal dog, who became more animated when their eyes met. She wagged her tail diligently and bounded over to Odette to lick her face. Her mournful whimpers resembling that of a crying child.

   “Its okay, Meg,” Odette murmured, gently cradling the puppy. Margrethe relaxed into Odette’s arms as she stroked the pup. It was a moment of solace for them both. Odette felt like she could face the future with a more humble heart now. This was the outcome of her choice and it was her responsibility. If she just rolled over, everything she had strived for would be in vain.

   Determination filled her, this was not an acceptable ends for her efforts. She wiped away her tears, straightened her bows, restoring herself to neatness. Margrethe became animated too, wagging her tail and lolling her tongue excitedly.

   Odette rose to her feet, Margrethe bounding around her ankles. She reminded Odette of Tira in a way.

   The force of the storm outside grew, shaking the trees. It promised treacherous sailing ahead.



Bastian pulled up his collar, bracing himself against the storm. He made his way along the red road, covered in soggy leaves. He arrived at the docks where the transport ship waited for him. Upon seeing Bastian’s approach, the junior officers and sailors halted and saluted.

   Bastian returned their salute and strode confidently across the docks. The carrier was crammed with additional troops from the North Sea Fleet, accompanied by family members who were mostly young wives carrying young children.

   A soldier shadowed Bastian and showed him to his cabin. “This one will be yours, sir.” He said confidently.

   Bastian acknowledged the soldier with a nod, before heading in the opposite direction, heading toward the main deck. The soldier did not follow, his duty fulfilled.

   Just fifteen minutes later, the departure alarm sounded, prompting the waiting sailors into action.

   Bastian casually passed them by, making for the edge of the deck. Though the gloomy, dark skies were blanketed by grey clouds, he could just about see a faint light shimmering in the distance. It was the Ferris wheel, the very thing Odette used to stare out at, lost in thought.

   Bastian looked out to it now, lost in his own thoughts, his face devoid of expression. The anger and fury seemed to have fled from him in that moment. In the end, he felt like the outburst was pointless. Nothing had changed. The past week had been a constant struggle to prove his point.

   Upon returning from Lausanne, he wasted no time in attending to the affairs of the company. He sought understanding from Thomas Mueller, the one responsible for the practical matters of the company. Together they decided to abandon all current plans and although it was significant loss, it was the best solution for now.

   The plan now was to retreat and regroup. Fortunately, the railway business, which was joined with Laviere, was showing signs of success, averting one major crisis. If the marriage alliance with Sandrine came to fruition, it would provide a more stable platform for the foundation.

   And with that, everything came full circle, they were back to square one. Odette was no longer up for consideration and would be discarded as such. Bastian needed more time to plan his revenge.

   “Five minutes to departure.”

   All along the deck, ropes were being tossed back to the ship and the engines spooled up, causing a deep, ambient rumble. They embarked in the pouring rain, following along the Prater River to western Berg and finally, via the North Sea, back to the Trosa Islands.

   As Bastian looked back at the city, he caught a flash of Odette’s face in the storm. She was smiling and bade him farewell, she appeared as beautiful as ever and as a devoted wife. Bastian did not deny the sudden vision, but it slipped away after a short while, leaving behind a flash of memory he clung to.

   The transport ship picked up pace and sped under the open drawbridge. Bastian roused himself and strode back along the deck, braving the wind and rain. 

This marked the start of a voyage that would return them to their original orbit.

Chapter 96


Like a Name Engraved on a Tombstone








Today, just like before, the postman visited the mansion at 2 o'clock. This is the exact moment when the afternoon sun illuminates the Ardenne Bay with a mesmerizing golden hue.

The maid, after having retrieved the mail, made her way to the study. Odette sat at a desk by the window that overlooked the sea. It had become her haven and where she spent most of her time.

   Dora observed the piles of documents. “Why don’t you delegate all this to Mr. Lovis?” she said reassuringly.

   Odette was preoccupied with the organisation of the mansions decorations and landscaping, and simply nodded to Dora. With the extensive construction projects underway over the years, there were a lot of details that needed to be checked. One could say that Odette had spent the entire summer living and breathing at the mansion.

   “Thank you for your concern, Dora,” Odette said with a smile.

   Dora was aware of the meaning behind the smile and cleared her throat. “I have a letter for you, mam.”

   Odette placed her pen down and looked up at Dora. The letter was stamped with the Berg postmark, it was Bastian’s monthly letter, which never failed to show up in the middle of the month.

   Odette carefully put on the practised expression of excitement befitting a devoted wife. She handled the letter delicately. With her task done, Dora backed away, gave a polite bow, then left the room.

   Letting her smile drop, Odette stared at the letter like it was a giant, slimy slug. She calmly opened the letter, unfolding the crisp, white paper, she found a cheque nestled inside. This had become a familiar sight. Just simple cheque with no further instructions.

   From the moment Bastian had embarked, he had sent her monthly cheques. It wasn’t until the third month that Odette realised the meaning behind them. Payments disguised as love letters. She felt like she had no other choice than to accept the money and pretend to swoon at the imagined words inside if anyone was around when she opened the letters. 

Even after being betrayed Bastian didn’t cut her salary. Determined not to linger on the sense of shame she felt, Odette stuffed the letter into the desk drawer and moved on.

 The amount of money she had accumulated since sighing the contract with Bastian was becoming substantial. It was reasonable to believe that her target had been achieved.

   An idea suddenly struck Odette, would it be wise to send Tira to the new world as well? A place far beyond the reach of even Bastian. She needed to make the decision before he returned.

   Taking a sip of tea, Odette looked out to the sunset. With all her hard work, the mansion should be complete in time for Bastian’s return. Although she did not need to oversee the work herself, she felt a deep sense of satisfaction doing so, like she had given herself purpose.

   Finishing up her tea, Odette turned her attention to devising a reply to Bastian’s letter. It was important to maintain the appearance of a loving couple and Bastian looked as if he was not yet ready to publicly announce their divorce yet. It was the best she could hope for after a long struggle.

   In a moment of respite, a drop of ink fell onto the blank page. Letting out a sigh, she wiped it away with a bit of cloth, but it had already left its mark.

Odette calmly accepted the situation, approaching the fireplace with a folded letter. As she watched it turn to ashes and disappear, she returned to her desk. After making sure there was no trace left, she filled a fresh pen with ink and began writing anew.

   She decided that was enough.



The residence for the officers of the North Fleet was situated in the heart of the main island, in a peaceful residential area that one could reach after crossing through the city park.

   A military car carrying Major Klauswitz pulled to a stop at the entrance. The driver quickly opened got out and opened the passenger door. Despite being out to sea for a considerable amount of time, the Major had minimal luggage.

   “Oh, sir, let me,” the driver said, reaching for Bastian’s bags.

   “No, just go back to your duties,” Bastian said, passing by the driver with a brief salute. He never once looked at the boy.

   A cold, misty rain fell from the low clouds. August was only just coming to an end, but it felt like the island was already in the midst of autumn.

   “Hello Major.” A lively voice called out to him.

   Bastian looked up from where the voice came from a young lady stood in front of the officers residence. It was the wife of lieutenant Caylon, who lived next door.

   “Have you finished your duties for the day? You must have had a hard time on the rough seas.” The young woman continued.

   “I suppose, I just got on with it. Thank you for your concern ma’am.” Bastian gave as polite a response as he could muster, with a ceremonial smile.

   Frustrated, Mrs Caylon adjusted her umbrella with an awkward smile. “You’ll be tired, I bet, go and get some rest. I would love to arrange for a little party for you, if you don’t mind.” she said.

   “Thank you, Mrs Caylon, but you don’t need to put yourself out like that.”

   “What do you mean? I cant just let the benefactor of my family go like this. It would be a great honour if you could allow me this small chance to show my gratitude.” Mrs Caylon was a very stubborn woman that never backed down.

   Lieutenant Caylon was a newly commissioned officer and as such, his family had been appointed a single accommodation, barely big enough for them all. While Bastian had been appointed a rather large and lavish accommodation that would suit Lieutenant Caylon and his family, so Bastian made the rash decision to swap. His kindness earned him a reputation for exceptional character, which greatly benefits him.

   Bastian bid Mrs Caylon farewell and made his way to his accommodation situated at the end of the row of houses. As soon as he stepped through the front door, he could smell the food prepared by the housekeeper.

After removed his raincoat and officer hat, Bastian went straight to his bedroom to unpack his trunk and following a refreshing shower before heading back downstairs for dinner. The sun had set by the time he felt full and poured himself a brandy in the drawing room.

   On the desk were neat piles of mail he needed to sort through. He sat on the small sofa to filter through them and the top most letter was from Odette. 

He carefully opened it and stared at the contents. A neat little ink blot signed ‘Odette Theresia Marie-Lore Charlotte Klauswitz.’ Bastian laughed.

   The woman that had worked so hard to maintain the appearance of someone who was noble and elegant, to garner a reputation of someone who loved her husband, who was nothing more than a cheap snob that had sold her life for money, sold her faith and everything else for pride, was now nothing more than a cheap joke. She was destined to be someone to be forgotten, much like a name engraved on a tombstone.

   Setting the letter aside, Bastian leaned against the armrest of the sofa and swiftly moved on to the remaining letters. Among them was a letter from Sandrine.

   My Beloved Bastian it read.

   Sandrine’s letter was a language of passion, brimming with love and admiration. She was a fiery woman and was only growing bolder when she finalised her divorce. She was headstrong and an ideal match for Bastian, an opportunity he would be a fool to pass up.

   Setting down his now empty glass, he rose from the sofa, brushed back his tangled hair and stood by the rain streaked window. Water droplets from his wet hair fell onto his nose and vanished behind his open bathrobe.

He leisurely smoked his cigar as he looked out into the damp darkness, thinking about Odette.  Without the need to issue paychecks this month, as he was returning to the Ardenne, his only remaining task was to finish off that contract so that he could slot everything back into its desired place.

With another puff, Bastian turned and made his way towards his bed, his footsteps blending into the soft echoes of the serene North Sea night.


Chapter 97


New Round








“Even if she gets married and has children, she will still be as stubborn as ever. It seems like I will be laid out in the coffin before Isabelle becomes obedient.” Countess Trier said sharply, projecting her voice over the din of the rattling carriage.

   “It’s alright, Countess,” a faint smile appeared on Odette’s face. The countess collapsed her fan and clucked her tongue.

   Isabelle, accompanied by her husband and son, paid a visit to Berg, where she received a grand reception, marking it as her first stately visit as Princess Belov, quickly followed by an evening ball.

   “It seems so, somehow,” the countess said, examining Odette with some concern.

   Odette had received an invitation to the ball and replied that she would not be attending due to health reasons, but Isabelle’s stubbornness refused to take no for an answer and so Odette found herself in a carriage bound for the palace.

   Isabelle’s insistence had a reason, she wanted to liquidate their past in front of everyone. It seemed like the empress had yielded to her daughters demands.

   “You should have followed your husband, its plain to see that Isabelle is just taking advantage of his absence to mistreat you.”

   Even though the Countess was clearly upset and infuriated by the situation, Odette couldn’t help but laugh.

   “I don’t see why you and Bastian had to separate like this, when your affection for one another is so clear. How can love letters be enough?”

   “Bastian just wanted me to live in peace,” Odette said, wiping cold sweat from her brow with a handkerchief.

   “Just look at yourself, dear, how can you call this living in peace?”

   “It was just a little cold.”

   “Nonsense, the fever is rising so high that your doctor could have fired an egg on you, yet you still deny it. How many times must this happen before you take it seriously?”

   It was true that Odette’s heath had been rapidly deteriorating since the start of summer, but she was never really in good health to begin with. The countess worried about what lay ahead for Odette.

   “Even if she is the Empress’ daughter, its no excuse to be parading around a sickly child for her own amusement.”

   “The Empress has been quite considerate, once Isabelle is done, I will return home.”

   “Ah, really…” the countess frowned at Odette, unable to understand how Odette could be so nonchalant.

   Odette sighed as she looked out the window. The carriage was moving through the turning intersections adorned with marble fountains. High atop the magnificent buildings in the distance, a shimmering trident, which symbolised the god of the sea, caught her attention.

   She fixated upon the navel castle, its grey hues glowing in the setting sun. Young officers would be making their way home right now, eager to be in the warmth of their homes and their partners arms.

   Odette saw a young woman sat by the fountain. She rose quickly, adjusting her attire and flushing a pink colour that was not from the suns late rays.

   “I bet you can’t wait to see him again,” the countess said. “Do you yearn for your heartless husband, even though he hasn’t taken any time for you in the last two years?”

   “It’s not like that,” Odette said, shaking her head. She watched as the woman hugged a young man in the dark blue of the navy uniform. “It’s just been hard for him to find the time. He had a lot of duties that takes him away a lot of the time, he will take a vacation when he is able.”

   “Do you really think that everything will come crashing down because one officer decided to take a little break to be with his wife? His career has consumed him and unfortunately, you have been pushed aside,” the countess snorted. “If your husband truly had a mind to, he would come to see you, no matter what.”

   “I have no doubt about that.”

   “You’re smart…”

   “I couldn’t meet him because things weren’t going well. Bastian was always so kind and devoted, taking care of my father and my sister.”

   “You really don’t like it when people insult your husband, do you, even when its the truth.” The countess flashed a mischievous smile.

   Despite the misunderstanding, Odette chose not to argue and resolved to being the committed wife, while also worrying about the consequences of a divorce would have. She realised it was beyond her control.

   As the palace drove into view, Odette took out a small vial from her bag, the medicine Doctor Kramer has prescribed. With the countess unravelling her shawl, Odette downed the contents in one gulp.

   Odette, the hero’s wife and the Imperial Lady both took a deep breath, contemplating the nights mission. The imperial palace, visible through the window, was adorned with brilliant lights that seemed to illuminate the very sky.

   Odette stepped forth from the carriage with a confidence and a smile, embracing the lights that pushed back the evenings gloom.



The military port on Trosa Island, located at its southern shores, was home to the North Sea Fleet. With its spacious facilities and dull grey colours, it was normally a sombre place, but today was different.

   “We will be there in about fifteen minutes, Major.” A nervous voice caught Bastian’s attention. He turned his attention from the window to the driver, who visibly swallowed.

   Bastian gave a nod, but didn’t say anything, refocusing on the paper he had been reading, before the world outside distracted him. It was Thomas Mueller’s report, which was unusually thick. Bastian took his time to go over the details.

He's ready to start a new round. It was clear on one thing, if the last war was nothing more than a disturbance, this time was verging on an all out war. Something Bastian favoured more, as the lines of engagement were a lot clearer to follow.

   Once the report was done, Bastian moved on to the next document, which was about Odette and her recent activities. He examined this one closely. It was a glimpse into the competence of the constabulary. Well organised and meticulous in its details about the status of Odette’s father and sister.

   As always, there was nothing out of the ordinary.

   Other than being his wife, Odette’s life was rather plain and unexciting. She went about her duties as she should and nothing much more. She spent most of her time within the walls of the Ardennes mansion, keeping a very small social circle, with little interaction between Theodora and her son Franz.

   On the last page of the thin report, there was a picture of Odette and Franz attending a special exhibition at the museum, an opening ceremony from the previous month. Odette was admiring the paintings, while Franz was admiring her. Nothing problematic, but no doubt scandal would arise from it.

   An affair with her husbands half-brother.

   If only that was reason enough to get divorced and if only Theodora's desperate engagement with Count Klein could be destroyed.

  While sorting through the reports, they pulled up to a checkpoint, beyond which the port teemed with activity. Once identities were confirmed, the driver swiftly navigated toward the dock there the transport ship waited.

Glancing at his wristwatch, Bastian gracefully stepped out of the car. The calm North Sea, devoid of wind and waves, shimmered in a chilling shade of blue.

   There was a good half-hour until departure. 

Chapter 98


Right Action








Finally, Isabelle and Odette met. The reunion of the two cousins who had been involved with the same man was a much anticipated event.

   Sandrine, having finished exchanging formal greetings, approached the group where the conversation was taking place.

   “I was quite immature back then,” Isabelle was saying, a subtle smile on her face.

   “Well, you have certainly matured in your marriage, that and motherhood seems to have tempered you quite well,” whispered the young Countess Esher, covering her mouth with a fan.

   Sandrine smiled in agreement. It was much better than the childlike behaviour that once turned the royal family upside down due to her infatuations.

   “Yes, I can’t believe what a stupid mistake I had made. It was so uncomfortable to leave without being afforded the opportunity to apologise.” Isabelle took Odette’s hand, playing to the crowd that had gathered around them. “Although it might be too late, I still wish to express my sincerest apologies, Odette, truly I am sorry. Can you find it in your heart to forgive me?”

   “I have already forgotten about it, your Highness, its alright, so please, don’t concern yourself with it any longer,” said Odette calmly.

   Isabelle’s goal was clear, to erase her shameful past and establish herself as a prestigious crown princess. Odette knew her role was to support her in this objective.

   “Thank you for your understanding, Odette, I hope that we can be friends now.” Isabelle extended her hand, capturing the attention of everyone, including the Crown Prince, Belov.

   What was once a reluctant marriage, blossomed into true love between the two. With the birth of their child, the alliance between Berg and Belov grew stronger, fulfilling the details of their arrangement.

   As if embracing this new chapter in her life, Odette bowed her head and kissed the back of Isabelle’s hand, a symbol of her fealty and unwavering friendship. Isabelle, unable to conceal her nervousness, finally beamed a radiant smile.

   With a pampered look, Isabelle turned to her husband. “When Major Klauswitz returns home, I want to invite the two of you as guests of the Belov family, may I?”

   The Crown Prince Belov agreed readily. “Of course, feel free to do as you like.”

   “I love you Nikolai, marrying you was the best blessing of my life.” Isabelle concluded the play with an emotional confession and a passionate kiss. Her love for the prince appeared as passionate as ever.

   Odette had done her job, played her role and left quietly. It was just as she was able to escape beyond the gathered crowd that she saw Sandrine’s face amongst them.

   “Great job, Odette,” she said, as she approached with joy. “It must have been pretty hard for you to go through that, but you held together quite well. I wont forget your contributions to Bastian in the end. Money is best for you, right?”

   With the end fast approaching, Sandrine was determined to remind Odette of her place in the grand scheme of things and in the end, Bastian would be hers.

   “Have a pleasant evening, Lady Laviere,” Odette said simply, trying not to rise to Sandrine’s bait and made her way to the balcony to get some fresh air.

   She stood there for a long while, with her eyes closed and her mind shut away from the world. She didn’t realise that she was no longer alone on the balcony until she opened her eyes again and turned to leave, only to come face to face with Franz Klauswitz.

He looked anxious, as he nervously adjusted his bow tie. Unable to contain his patience any longer, he gathered all the courage he could.

   “Have you thought about my offer?” The first dance was about to start and with his engagement to Ella von Klein, he didn’t have much time to spare.

   “If you’re talking about the art exhibition, I know I’ve already given you an answer to that,” Odette said, staring out to the darkness beyond him.

   “Odette, please,” Franz said, calling her name like a plea.

   With Bastian’s return scheduled to the end of the year, the ongoing conflict between the two would reignite, with Odette’s fate caught in the middle of it.

   “I would ask that you consider it seriously.”

   “No matter how much I think about it, my answer remains unchanged,” Odette said firmly.

   When they had met on a mezzanine overlooking the art exhibit, Franz had offered to whisk Odette away to some foreign land before Bastian returned. He declared that he would do everything in his power to make Odette happy, if she promised to be his woman.

   “Do not be misled, Bastian’s forgiveness was never granted. He simply postponed his retaliation, waiting until he could satisfy all his greedy desires.”

   Franz brushed his face repeatedly, removing his glasses to pinch the bridge of his nose. He displayed this nervousness on the day that he proposed to Odette and more recently in art exhibit when he tried to kiss her. Odette braced herself.

   “Even so, it has nothing to do with you,” Odette said, shaking her head and backing away a step. Franz’s laugh gave her goosebumps.

   “Don’t say that, I’m the only one for you now.”

   “Get away from me,” Odette near shouted.

   “But I love you, Odette, do you still not understand?” Franz blocked Odette’s retreat path, but the door out of the balcony burst open and Countess Trier was revealed.

   “Don’t look so surprised, dear,” the countess said, brushing past Franz to stand next to Odette. Flustered, Franz made a hasty exit.

   Odette let out a sigh of relief, the countess did not seem to notice.

   “I got an urgent call from Ardenne informing me that the hospital is urgently seeking you. You are needed this very instant.”

   “The…the hospital?” Odette said, nervously.

   “Yes, Duke Dyssen, your father, is in critical condition,” the countess said, her voice was as flat as if she was conveying the weeather.

   “Oh, I see,” was all Odette said, it was just another round of misfortune to pile on top of everything else.

The moon faded beneath the embrace of deepening clouds, as the weather whispered of an impending rainstorm.



At the end of the bench in the hospital room, Tira crouched in tears. The dimly lit surroundings and the shadowy movements of the trees in the wind and rain, heightened the sombre atmosphere. Odette wearily made her way to Tira. The two sisters of Dyssen stood as the only witnesses to the unfolding scene.

   “Calm down, Tira.” Odette’s heavily fatigued voice broke the eerie silence. Only then did Tira raise her head to look at her sister. She bit her lip.

   “That doctors are saying we should prepare for the worst,” Tira said.

   “Maybe we should,” Odette replied calmly.

   Last spring, their fathers health took a sudden turn for the worse due to complications from years of being bed ridden. The doctors also emphasised the patience own will to live was a primary concern. Odette shared that concern.

   “He came to his senses not too long ago, this maybe our last chance to talk to him.”

   “I don’t think father wants to see me,” Tira thundered.

   “How long are you going to be so cowardly?”

   “Sister, I…”

   “At least keep our fathers death bed,” Odette said in a more stern manner.

   Tira had completed her schooling and was planning on moving out to Carlsbar instead of returning to the capital. She planned on finding a boarding house, securing a job and starting her life out there.

   Although this was contrary to Odette’s plans, she could do nothing but accept her sisters wishes, she was an adult now and could do as she wished. It was up to her to take responsibility for her life and make her own mistakes.

   “If you feel comfortable turning away from our father, you may do so, I wont stop you, but you will have to live with that guilt for the rest of your life. Take the chance to atone, before its too late, if not for you, then do it for father.”

   “I know, I would love to, but I can’t, not now, I just… cant.” Tira stepped back, shedding hot tears. Her trembling hands wrapped around her stomach.

   “Why?” Odette said forcefully.

   “Because, if I get father riled up, it could be dangerous…”

   “Again, Tira, just explain so I can understand.”

   “I mean…” Tira chewed her lip, considering the right words to say. “I’m…I mean, I’m sorry sister, but I have a baby.”

   The hallway fell into a deep silence and the only sound was that of the distant rain pelting windows and the roof. Just as Odette was about to say something, the bell to their fathers room rang out.

   Overwhelmed and unsure of what to do, Tira slumped onto the bench, wrapping her arms around her legs and pulling herself into a tight ball, let her tears and sadness flow freely. Odette watched her, her own eyes becoming blurred by water.

   A younger sister who was pregnant outside of marriage and her father on his death bed. The sheer weight of everything was unimaginable. It felt more plausible to believe that it was all just a terrible nightmare.

   “Mrs Klauswitz?” The nurse cried out from her fathers room.

   Odette had to confront the unavoidable reality. She hid her sadness as best she could as she confronted the nurse.

   “Tira, go to Countess Trier’s house,” Odette said sternly. Tira’s cries grew more intense, but there was not time to argue.

   Without looking back, Odette raced into the hospital room. Her father took precedence and there was no room for hesitation. This was the right action.

Chapter 99


Rain Like Fog








“Is this it? A funeral out in the countryside?”

   Once she had given her condolences, Marchioness Demel turned and sighed deeply. Her husband, Admiral Demel, looked about the small chapel with mixed feelings. It was hard to believe that this was all there was for such a great man, the husband of an imperious woman and descendent of a well respected family. Someone who had achieved the very pinnacle of imperial aristocracy.

   “How terribly unkind of His Majesty, regardless of his hatred toward Duke Dyssen. I wonder how the Klauswitz couple might be feeling at such a funeral.” Marchioness Demel dabbed away tears with the corner of her handkerchief.

   Odette looked resolved. The Woman’s Association of the Navy had offered their support, but she had declined, not wishing to be a burden. If she had accepted, her fathers funeral could have been more fitting for such a man.

   “Perhaps its for the best, the fewer people who see, the less chance for gossip.”

   “Yes, I can understand the desire to keep it small, given Duke Dyssen’s reputation.” Marchioness Demel looked about the mourners in the small chapel with a mix of compassion and curiosity. Odette was stood at the coffin of her father. She was well composed for someone who had just lost a father. It would be hard for anyone to have guessed that she was in mourning. It must be hard to maintain such a facade.

   “Oh, which reminds me, do you know when Major Klauswitz’s ship is due to come in?”

   “If the sailing is smooth, his ship should arrive tonight, although the exact time can never be certain, we will just have to wait and see.”

   “Such a shame that he could not have gotten here in time to attend the funeral, it must be so hard to have to go through this alone.” With a resigned sigh, Marchioness Demel took her seat. “Its so strange to think of those two together, something doesn’t add up, there has to be a story there,” she said confidently.

   Odette was completely unaware that her husband was due to return that evening. The Marchioness learned this when she was able to talk to Odette alone briefly. She had asked Odette if it was not better for her to wait until Bastian’s return to hold the funeral, Odette simply shook her head, the long journey made it impossible and he would not return in good enough time. Which meant she didn’t know that Bastian had set sail the previous weekend, before Duke Dyssen’s passing.

   “I know that its hard to establish contact with a warship when its sailing,” Marchioness Demel said to her husband. “But I find it hard to believe that Odette doesn’t know her husband is on his way home, so why can't she wait another day?” As she pondered this rhetoric, her brows furrowed. Admiral Demel simply grunted. 

  “But if she truly doesn’t know her husband is returning, then why would Major Klauswitz conceal this from his wife?”

   “I don’t it was a deliberate plot, he might have simply not had time, his recall was rather swift.”

   “I doubt that he had such a tight schedule that he couldn’t take five minutes to send a letter, especially not for a man so dedicated to his wife, or did he just simply forget to share such important news?”

   Admiral Demel opened his mouth to say something, but he was at a loss for words, he closed his mouth and swallowed the lump in his throat. He wanted to defend Major Klauswitz’s honour, but he could no longer think of any logically reasoning that would adequately defend him.

   “I thought it was suspicious when he hadn’t taken a single day off in the last two years. I don’t suppose you’ve heard anything, any rumours?”

   “What kind of rumours?”

   “Anything, like, does he have a woman on the side?” 

   “Uh-huh, sure dear. Major Klauswitz is a true and honourable person, a hero of the navy.”

   “I know, but he’s also a burly man in his prime, any woman would die for just one night with him.”

   “That’s…”

   The chapel doors swung open, saving Admiral Demel from a very awkward conversation. Everyone in the chapel all turned their attention to the entrance at the same time. Even his wife stopped her rumour-mongering to look.

   To everyone’s surprise, the unexpected mourner turned out to be Count Xanders, along with his young daughter.



Duke Dyssen lay peacefully in the coffin surrounded by lilies. He looked no different to someone lost to slumber.

   Coming face to face with the reality that her father was now dead, Odette still found it hard to cry. It wasn’t loss that she was feeling, but a heavy weight of guilt and remorse, mixed with a strange sense of relief.

   He passed when the rain had finally ceased, during the third day of his voyage, sometime late into the afternoon. Odette had been sitting at his bedside, diligently keeping watch. Although the agonising fits had subsided, he had never been lucid enough for her to say a proper farewell.

   Even without the excessive amounts of painkillers keeping him from being lucid, anytime that he opened his eyes, he would simply ramble to himself. He would mutter about his time as a carefree boy at an esteemed private school, or the admired socialite, the clandestine lover of an imperial lady. He seemed happy lost in those bittersweet memories and Odette did not want to spoil it for him. At the least, her fathers last moments were happy ones, rather than him blaming and cursing his own daughter.

   “Helene…”

   The name whispered from his weak lips, carried on his increasingly shallow breath, and then, after but a moment, he had no more breath with which to speak. The only time Odette cried was when she was calling for the doctor.

   Odette lifted her head, suppressing her sympathy and disappointment for foolish lovers. She looked around at the mournful faces, spotting Tira sat at the far end of the chapel, tears flowing down her cheeks. It was time to think about Tira.

   “Mrs Klauswitz,” a child’s voice called out and while Odette gathered herself, a child ran down the chapel and hugged Odette’s leg.

   “Alma.”

   “Are you okay?” Alma said, looking up at Odette, tears wetting her face.

   “I’m fine, Alma.”

   “No, you’re heartbroken.”

   “Did your father tell you?”

   “Yes, he said we are coming here to give you lots of hugs because you are heartbroken.”

   Odette noticed that Alma was wearing a floral ribbon in her head, the very one that Odette had made her for her birthday last year. Odette giggled weakly, because although the child was trying to console her, she was more bubbly than what should be allowed.

   “Alma,” Count Xanders said, looking embarrassed for his child's boisterous behaviour. “I’m sorry, she doesn’t quite understand.”

   “That’s alright, it was actually very affective,” Odette said with a slim smile.

   “It doesn’t hurt any more?” Alma said, a glint in her eye.

   “No, it doesn’t, thank you Alma,” Odette said.

   Alma beamed up at Odette and the bleak atmosphere of the small chapel was forgotten for a moment. Odette went to a knee and kissed Alma on the cheek as Count Xanders watched them. Their eyes met and a tender smile curled his lips. Alma had the same dark chocolate eyes as him.

   “Daddy,” Alma said gleefully and jumped into her fathers arms.

   With a quiet sigh, Count Xanders reprimanded his daughter for acting too boisterous in the current setting. Even when being admonished, Alma still sported the same bright smile.

   Did me and my father ever have that kind of time together? A fleeting thought passed through Odette’s mind.

   Odette adjusted her vail back over her faced and greeted the next new mourner that had come up to pay their respects, Countess Trier, as a representative of the imperial family.



A black car pulled up outside the main gates of the chapel grounds. Beyond the gate, the graveyard spread out across the green grass outside the front of the chapel. The place looked abandoned and crumbling.

   Annoyed, Hans unfolded a map, double checking his location. This was undoubtedly the funeral hall and his confusion only grew. He had never taken a wrong turn.

   “Good job.” A low voice from the backseat said.

   Hans spun around to look at his passenger, who was peering at the chapel through the window. Hans sprang out of his seat and moved around to open the passenger door for Bastian to step out. Despite the weariness of such a long and rapid journey, Bastian looked pristine and fresh.

   Bastian’s unexpected arrival this morning caught Hans off guard and in his state of shock, took a staff car out to the middle of nowhere, half driving and half checking directions on the map.

   “You don’t need to wait around for me,” Bastian said, stepping toward the chapel.

   “If you’re sure, my lord.”

   “It is an order.”

   Hans saw no need to be stubborn in the face of an order from a superior. He had been Bastian’s confidant for over a decade now, he understood his master's temperament. Hans took his place in the drivers seat and did not waste a second.

As the engine came to roar, he looked up at the dark clouds overhead. The rain was going to come down so thick it resembled fog. An adequate atmosphere for such a bleak funeral. 

Chapter 100


My Husband is Back








  According to the notice on the door of the chapel, the funeral was set to start at noon. Unhurriedly, Bastian pulled a packet of cigarettes from his pocket and looked at his wristwatch. Fifteen minutes until the scheduled time.

The crows descended from the lofty sky, their wings gliding down to embrace the desolate cemetery.  Bastian looked up at the cathedral. Despite its crumbling appearance, it still held a certain elegant charm. Its grand past, coupled with its humble present only served to deepen the feeling of despair it gave off. It was certainly a fitting position to oversee the passing of a beggar.

The place looked absolutely deserted and Bastian wondered if Odette had done this on purpose to save spending a penny of his fortune. He flipped up the collar of his raincoat, the air was getting thick with dampness and it was going to rain at any second. He exhaled a thick stream of smoke, his eyes fixed on the chapel.

   Word of Duke Dyssen’s passing reached him almost as soon as he stepped foot on the docks. He was handed the obituary via telegram and he decided to grab the fastest staff car and make his way here. The telegram had come from Admiral Demel and clearly a directive from the Emperor.

Odette's father passed away. It took awhile for Bastian to properly comprehend the news and on the journey up, he found he had to laugh. Duke Dyssen had shown unwavering consistency right until the last. 

   Bastian exhaled another puff of his cigarette, his cynicism fueled by the weed-covered cemeteries in the backdrop. Despite his passing having uprooted his plans, the inconvenience of it was negligible. The passage of events will ultimately remain unchanged, Bastian would just need to take a minor detour. Still, the thought of having to wade through unsavoury events again remained a burden.

   The emperor had bestowed upon his hero a reward of marriage with very little justification, but in the reality of it was mundane and inconsequential. Nothing had changed really. The fate of this bargain was sealed when the emperor arranged their union a repayment of a debt owed by the woman's father.

   Where was the honour in have a wife of high-born lineage?

   Bastian rhythmically puffed on his cigarette and approached the chapel doors again. Memories of Lady Odette, who was only tolerated in higher circles because of her borrowed clothes, surfaced briefly before the dilapidated ruins. Had she hailed from a real imperial family, Duke Dyssen wouldn’t be sent away in such an undignified manner. 

The royal family no longer needed her.

 Faced with that evidence, Bastian found himself rather relaxed. Seeing the emperor urging him to act as her husband at the funeral, he seemed to regret leaving his niece in such a mess. It would make divorce much easier for him, so there's no reason why he can't be the emperor's dog once more at this time.

He stepped into the role with full awareness. It was a strategic move in dealing with the emperor and its rewards were soon to materialize. It would also allow him the opportunity to question his recent doubts in his overseas service.

   Bastian tossed away the cigarette butt and replaced his cap on his head. His cold, thick and dark eyes mirrored the gray clouds pregnant with rain.

Letting out a smoky sigh, he made his way to the chapel entrance. Noontime had arrived,  the time had come for him to adopt the roll of grieving and supporting husband to a beggar princess.



When the noon bell rang, the funeral ceremony began. Alma had been dozing off and was suddenly disturbed from her sleep by the sound.

   Odette shifted and adjusted so that she could provide a more comfortable support for the sleepy child. Satisfied, Alma murmured as she fell back asleep

Maximin sat behind them and watched. Alma was secure in Odette’s arms and showed no signs of ever falling off the bench. The child was quite fond of Odette, despite their not being related and the families not being that close.

   “Come here Alma, sit with Daddy.” The Count said, making his way around the bench so that he could take Alma, but when Alma stirred and realised what was going on, burrowed herself deeper into Odette’s arms.

   “It's okay,” said Odette. I'll hand her over to you when she fall asleep” her whisper blended harmoniously with the organ's melodious tune.

   “Okay, I guess  I'll trouble you in a bit,” he said, taking a seat next to Odette. It was considered a faux-pas, but it was better than having to disturb the ceremony with a screaming child. “I shouldn’t have brought her, please accept my apology, I wasn’t thinking.” 

Odette gave Maximin a little smile,"No, I'm glad I have Alma. I'm also grateful for your consideration."

   It didn’t seem right that Maximin was sitting next to Odette when Tira was condemned to the back benches just because she was an illegitimate child. Odette tried to convince the church to let Tira sit with her, but they refused to break with custom. Tira was humble in accepting the reality of the situation, she seemed a little relieved not to associate herself with Duke Dyssen.

   That left Odette to sit at the front of the ceremony alone, guarding the empty seats as the lone heir. If it had not been for Alma, who was practically Odette’s shadow at this point, it might have been a much colder ordeal.

   “It seems the stubborn young lady has finally fallen asleep, I’ll take her back now,” Maximin said.

   Odette very carefully shifted the small bundle of Alma into her fathers arms. She murmured a little, but did not wake from her sleep.

   It was at that moment that the doors of the chapel opened and a tall man in a naval uniform stood at the threshold. 



The pipe organ stopped its sonorous droll and the whole chapel looked to see Bastian making his way down the aisle.

   He strode as if he didn’t have a care in the world, taking in the shabby chapel interior, which was a little more well kept than he would have thought, given the state of the exterior and stopped at the coffin to pay his respects. He could smell the abundance of lilies before he saw them flooded in the coffin with the deceased Duke.

Duke Dyssen lay peacefully in the center, his figure looking better than Bastian had seen in ages. What pleased Bastian most was the absence of his boisterous voice that had once tormented him—was now silenced for eternity.

   “I’m Bastian Klauswitz, I’m sorry for my tardiness,” Bastian excused himself to the priest, who just looked at him.

   “You are Lady Odette’s husband? We are just glad that you could make it,” the priest said with a benevolent smile, giving him the lily for the offering.

   The mournful organ continued its hymnal as Bastian placed the flower before Duke Dyssen's portrait. Odette felt the scene was like a surreal dream until he turned his gaze to her seat.

Bastian turned his attention to towards the family’ seat and Their eyes met briefly in the soft, flickering candlelight. Odette held her breath and her hands together.  Bastian's face looked sharper and tougher, reflecting the last two years of his journey with mature features. His fair sun-kissed skin and serene eyes serve as a testament to the obvious change.

   My husband is back? But how? Odette said to herself.

   It took awhile for Odette to work up the courage to look at her husband’s face. She remained transfixed on the gold buttons, engraved with the naval insignia upon their domed surface. When there was no other way to deny the fact that Bastian was really here, she looked up into his face.

   She had been transfixed on this moment for a long time, wondering what it would be like to see Bastian again after so long. She had made numerous assumptions about what he would do or say to her, but the result was always the same: hatred and contempt. She humbly prepared herself to accept it, but the confusion caused by him was like the calm surface of a lake, getting deeper and deeper.

   Odette stared into his clear blue eyes, which could not discern any emotions, she rose from her seat and turned to face him. Without saying a single thing, Bastian only giving her a silent salute, Odette reciprocated with a curtsey. It was hard to identify any signs of surprise or embarrassment in either of them.

   Bastian looked passed Odette to the man that had the audacity to sit in his seat and recalled the name of a botanist that was raising his child on his own, Maximin von Xanders. 

He was still holding a sleeping girl in his arms. He recalled that he was one of Odette’s new friends named in the detective's reports he had read. The friendship must be greater than he had initially guessed, for him to so brazenly break common courtesy.

   Bastian returned his cynical eye to Odette. She was a very wicked woman, already looking for the next man to leech off of. His snide thoughts slipped from his mind as Odette lifted her mourning vail, slowly revealing a slender neck, plump, sorrowful lips and the cutest little nose. The fire burning in his mind quenched.

   Odette rested the vail over her hat and she looked up at the cross hanging in front of the stain glassed window, above where her father lay. Bastian was willing to face those mournful, turquoise eyes, it was a reunion that was more than than expected.
----

Continue in Part 4!
